
--**--**--
 house, midway on the hillside. It is a mere skeleton of slender,
 decaying tree trunks, with neither walls nor a roof; nothing but a
 tracery of branches and twigs, which the next wintry blast will be very
 likely to scatter in fragments along the terrace. It looks, and is, as
 evanescent as a dream; and yet, in its rustic network of boughs, it
 has somehow enclosed a hint of spiritual beauty, and has become a true
 emblem of the subtile and ethereal mind that planned it. I made Eustace
 Bright sit down on a snow bank, which had heaped itself over the mossy
 seat, and gazing through the arched windows opposite, he acknowledged
 that the scene at once grew picturesque.
 
 "Simple as it looks," said he, "this little edifice seems to be the work
 of magic. It is full of suggestiveness, and, in its way, is as good as a
 cathedral. Ah, it would be just the spot for one to sit in, of a summer
 afternoon, and tell the children some more of those wild stories from
 the classic myths!"
 
 "It would, indeed," answered I. "The summer house itself, so airy and
 so broken, is like one of those old tales, imperfectly remembered; and
 these living branches of the Baldwin apple tree, thrusting so rudely
 in, are like your unwarrantable interpolations. But, by the by, have
 you added any more legends to the series, since the publication of the
 'Wonder-Book'?"
 
 "Many more," said Eustace; "Primrose, Periwinkle, and the rest of them,
 allow me no comfort of my life unless I tell them a story every day or
 two. I have run away from home partly to escape the importunity of these
 little wretches! But I have written out six of the new stories, and have
 brought them for you to look over."
--**--**--
 too, had listened to two or three of the tales, and censured them even
 more bitterly than he did THE THREE GOLDEN APPLES; so that, what with
 praise, and what with criticism, Eustace Bright thinks that there is
 good hope of at least as much success with the public as in the case of
 the "WonderBook."
 
 I made all sorts of inquiries about the children, not doubting that
 there would be great eagerness to hear of their welfare, among some good
 little folks who have written to me, to ask for another volume of myths.
 They are all, I am happy to say (unless we except Clover), in excellent
 health and spirits. Primrose is now almost a young lady, and, Eustace
 tells me, is just as saucy as ever. She pretends to consider herself
 quite beyond the age to be interested by such idle stories as these;
 but, for all that, whenever a story is to be told, Primrose never
 fails to be one of the listeners, and to make fun of it when finished.
 Periwinkle is very much grown, and is expected to shut up her baby house
 and throw away her doll in a month or two more. Sweet Fern has learned
 to read and write, and has put on a jacket and pair of pantaloons--all
 of which improvements I am sorry for. Squash Blossom, Blue Eye,
 Plantain, and Buttercup have had the scarlet fever, but came easily
 through it. Huckleberry, Milkweed, and Dandelion were attacked with the
 whooping cough, but bore it bravely, and kept out of doors whenever the
 sun shone. Cowslip, during the autumn, had either the measles, or some
 eruption that looked very much like it, but was hardly sick a day. Poor
 Clover has been a good deal troubled with her second teeth, which have
--**--**--
 
 
 
 THE MINOTAUR.
 
 In the old city of Troezene, at the foot of a lofty mountain,
 there lived, a very long time ago, a little boy named Theseus. His
 grandfather, King Pittheus, was the sovereign of that country, and was
 reckoned a very wise man; so that Theseus, being brought up in the royal
 palace, and being naturally a bright lad, could hardly fail of profiting
 by the old king's instructions. His mother's name was Aethra. As for his
 father, the boy had never seen him. But, from his earliest remembrance,
 Aethra used to go with little Theseus into a wood, and sit down upon a
 moss-grown rock, which was deeply sunken into the earth. Here she
 often talked with her son about his father, and said that he was called
 Aegeus, and that he was a great king, and ruled over Attica, and dwelt
 at Athens, which was as famous a city as any in the world. Theseus was
 very fond of hearing about King Aegeus, and often asked his good mother
 Aethra why he did not come and live with them at Troezene.
 
 "Ah, my dear son," answered Aethra, with a sigh, "a monarch has his
 people to take care of. The men and women over whom he rules are in the
 place of children to him; and he can seldom spare time to love his own
 children as other parents do. Your father will never be able to leave
 his kingdom for the sake of seeing his little boy."
 
 "Well, but, dear mother," asked the boy, "why cannot I go to this famous
 city of Athens, and tell King Aegeus that I am his son?"
 
 "That may happen by and by," said Aethra. "Be patient, and we shall see.
 You are not yet big and strong enough to set out on such an errand."
--**--**--
 of his great hands to the task. Meanwhile the rock seemed to be sinking
 farther and farther into the ground. The moss grew over it thicker and
 thicker, until at last it looked almost like a soft green seat, with
 only a few gray knobs of granite peeping out. The overhanging trees,
 also, shed their brown leaves upon It, as often as the autumn came; and
 at its base grew ferns and wild flowers, some of which crept quite over
 its surface. To all appearance, the rock was as firmly fastened as any
 other portion of the earth's substance.
 
 But, difficult as the matter looked, Theseus was now growing up to be
 such a vigorous youth, that, in his own opinion, the time would quickly
 come when he might hope to get the upper hand of this ponderous lump of
 stone.
 
 "Mother, I do believe it has started!" cried he, after one of his
 attempts. "The earth around it is certainly a little cracked!"
 
 "No, no, child!" his mother hastily answered. "It is not possible you
 can have moved it, such a boy as you still are!"
 
 Nor would she be convinced, although Theseus showed her the place where
 he fancied that the stem of a flower had been partly uprooted by the
 movement of the rock. But Aethra sighed, and looked disquieted; for, no
 doubt, she began to be conscious that her son was no longer a child, and
 that, in a little while hence, she must send him forth among the perils
 and troubles of the world.
 
 It was not more than a year afterwards when they were again sitting on
 the moss-covered stone. Aethra had once more told him the oft-repeated
 story of his father, and how gladly he would receive Theseus at his
 stately palace, and how he would present him to his courtiers and the
--**--**--
 her tears glistening on his cheeks, and some, if the truth must be told,
 that had gushed out of his own eyes. But he let the sun and wind dry
 them, and walked stoutly on, playing with the golden hilt of his sword,
 and taking very manly strides in his father's sandals.
 
 I cannot stop to tell you hardly any of the adventures that befell
 Theseus on the road to Athens. It is enough to say, that he quite
 cleared that part of the country of the robbers about whom King Pittheus
 had been so much alarmed. One of these bad people was named Procrustes;
 and he was indeed a terrible fellow, and had an ugly way of making fun
 of the poor travelers who happened to fall into his clutches. In his
 cavern he had a bed, on which, with great pretense of hospitality, he
 invited his guests to lie down; but, if they happened to be shorter than
 the bed, this wicked villain stretched them out by main force; or, if
 they were too tall, he lopped off their heads or feet, and laughed at
 what he had done, as an excellent joke. Thus, however weary a man might
 be, he never liked to lie in the bed of Procrustes. Another of these
 robbers, named Scinis, must likewise have been a very great scoundrel.
 He was in the habit of flinging his victims off a high cliff into the
 sea; and, in order to give him exactly his deserts, Theseus tossed him
 off the very same place. But if you will believe me, the sea would not
 pollute itself by receiving such a bad person into its bosom; neither
 would the earth, having once got rid of him, consent to take him back;
 so that, between the cliff and the sea, Scinis stuck fast in the air,
--**--**--
 at all the kind of a person to let them steal away his father's crown
 and scepter, which ought to be his own by right of inheritance. Thus
 these bad-hearted nephews of King Aegeus, who were the own cousins of
 Theseus, at once became his enemies. A still more dangerous enemy was
 Medea, the wicked enchantress; for she was now the king's wife, and
 wanted to give the kingdom to her son Medus, instead of letting it be
 given to the son of Aethra, whom she hated.
 
 It so happened that the king's nephews met Theseus, and found out who he
 was, just as he reached the entrance of the royal palace. With all
 their evil designs against him, they pretended to be their cousin's
 best friends, and expressed great joy at making his acquaintance.
 They proposed to him that he should come into the king's presence as
 a stranger, in order to try whether Aegeus would discover in the young
 man's features any likeness either to himself or his mother Aethra, and
 thus recognize him for a son. Theseus consented; for he fancied that his
 father would know him in a moment, by the love that was in his heart.
 But, while he waited at the door, the nephews ran and told King Aegeus
 that a young man had arrived in Athens, who, to their certain knowledge,
 intended to put him to death, and get possession of his royal crown.
 
 "And he is now waiting for admission to your majesty's presence," added
 they.
 
 "Aha!" cried the old king, on hearing this. "Why, he must be a very
 wicked young fellow indeed! Pray, what would you advise me to do with
 him?"
 
 In reply to this question, the wicked Medea put in her word. As I
 have already told you, she was a famous enchantress. According to some
--**--**--
 
 As she said this, Medea smiled; but, for all her smiling face, she
 meant nothing less than to poison the poor innocent Theseus, before
 his father's eyes. And King Aegeus, like most other kings, thought any
 punishment mild enough for a person who was accused of plotting against
 his life. He therefore made little or no objection to Medea's scheme,
 and as soon as the poisonous wine was ready, gave orders that the young
 stranger should be admitted into his presence.
 
 The goblet was set on a table beside the king's throne; and a fly,
 meaning just to sip a little from the brim, immediately tumbled into
 it, dead. Observing this, Medea looked round at the nephews, and smiled
 again.
 
 When Theseus was ushered into the royal apartment, the only object that
 he seemed to behold was the white-bearded old king. There he sat on his
 magnificent throne, a dazzling crown on his head, and a scepter in
 his hand. His aspect was stately and majestic, although his years and
 infirmities weighed heavily upon him, as if each year were a lump of
 lead, and each infirmity a ponderous stone, and all were bundled up
 together, and laid upon his weary shoulders. The tears both of joy and
 sorrow sprang into the young man's eyes; for he thought how sad it was
 to see his dear father so infirm, and how sweet it would be to support
 him with his own youthful strength, and to cheer him up with the
 alacrity of his loving spirit. When a son takes a father into his warm
 heart it renews the old man's youth in a better way than by the heat
 of Medea's magic caldron. And this was what Theseus resolved to do. He
 could scarcely wait to see whether King Aegeus would recognize him, so
--**--**--
 "My son! my son!" cried King Aegeus, flinging away the fatal goblet, and
 tottering down from the throne to fall into the arms of Theseus. "Yes,
 these are Aethra's eyes. It is my son."
 
 I have quite forgotten what became of the king's nephews. But when the
 wicked Medea saw this new turn of affairs, she hurried out of the
 room, and going to her private chamber, lost no time to setting her
 enchantments to work. In a few moments, she heard a great noise of
 hissing snakes outside of the chamber window; and behold! there was her
 fiery chariot, and four huge winged serpents, wriggling and twisting in
 the air, flourishing their tails higher than the top of the palace, and
 all ready to set off on an aerial journey. Medea staid only long enough
 to take her son with her, and to steal the crown jewels, together with
 the king's best robes, and whatever other valuable things she could lay
 hands on; and getting into the chariot, she whipped up the snakes, and
 ascended high over the city.
 
 The king, hearing the hiss of the serpents, scrambled as fast as he
 could to the window, and bawled out to the abominable enchantress never
 to come back. The whole people of Athens, too, who had run out of doors
 to see this wonderful spectacle, set up a shout of joy at the prospect
 of getting rid of her. Medea, almost bursting with rage, uttered
 precisely such a hiss as one of her own snakes, only ten times more
 venomous and spiteful; and glaring fiercely out of the blaze of the
 chariot, she shook her hands over the multitude below, as if she were
 scattering a million of curses among them. In so doing, however, she
 unintentionally let fall about five hundred diamonds of the first
--**--**--
 resolution. But he assured his father that he did not intend to be eaten
 up, unresistingly, like a sheep, and that, if the Minotaur devoured him,
 it should not be without a battle for his dinner. And finally, since he
 could not help it, King Aegeus consented to let him go. So a vessel
 was got ready, and rigged with black sails; and Theseus, with six other
 young men, and seven tender and beautiful damsels, came down to the
 harbor to embark. A sorrowful multitude accompanied them to the shore.
 There was the poor old king, too, leaning on his son's arm, and looking
 as if his single heart held all the grief of Athens.
 
 Just as Prince Theseus was going on board, his father bethought himself
 of one last word to say.
 
 "My beloved son," said he, grasping the Prince's hand, "you observe that
 the sails of this vessel are black; as indeed they ought to be, since it
 goes upon a voyage of sorrow and despair. Now, being weighed down with
 infirmities, I know not whether I can survive till the vessel shall
 return. But, as long as I do live, I shall creep daily to the top of
 yonder cliff, to watch if there be a sail upon the sea. And, dearest
 Theseus, if by some happy chance, you should escape the jaws of the
 Minotaur, then tear down those dismal sails, and hoist others that shall
 be bright as the sunshine. Beholding them on the horizon, myself and
 all the people will know that you are coming back victorious, and will
 welcome you with such a festal uproar as Athens never heard before."
 
 Theseus promised that he would do so. Then going on board, the mariners
 trimmed the vessel's black sails to the wind, which blew faintly off
--**--**--
 clockwork. But just when Theseus and his companions thought the blow was
 coming, the brazen lips unclosed themselves, and the figure spoke.
 
 "Whence come you, strangers?"
 
 And when the ringing voice ceased, there was just such a reverberation
 as you may have heard within a great church bell, for a moment or two
 after the stroke of the hammer.
 
 "From Athens!" shouted the master in reply.
 
 "On what errand?" thundered the Man of Brass.
 
 And he whirled his club aloft more threateningly than ever, as if he
 were about to smite them with a thunderstroke right amidships, because
 Athens, so little while ago, had been at war with Crete.
 
 "We bring the seven youths and the seven maidens," answered the master,
 "to be devoured by the Minotaur!"
 
 "Pass!" cried the brazen giant.
 
 That one loud word rolled all about the sky, while again there was a
 booming reverberation within the figure's breast. The vessel glided
 between the headlands of the port, and the giant resumed his march. In
 a few moments, this wondrous sentinel was far away, flashing in the
 distant sunshine, and revolving with immense strides round the island of
 Crete, as it was his never-ceasing task to do.
 
 No sooner had they entered the harbor than a party of the guards of King
 Minos came down to the water side, and took charge of the fourteen young
 men and damsels. Surrounded by these armed warriors, Prince Theseus
 and his companions were led to the king's palace, and ushered into his
 presence. Now, Minos was a stern and pitiless king. If the figure that
 guarded Crete was made of brass, then the monarch, who ruled over it,
 might be thought to have a still harder metal in his breast, and might
 have been called a man of iron. He bent his shaggy brows upon the poor
--**--**--
 
 "Peace, foolish girl!" answered King Minos.
 
 "What hast thou to do with an affair like this? It is a matter of state
 policy, and therefore quite beyond thy weak comprehension. Go water thy
 flowers, and think no more of these Athenian caitiffs, whom the Minotaur
 shall as certainly eat up for breakfast as I will eat a partridge for my
 supper."
 
 So saying, the king looked cruel enough to devour Theseus and all the
 rest of the captives himself, had there been no Minotaur to save him the
 trouble. As he would hear not another word in their favor, the prisoners
 were now led away, and clapped into a dungeon, where the jailer advised
 them to go to sleep as soon as possible, because the Minotaur was in the
 habit of calling for breakfast early. The seven maidens and six of the
 young men soon sobbed themselves to slumber. But Theseus was not like
 them. He felt conscious that he was wiser, and braver, and stronger
 than his companions, and that therefore he had the responsibility of all
 their lives upon him, and must consider whether there was no way to save
 them, even in this last extremity. So he kept himself awake, and paced
 to and fro across the gloomy dungeon in which they were shut up.
 
 Just before midnight, the door was softly unbarred, and the gentle
 Ariadne showed herself, with a torch in her hand.
 
 "Are you awake, Prince Theseus?" she whispered.
 
 "Yes," answered Theseus. "With so little time to live, I do not choose
 to waste any of it in sleep."
 
 "Then follow me," said Ariadne, "and tread softly."
 
 What had become of the jailer and the guards, Theseus never knew. But,
 however that might be, Ariadne opened all the doors, and led him forth
--**--**--
 So the young man took the end of the silken string in his left hand, and
 his gold-hilted sword, ready drawn from its scabbard, in the other, and
 trod boldly into the inscrutable labyrinth. How this labyrinth was built
 is more than I can tell you. But so cunningly contrived a mizmaze was
 never seen in the world, before nor since. There can be nothing else so
 intricate, unless it were the brain of a man like Daedalus, who planned
 it, or the heart of any ordinary man; which last, to be sure, is ten
 times as great a mystery as the labyrinth of Crete. Theseus had not
 taken five steps before he lost sight of Ariadne; and in five more his
 head was growing dizzy. But still he went on, now creeping through a low
 arch, now ascending a flight of steps, now in one crooked passage and
 now in another, with here a door opening before him, and there one
 banging behind, until it really seemed as if the walls spun round, and
 whirled him round along with them. And all the while, through these
 hollow avenues, now nearer, now farther off again, resounded the cry of
 the Minotaur; and the sound was so fierce, so cruel, so ugly, so like a
 bull's roar, and withal so like a human voice, and yet like neither of
 them, that the brave heart of Theseus grew sterner and angrier at
 every step; for he felt it an insult to the moon and sky, and to our
 affectionate and simple Mother Earth, that such a monster should have
 the audacity to exist.
 
 As he passed onward, the clouds gathered over the moon, and the
 labyrinth grew so dusky that Theseus could no longer discern the
 bewilderment through which he was passing. He would have left quite
--**--**--
 "Thanks to thee, dear Ariadne," answered Theseus, "I return victorious."
 
 "Then," said Ariadne, "we must quickly summon thy friends, and get them
 and thyself on board the vessel before dawn. If morning finds thee here,
 my father will avenge the Minotaur."
 
 To make my story short, the poor captives were awakened, and, hardly
 knowing whether it was not a joyful dream, were told of what Theseus had
 done, and that they must set sail for Athens before daybreak. Hastening
 down to the vessel, they all clambered on board, except Prince Theseus,
 who lingered behind them on the strand, holding Ariadne's hand clasped
 in his own.
 
 "Dear maiden," said he, "thou wilt surely go with us. Thou art too
 gentle and sweet a child for such an iron-hearted father as King Minos.
 He cares no more for thee than a granite rock cares for the little
 flower that grows in one of its crevices. But my father, King Aegeus,
 and my dear mother, Aethra, and all the fathers and mothers in Athens,
 and all the sons and daughters too, will love and honor thee as their
 benefactress. Come with us, then; for King Minos will be very angry when
 he knows what thou hast done."
 
 Now, some low-minded people, who pretend to tell the story of Theseus
 and Ariadne, have the face to say that this royal and honorable maiden
 did really flee away, under cover of the night, with the young stranger
 whose life she had preserved. They say, too, that Prince Theseus (who
 would have died sooner than wrong the meanest creature in the world)
 ungratefully deserted Ariadne, on a solitary island, where the vessel
 touched on its voyage to Athens. But, had the noble Theseus heard these
 falsehoods, he would have served their slanderous authors as he served
--**--**--
 THE PYGMIES.
 
 A great while ago, when the world was full of wonders, there lived an
 earth-born Giant, named Antaeus, and a million or more of curious little
 earth-born people, who were called Pygmies. This Giant and these
 Pygmies being children of the same mother (that is to say, our good
 old Grandmother Earth), were all brethren, and dwelt together in a very
 friendly and affectionate manner, far, far off, in the middle of hot
 Africa. The Pygmies were so small, and there were so many sandy deserts
 and such high mountains between them and the rest of mankind, that
 nobody could get a peep at them oftener than once in a hundred years. As
 for the Giant, being of a very lofty stature, it was easy enough to see
 him, but safest to keep out of his sight.
 
 Among the Pygmies, I suppose, if one of them grew to the height of six
 or eight inches, he was reckoned a prodigiously tall man. It must have
 been very pretty to behold their little cities, with streets two or
 three feet wide, paved with the smallest pebbles, and bordered by
 habitations about as big as a squirrel's cage. The king's palace
 attained to the stupendous magnitude of Periwinkle's baby house, and
 stood in the center of a spacious square, which could hardly have been
 covered by our hearth-rug. Their principal temple, or cathedral, was as
 lofty as yonder bureau, and was looked upon as a wonderfully sublime and
 magnificent edifice. All these structures were built neither of stone
 nor wood. They were neatly plastered together by the Pygmy workmen,
 pretty much like birds' nests, out of straw, feathers, egg shells, and
 other small bits of stuff, with stiff clay instead of mortar; and when
 the hot sun had dried them, they were just as snug and comfortable as a
--**--**--
 while the lifetime of a Pygmy was but a span, this friendly intercourse
 had been going on for innumerable generations and ages. It was written
 about in the Pygmy histories, and talked about in their ancient
 traditions. The most venerable and white-bearded Pygmy had never heard
 of a time, even in his greatest of grandfathers' days, when the Giant
 was not their enormous friend. Once, to be sure (as was recorded on
 an obelisk, three feet high, erected on the place of the catastrophe),
 Antaeus sat down upon about five thousand Pygmies, who were assembled at
 a military review. But this was one of those unlucky accidents for which
 nobody is to blame; so that the small folks never took it to heart, and
 only requested the Giant to be careful forever afterwards to examine the
 acre of ground where he intended to squat himself.
 
 It is a very pleasant picture to imagine Antaeus standing among the
 Pygmies, like the spire of the tallest cathedral that ever was built,
 while they ran about like pismires at his feet; and to think that, in
 spite of their difference in size, there were affection and sympathy
 between them and him! Indeed, it has always seemed to me that the Giant
 needed the little people more than the Pygmies needed the Giant. For,
 unless they had been his neighbors and well wishers, and, as we may
 say, his playfellows, Antaeus would not have had a single friend in the
 world. No other being like himself had ever been created. No creature of
 his own size had ever talked with him, in thunder-like accents, face to
 face. When he stood with his head among the clouds, he was quite alone,
 and had been so for hundreds of years, and would be so forever. Even if
--**--**--
 first round the circle of his one great eye. It was another favorite
 feat with them to march along the bridge of his nose, and jump down upon
 his upper lip.
 
 If the truth must be told, they were sometimes as troublesome to
 the Giant as a swarm of ants or mosquitoes, especially as they had a
 fondness for mischief, and liked to prick his skin with their little
 swords and lances, to see how thick and tough it was. But Antaeus took
 it all kindly enough; although, once in a while, when he happened to be
 sleepy, he would grumble out a peevish word or two, like the muttering
 of a tempest, and ask them to have done with their nonsense. A great
 deal oftener, however, he watched their merriment and gambols until his
 huge, heavy, clumsy wits were completely stirred up by them; and then
 would he roar out such a tremendous volume of immeasurable laughter,
 that the whole nation of Pygmies had to put their hands to their ears,
 else it would certainly have deafened them.
 
 "Ho! ho! ho!" quoth the Giant, shaking his mountainous sides. "What a
 funny thing it is to be little! If I were not Antaeus, I should like to
 be a Pygmy, just for the joke's sake."
 
 The Pygmies had but one thing to trouble them in the world. They were
 constantly at war with the cranes, and had always been so, ever since
 the long-lived Giant could remember. From time to time, very terrible
 battles had been fought in which sometimes the little men won the
 victory, and sometimes the cranes. According to some historians, the
 Pygmies used to go to the battle, mounted on the backs of goats and
 rams; but such animals as these must have been far too big for Pygmies
--**--**--
 earth for whom I would take the trouble to get up."
 
 But the Pygmy looked again, and now perceived that the stranger was
 coming directly towards the prostrate form of Antaeus. With every step,
 he looked less like a blue mountain, and more like an immensely large
 man. He was soon so nigh, that there could be no possible mistake about
 the matter. There he was, with the sun flaming on his golden helmet, and
 flashing from his polished breastplate; he had a sword by his side,
 and a lion's skin over his back, and on his right shoulder he carried a
 club, which looked bulkier and heavier than the pine-tree walking stick
 of Antaeus.
 
 By this time, the whole nation of the Pygmies had seen the new wonder,
 and a million of them set up a shout all together; so that it really
 made quite an audible squeak.
 
 "Get up, Antaeus! Bestir yourself, you lazy old Giant! Here comes
 another Giant, as strong as you are, to fight with you."
 
 "Nonsense, nonsense!" growled the sleepy Giant. "I'll have my nap out,
 come who may."
 
 Still the stranger drew nearer; and now the Pygmies could plainly
 discern that, if his stature were less lofty than the Giant's, yet his
 shoulders were even broader. And, in truth, what a pair of shoulders
 they must have been! As I told you, a long while ago, they once upheld
 the sky. The Pygmies, being ten times as vivacious as their great
 numskull of a brother, could not abide the Giant's slow movements, and
 were determined to have him on his feet. So they kept shouting to him,
 and even went so far as to prick him with their swords.
 
 "Get up, get up, get up," they cried. "Up with you, lazy bones! The
--**--**--
 get three of the golden apples for King Eurystheus."
 
 "Caitiff, you shall go no farther!" bellowed Antaeus, putting on a
 grimmer look than before; for he had heard of the mighty Hercules, and
 hated him because he was said to be so strong. "Neither shall you go
 back whence you came!"
 
 "How will you prevent me," asked Hercules, "from going whither I
 please?"
 
 "By hitting you a rap with this pine tree here," shouted Antaeus,
 scowling so that he made himself the ugliest monster in Africa. "I am
 fifty times stronger than you; and now that I stamp my foot upon the
 ground, I am five hundred times stronger! I am ashamed to kill such a
 puny little dwarf as you seem to be. I will make a slave of you, and you
 shall likewise be the slave of my brethren here, the Pygmies. So throw
 down your club and your other weapons; and as for that lion's skin, I
 intend to have a pair of gloves made of it."
 
 "Come and take it off my shoulders, then," answered Hercules, lifting
 his club.
 
 Then the Giant, grinning with rage, strode tower-like towards the
 stranger (ten times strengthened at every step), and fetched a monstrous
 blow at him with his pine tree, which Hercules caught upon his club; and
 being more skilful than Antaeus, he paid him back such a rap upon the
 sconce, that down tumbled the great lumbering man-mountain, flat upon
 the ground. The poor little Pygmies (who really never dreamed that
 anybody in the world was half so strong as their brother Antaeus) were a
 good deal dismayed at this. But no sooner was the Giant down, than up
 he bounced again, with tenfold might, and such a furious visage as was
 horrible to behold. He aimed another blow at Hercules, but struck awry,
--**--**--
 than a hogshead), smote one against the other, and danced up and down
 with absolute frenzy, flourishing his immense arms about, as if he meant
 not merely to kill Hercules, but to smash the whole world to pieces.
 
 "Come on!" roared this thundering Giant. "Let me hit you but one box on
 the ear, and you'll never have the headache again."
 
 Now Hercules (though strong enough, as you already know, to hold the
 sky up) began to be sensible that he should never win the victory, if he
 kept on knocking Antaeus down; for, by and by, if he hit him such hard
 blows, the Giant would inevitably, by the help of his Mother Earth,
 become stronger than the mighty Hercules himself. So, throwing down his
 club, with which he had fought so many dreadful battles, the hero stood
 ready to receive his antagonist with naked arms.
 
 "Step forward," cried he. "Since I've broken your pine tree, we'll try
 which is the better man at a wrestling match."
 
 "Aha! then I'll soon satisfy you," shouted the Giant; for, if there was
 one thing on which he prided himself more than another, it was his skill
 in wrestling. "Villain, I'll fling you where you can never pick yourself
 up again."
 
 On came Antaeus, hopping and capering with the scorching heat of his
 rage, and getting new vigor wherewith to wreak his passion, every time
 he hopped.
 
 But Hercules, you must understand, was wiser than this numskull of a
 Giant, and had thought of a way to fight him--huge, earth-born monster
 that he was--and to conquer him too, in spite of all that his Mother
 Earth could do for him. Watching his opportunity, as the mad Giant made
 a rush at him, Hercules caught him round the middle with both hands,
--**--**--
 been offered to the majesty of our nation. Yonder lies Antaeus, our
 great friend and brother, slain, within our territory, by a miscreant
 who took him at disadvantage, and fought him (if fighting it can be
 called) in a way that neither man, nor Giant, nor Pygmy ever dreamed of
 fighting, until this hour. And, adding a grievous contumely to the wrong
 already done us, the miscreant has now fallen asleep as quietly as
 if nothing were to be dreaded from our wrath! It behooves you,
 fellow-countrymen, to consider in what aspect we shall stand before
 the world, and what will be the verdict of impartial history, should we
 suffer these accumulated outrages to go unavenged.
 
 "Antaeus was our brother, born of that same beloved parent to whom we
 owe the thews and sinews, as well as the courageous hearts, which
 made him proud of our relationship. He was our faithful ally, and fell
 fighting as much for our national rights and immunities as for his own
 personal ones. We and our forefathers have dwelt in friendship with
 him, and held affectionate intercourse as man to man, through immemorial
 generations. You remember how often our entire people have reposed in
 his great shadow, and how our little ones have played at hide-and-seek
 in the tangles of his hair, and how his mighty footsteps have familiarly
 gone to and fro among us, and never trodden upon any of our toes. And
 there lies this dear brother--this sweet and amiable friend--this brave
 and faithful ally---this virtuous Giant--this blameless and excellent
 Antaeus--dead! Dead! Silent! Powerless! A mere mountain of clay! Forgive
 my tears! Nay, I behold your own. Were we to drown the world with them,
 could the world blame us?
 
 "But to resume: Shall we, my countrymen, suffer this wicked stranger to
--**--**--
 
 "What's all this?" he cried, bewildered with sleep, and staring about
 him as if he expected to see another Giant.
 
 At that moment the twenty thousand archers twanged their bowstrings, and
 the arrows came whizzing, like so many winged mosquitoes, right into
 the face of Hercules. But I doubt whether more than half a dozen of them
 punctured the skin, which was remarkably tough, as you know the skin of
 a hero has good need to be.
 
 "Villain!" shouted all the Pygmies at once. "You have killed the Giant
 Antaeus, our great brother, and the ally of our nation. We declare
 bloody war against you, and will slay you on the spot."
 
 Surprised at the shrill piping of so many little voices, Hercules, after
 putting out the conflagration of his hair, gazed all round about, but
 could see nothing. At last, however, looking narrowly on the ground,
 he espied the innumerable assemblage of Pygmies at his feet. He stooped
 down, and taking up the nearest one between his thumb and finger, set
 him on the palm of his left hand, and held him at a proper distance for
 examination. It chanced to be the very identical Pygmy who had spoken
 from the top of the toadstool, and had offered himself as a champion to
 meet Hercules in single combat.
 
 "What in the world, my little fellow," ejaculated Hercules, "may you
 be?"
 
 "I am your enemy," answered the valiant Pygmy, in his mightiest squeak.
 "You have slain the enormous Antaeus, our brother by the mother's
 side, and for ages the faithful ally of our illustrious nation. We are
 determined to put you to death; and for my own part, I challenge you to
 instant battle, on equal ground."
 
 Hercules was so tickled with the Pygmy's big words and warlike gestures,
--**--**--
 and Cadmus, Phoenix, and Cilix set off in pursuit of it, crying out
 that it was a flower with wings. Europa, who was a little wearied with
 playing all day long, did not chase the butterfly with her brothers, but
 sat still where they had left her, and closed her eyes. For a while,
 she listened to the pleasant murmur of the sea, which was like a voice
 saying "Hush!" and bidding her go to sleep. But the pretty child, if she
 slept at all, could not have slept more than a moment, when she heard
 something trample on the grass, not far from her, and, peeping out from
 the heap of flowers, beheld a snow-white bull.
 
 And whence could this bull have com? Europa and her brothers had been
 a long time playing in the meadow, and had seen no cattle, nor other
 living thing, either there or on the neighboring hills.
 
 "Brother Cadmus!" cried Europa, starting up out of the midst of the
 roses and lilies. "Phoenix! Cilix! Where are you all? Help! Help! Come
 and drive away this bull!"
 
 But her brothers were too far off to hear; especially as the fright took
 away Europa's voice, and hindered her from calling very loudly. So there
 she stood, with her pretty mouth wide open, as pale as the white lilies
 that were twisted among the other flowers in her garlands.
 
 Nevertheless, it was the suddenness with which she had perceived the
 bull, rather than anything frightful in his appearance, that caused
 Europa so much alarm. On looking at him more attentively, she began
 to see that he was a beautiful animal, and even fancied a particularly
 amiable expression in his face. As for his breath--the breath of cattle,
 you know, is always sweet--it was as fragrant as if he had been grazing
--**--**--
 off.
 
 "Softly, pretty bull, softly!" she said, rather frightened at what she
 had done. "Do not gallop too fast."
 
 Having got the child on his back, the animal gave a leap into the air,
 and came down so like a feather that Europa did not know when his hoofs
 touched the ground. He then began a race to that part of the flowery
 plain where her three brothers were, and where they had just caught
 their splendid butterfly. Europa screamed with delight; and Phoenix,
 Cilix, and Cadmus stood gaping at the spectacle of their sister mounted
 on a white bull, not knowing whether to be frightened or to wish the
 same good luck for themselves. The gentle and innocent creature (for who
 could possibly doubt that he was so?) pranced round among the children
 as sportively as a kitten. Europa all the while looked down upon her
 brothers, nodding and laughing, but yet with a sort of stateliness in
 her rosy little face. As the bull wheeled about to take another gallop
 across the meadow, the child waved her hand, and said, "Good-bye,"
 playfully pretending that she was now bound on a distant journey, and
 might not see her brothers again for nobody could tell how long.
 
 "Good-bye," shouted Cadmus, Phoenix, and Cilix, all in one breath.
 
 But, together with her enjoyment of the sport, there was still a little
 remnant of fear in the child's heart; so that her last look at the three
 boys was a troubled one, and made them feel as if their dear sister were
 really leaving them forever. And what do you think the snowy bull
 did next? Why, he set off, as swift as the wind, straight down to the
 seashore, scampered across the sand, took an airy leap, and plunged
 right in among the foaming billows. The white spray rose in a shower
--**--**--
 and loved Europa very much; so they consented that he should accompany
 them. The whole party, therefore, set forth together. Cadmus, Phoenix,
 Cilix, and Thasus clustered round Queen Telephassa, grasping her skirts,
 and begging her to lean upon their shoulders whenever she felt weary. In
 this manner they went down the palace steps, and began a journey, which
 turned out to be a great deal longer than they dreamed of. The last that
 they saw of King Agenor, he came to the door, with a servant holding a
 torch beside him, and called after them into the gathering darkness:
 
 "Remember! Never ascend these steps again without the child!"
 
 "Never!" sobbed Queen Telephassa; and the three brothers and Thasus
 answered, "Never! Never! Never! Never!"
 
 And they kept their word. Year after year, King Agenor sat in the
 solitude of his beautiful palace, listening in vain for their returning
 footsteps, hoping to hear the familiar voice of the queen, and the
 cheerful talk of his sons and their playfellow Thasus, entering the door
 together, and the sweet, childish accents of little Europa in the midst
 of them. But so long a time went by, that, at last, if they had
 really come, the king would not have known that this was the voice of
 Telephassa, and these the younger voices that used to make such joyful
 echoes, when the children were playing about the palace. We must now
 leave King Agenor to sit on his throne, and must go along with Queen
 Telephassa, and her four youthful companions.
 
 They went on and on, and traveled a long way, and passed over mountains
 and rivers, and sailed over seas. Here, and there, and everywhere, they
 made continual inquiry if any person could tell them what had become of
 Europa. The rustic people, of whom they asked this question, paused
--**--**--
 servants to do their bidding. The four boys grew up to be tall young
 men, with sunburnt faces. Each of them girded on a sword, to defend
 themselves against the perils of the way. When the husbandmen, at whose
 farmhouses they sought hospitality, needed their assistance in the
 harvest field, they gave it willingly; and Queen Telephassa (who had
 done no work in her palace, save to braid silk threads with golden ones)
 came behind them to bind the sheaves. If payment was offered, they shook
 their heads, and only asked for tidings of Europa.
 
 "There are bulls enough in my pasture," the old farmers would reply;
 "but I never heard of one like this you tell me of. A snow-white bull
 with a little princess on his back! Ho! ho! I ask your pardon, good
 folks; but there never such a sight seen hereabouts."
 
 At last, when his upper lip began to have the down on it, Phoenix grew
 weary of rambling hither and thither to no purpose. So one day, when
 they happened to be passing through a pleasant and solitary tract of
 country, he sat himself down on a heap of moss.
 
 "I can go no farther," said Phoenix. "It is a mere foolish waste of
 life, to spend it as we do, always wandering up and down, and never
 coming to any home at nightfall. Our sister is lost, and never will be
 found. She probably perished in the sea; or, to whatever shore the white
 bull may have carried her, it is now so many years ago, that there would
 be neither love nor acquaintance between us, should we meet again. My
 father has forbidden us to return to his palace, so I shall build me a
 hut of branches, and dwell here."
 
 "Well, son Phoenix," said Telephassa, sorrowfully, "you have grown to be
--**--**--
 and calling herself Europa, his subjects should treat her with the
 greatest kindness and respect, and immediately bring her to the palace.
 You may see, by this, that Phoenix's conscience never quite ceased to
 trouble him, for giving up the quest of his dear sister, and sitting
 himself down to be comfortable, while his mother and her companions went
 onward.
 
 But often and often, at the close of a weary day's journey, did
 Telephassa and Cadmus, Cilix, and Thasus, remember the pleasant spot
 in which they had left Phoenix. It was a sorrowful prospect for these
 wanderers, that on the morrow they must again set forth, and that, after
 many nightfalls, they would perhaps be no nearer the close of their
 toilsome pilgrimage than now. These thoughts made them all melancholy at
 times, but appeared to torment Cilix more than the rest of the party. At
 length, one morning, when they were taking their staffs in hand to set
 out, he thus addressed them:
 
 "My dear mother, and you, good brother Cadmus, and my friend Thasus,
 methinks we are like people in a dream. There is no substance in the
 life which we are leading. It is such a dreary length of time since the
 white bull carried off my sister Europa, that I have quite forgotten
 how she looked, and the tones of her voice, and, indeed, almost doubt
 whether such a little girl ever lived in the world. And whether she
 once lived or no, I am convinced that she no longer survives, and that
 therefore it is the merest folly to waste our own lives and happiness
 in seeking her. Were we to find her, she would now be a woman grown, and
 would look upon us all as strangers. So, to tell you the truth, I have
--**--**--
 
 Before setting out, Cadmus helped Thasus build a bower; while
 Telephassa, being too infirm to give any great assistance, advised them
 how to fit it up and furnish it, so that it might be as comfortable as
 a hut of branches could. Thasus, however, did not spend all his days in
 this green bower. For it happened to him, as to Phoenix and Cilix,
 that other homeless people visited the spot, and liked it, and built
 themselves habitations in the neighborhood. So here, in the course of a
 few years, was another thriving city, with a red freestone palace in
 the center of it, where Thasus sat upon a throne, doing justice to the
 people, with a purple robe over his shoulders, a sceptre in his hand,
 and a crown upon his head. The inhabitants had made him king, not for
 the sake of any royal blood (for none was in his veins), but because
 Thasus was an upright, true-hearted, and courageous man, and therefore
 fit to rule.
 
 But when the affairs of his kingdom were all settled, King Thasus laid
 aside his purple robe and crown, and sceptre, and bade his worthiest
 subjects distribute justice to the people in his stead. Then, grasping
 the pilgrim's staff that had supported him so long, he set forth again,
 hoping still to discover some hoof-mark of the snow-white bull, some
 trace of the vanished child. He returned after a lengthened absence, and
 sat down wearily upon his throne. To his latest hour, nevertheless, King
 Thasus showed his true-hearted remembrance of Europa, by ordering that
 a fire should always be kept burning in his palace, and a bath steaming
 hot, and food ready to be served up, and a bed with snow-white sheets,
 in case the maiden should arrive, and require immediate refreshment.
--**--**--
 convinced that, at her very first step into the better world, she had
 caught Europa in her arms. He planted some flowers on his mother's
 grave, and left them to grow there, and make the place beautiful, when
 he should be far away.
 
 After performing this last sorrowful duty, he set forth alone, and took
 the road towards the famous oracle of Delphi, as Telephassa had advised
 him. On his way thither, he still inquired of most people whom he met
 whether they had seen Europa; for, to say the truth, Cadmus had grown so
 accustomed to ask the question, that it came to his lips as readily as a
 remark about the weather. He received various answers. Some told him one
 thing, and some another. Among the rest, a mariner affirmed, that, many
 years before, in a distant country, he had heard a rumor about a white
 bull, which came swimming across the sea with a child on his back,
 dressed up in flowers that were blighted by the sea water. He did not
 know what had become of the child or the bull; and Cadmus suspected,
 indeed, by a queer twinkle in the mariner's eyes, that he was putting a
 joke upon him, and had never really heard anything about the matter.
 
 Poor Cadmus found it more wearisome to travel alone than to bear all
 his dear mother's weight, while she had kept him company. His heart, you
 will understand, was now so heavy that it seemed impossible, sometimes,
 to carry it any farther. But his limbs were strong and active, and well
 accustomed to exercise. He walked swiftly along, thinking of King Agenor
 and Queen Telephassa, and his brothers, and the friendly Thasus, all of
 whom he had left behind him, at one point of his pilgrimage or another,
--**--**--
 them (especially as he could not imagine what cow it was, or why he was
 to follow her), the gusty hole gave vent to another sentence.
 
 "Where the stray cow lies down, there is your home."
 
 These words were pronounced but a single time, and died away into
 a whisper before Cadmus was fully satisfied that he had caught the
 meaning. He put other questions, but received no answer; only the gust
 of wind sighed continually out of the cavity, and blew the withered
 leaves rustling along the ground before it.
 
 "Did there really come any words out of the hole?" thought Cadmus; "or
 have I been dreaming all this while?"
 
 He turned away from the oracle, and thought himself no wiser than when
 he came thither. Caring little what might happen to him, he took the
 first path that offered itself, and went along at a sluggish pace;
 for, having no object in view, nor any reason to go one way more than
 another, it would certainly have been foolish to make haste. Whenever he
 met anybody, the old question was at his tongue's end.
 
 "Have you seen a beautiful maiden, dressed like a king's daughter, and
 mounted on a snow-white bull, that gallops as swiftly as the wind?"
 
 But, remembering what the oracle had said, he only half uttered the
 words, and then mumbled the rest indistinctly; and from his confusion,
 people must have imagined that this handsome young man had lost his
 wits.
 
 I know not how far Cadmus had gone, nor could he himself have told you,
 when at no great distance before him, he beheld a brindled cow. She was
 lying down by the wayside, and quietly chewing her cud; nor did she take
 any notice of the young man until he had approached pretty nigh. Then,
--**--**--
 
 He had now grown too intent on following her to think of lagging behind,
 however long the way, and whatever might be his fatigue. Indeed, it
 seemed as if there were something about the animal that bewitched
 people. Several persons who happened to see the brindled cow, and Cadmus
 following behind, began to trudge after her, precisely as he did. Cadmus
 was glad of somebody to converse with, and therefore talked very freely
 to these good people. He told them all his adventures, and how he had
 left King Agenor in his palace, and Phoenix at one place, and Cilix at
 another, and Thasus at a third, and his dear mother, Queen Telephassa,
 under a flowery sod; so that now he was quite alone, both friendless
 and homeless. He mentioned, likewise, that the oracle had bidden him
 be guided by a cow, and inquired of the strangers whether they supposed
 that this brindled animal could be the one.
 
 "Why, 'tis a very wonderful affair," answered one of his new companions.
 "I am pretty well acquainted with the ways of cattle, and I never knew
 a cow, of her own accord, to go so far without stopping. If my legs will
 let me, I'll never leave following the beast till she lies down."
 
 "Nor I!" said a second.
 
 "Nor I!" cried a third. "If she goes a hundred miles farther, I am
 determined to see the end of it."
 
 The secret of it was, you must know, that the cow was an enchanted cow,
 and that, without their being conscious of it, she threw some of her
 enchantment over everybody that took so much as half a dozen steps
 behind her. They could not possibly help following her, though all the
 time they fancied themselves doing it of their own accord. The cow was
--**--**--
 seemed as if all the weariness of his pilgrimage, ever since he left
 King Agenor's palace, had fallen upon him at once. But his new friends
 had not long been gone, when he was suddenly startled by cries, shouts,
 and screams, and the noise of a terrible struggle, and in the midst of
 it all, a most awful hissing, which went right through his ears like a
 rough saw.
 
 Running towards the tuft of trees, he beheld the head and fiery eyes of
 an immense serpent or dragon, with the widest jaws that ever a dragon
 had, and a vast many rows of horribly sharp teeth. Before Cadmus could
 reach the spot, this pitiless reptile had killed his poor companions,
 and was busily devouring them, making but a mouthful of each man.
 
 It appears that the fountain of water was enchanted, and that the dragon
 had been set to guard it, so that no mortal might ever quench his thirst
 there. As the neighboring inhabitants carefully avoided the spot, it was
 now a long time (not less than a hundred years or thereabouts) since the
 monster had broken his fast; and, as was natural enough, his appetite
 had grown to be enormous, and was not half satisfied by the poor people
 whom he had just eaten up. When he caught sight of Cadmus, therefore, he
 set up another abominable hiss, and flung back his immense jaws, until
 his mouth looked like a great red cavern, at the farther end of which
 were seen the legs of his last victim, whom he had hardly had time to
 swallow.
 
 But Cadmus was so enraged at the destruction of his friends that he
 cared neither for the size of the dragon's jaws nor for his hundreds
 of sharp teeth. Drawing his sword, he rushed at the monster, and flung
--**--**--
 already exhausted with killing the dragon and knocking his head to
 pieces, and had nothing to dig the earth with, that I know of, unless
 it were his sword blade. Finally, however, a sufficiently large tract of
 ground was turned up, and sown with this new kind of seed; although half
 of the dragon's teeth still remained to be planted some other day.
 
 Cadmus, quite out of breath, stood leaning upon his sword, and wondering
 what was to happen next. He had waited but a few moments, when he began
 to see a sight, which was as great a marvel as the most marvelous thing
 I ever told you about.
 
 The sun was shining slantwise over the field, and showed all the moist,
 dark soil just like any other newly-planted piece of ground. All at
 once, Cadmus fancied he saw something glisten very brightly, first at
 one spot, then at another, and then at a hundred and a thousand spots
 together. Soon he perceived them to be the steel heads of spears,
 sprouting up everywhere like so many stalks of grain, and continually
 growing taller and taller. Next appeared a vast number of bright sword
 blades, thrusting themselves up in the same way. A moment afterwards,
 the whole surface of the ground was broken by a multitude of polished
 brass helmets, coming up like a crop of enormous beans. So rapidly did
 they grow, that Cadmus now discerned the fierce countenance of a
 man beneath every one. In short, before he had time to think what a
 wonderful affair it was, he beheld an abundant harvest of what looked
 like human beings, armed with helmets and breastplates, shields, swords,
 and spears; and before they were well out of the earth, they brandished
 their weapons, and clashed them one against another, seeming to think,
--**--**--
 be considered, too, that the dragon people were made for nothing else;
 whereas other mortals were born to love and help one another.
 
 Well, this memorable battle continued to rage until the ground was
 strewn with helmeted heads that had been cut off. Of all the thousands
 that began the fight, there were only five left standing. These now
 rushed from different parts of the field, and, meeting in the middle of
 it, clashed their swords, and struck at each other's hearts as fiercely
 as ever.
 
 "Cadmus," said the voice again, "bid those five warriors sheathe their
 swords. They will help you to build the city."
 
 Without hesitating an instant, Cadmus stepped forward, with the aspect
 of a king and a leader, and extending his drawn sword amongst them,
 spoke to the warriors in a stern and commanding voice.
 
 "Sheathe your weapons!" said he.
 
 And forthwith, feeling themselves bound to obey him, the five remaining
 sons of the dragon's teeth made him a military salute with their swords,
 returned them to the scabbards, and stood before Cadmus in a rank,
 eyeing him as soldiers eye their captain, while awaiting the word of
 command.
 
 These five men had probably sprung from the biggest of the dragon's
 teeth, and were the boldest and strongest of the whole army. They were
 almost giants indeed, and had good need to be so, else they never could
 have lived through so terrible a fight. They still had a very furious
 look, and, if Cadmus happened to glance aside, would glare at one
 another, with fire flashing out of their eyes. It was strange, too,
 to observe how the earth, out of which they had so lately grown, was
 incrusted, here and there, on their bright breastplates, and even,
 begrimed their faces; just as you may have seen it clinging to beets
--**--**--
 least the foundation of the edifice laid before nightfall. But, when
 Cadmus arose, and took his way towards the site where the palace was
 to be built, followed by his five sturdy workmen marching all in a row,
 what do you think he saw?
 
 What should it be but the most magnificent palace that had ever been
 seen in the world. It was built of marble and other beautiful kinds of
 stone, and rose high into the air, with a splendid dome and a portico
 along the front, and carved pillars, and everything else that befitted
 the habitation of a mighty king. It had grown up out of the earth in
 almost as short a time as it had taken the armed host to spring from the
 dragon's teeth; and what made the matter more strange, no seed of this
 stately edifice ever had been planted.
 
 When the five workmen beheld the dome, with the morning sunshine making
 it look golden and glorious, they gave a great shout.
 
 "Long live King Cadmus," they cried, "in his beautiful palace."
 
 And the new king, with his five faithful followers at his heels,
 shouldering their pickaxes and marching in a rank (for they still had a
 soldier-like sort of behavior, as their nature was), ascended the palace
 steps. Halting at the entrance, they gazed through a long vista of
 lofty pillars, that were ranged from end to end of a great hall. At the
 farther extremity of this hall, approaching slowly towards him, Cadmus
 beheld a female figure, wonderfully beautiful, and adorned with a royal
 robe, and a crown of diamonds over her golden ringlets, and the richest
 necklace that ever a queen wore. His heart thrilled with delight. He
 fancied it his long-lost sister Europa, now grown to womanhood, coming
 to make him happy, and to repay him with her sweet sisterly affection,
--**--**--
 many dangers from giants, and one-eyed Cyclops, and monsters of the sea
 and land, that he could not help dreading some mischief, even in this
 pleasant and seemingly solitary spot. For two days, therefore, the poor
 weather-worn voyagers kept quiet, and either staid on board of their
 vessel, or merely crept along under the cliffs that bordered the shore;
 and to keep themselves alive, they dug shellfish out of the sand, and
 sought for any little rill of fresh water that might be running towards
 the sea.
 
 Before the two days were spent, they grew very weary of this kind of
 life; for the followers of King Ulysses, as you will find it important
 to remember, were terrible gormandizers, and pretty sure to grumble
 if they missed their regulars meals, and their irregular ones besides.
 Their stock of provisions was quite exhausted, and even the shellfish
 began to get scarce, so that they had now to choose between starving to
 death or venturing into the interior of the island, where perhaps some
 huge three-headed dragon, or other horrible monster, had his den. Such
 misshapen creatures were very numerous in those days; and nobody ever
 expected to make a voyage, or take a journey, without running more or
 less risk of being devoured by them.
 
 But King Ulysses was a bold man as well as a prudent one; and on the
 third morning he determined to discover what sort of a place the island
 was, and whether it were possible to obtain a supply of food for the
 hungry mouths of his companions. So, taking a spear in his hand, he
 clambered to the summit of a cliff, and gazed round about him. At a
 distance, towards the center of the island, he beheld the stately towers
 of what seemed to be a palace, built of snow-white marble, and rising in
--**--**--
 And he was ready to listen attentively to whatever the bird might
 communicate; for, at the siege of Troy, and elsewhere, he had known such
 odd things to happen, that he would not have considered it much out of
 the common run had this little feathered creature talked as plainly as
 himself.
 
 "Peep!" said the bird, "peep, peep, pe--weep!" And nothing else would it
 say, but only, "Peep, peep, pe--weep!" in a melancholy cadence, and over
 and over and over again. As often as Ulysses moved forward, however, the
 bird showed the greatest alarm, and did its best to drive him back, with
 the anxious flutter of its purple wings. Its unaccountable behavior made
 him conclude, at last, that the bird knew of some danger that awaited
 him, and which must needs be very terrible, beyond all question, since
 it moved even a little fowl to feel compassion for a human being. So
 he resolved, for the present, to return to the vessel, and tell his
 companions what he had seen.
 
 This appeared to satisfy the bird. As soon as Ulysses turned back, it
 ran up the trunk of a tree, and began to pick insects out of the bark
 with its long, sharp bill; for it was a kind of woodpecker, you must
 know, and had to get its living in the same manner as other birds of
 that species. But every little while, as it pecked at the bark of
 the tree, the purple bird bethought itself of some secret sorrow, and
 repeated its plaintive note of "Peep, peep, pe--weep!"
 
 On his way to the shore, Ulysses had the good luck to kill a large stag
 by thrusting his spear into his back. Taking it on his shoulders (for he
 was a remarkably strong man), he lugged it along with him, and flung
--**--**--
 
 "Either way," murmured some of the hungriest of the crew; "it will be
 better than starvation; particularly if one could be sure of being well
 fattened beforehand, and daintily cooked afterwards."
 
 "That is a matter of taste," said King Ulysses, "and, for my own part,
 neither the most careful fattening nor the daintiest of cookery would
 reconcile me to being dished at last. My proposal is, therefore, that we
 divide ourselves into two equal parties, and ascertain, by drawing
 lots, which of the two shall go to the palace, and beg for food and
 assistance. If these can be obtained, all is well. If not, and if the
 inhabitants prove as inhospitable as Polyphemus, or the Laestrygons,
 then there will but half of us perish, and the remainder may set sail
 and escape."
 
 As nobody objected to this scheme, Ulysses proceeded to count the whole
 band, and found that there were forty-six men, including himself. He
 then numbered off twenty-two of them, and put Eurylochus (who was one
 of his chief officers, and second only to himself in sagacity) at their
 head. Ulysses took command of the remaining twenty-two men, in person.
 Then, taking off his helmet, he put two shells into it, on one of which
 was written, "Go," and on the other "Stay." Another person now held the
 helmet, while Ulysses and Eurylochus drew out each a shell; and the
 word "Go" was found written on that which Eurylochus had drawn. In
 this manner, it was decided that Ulysses and his twenty-two men were to
 remain at the seaside until the other party should have found out what
 sort of treatment they might expect at the mysterious palace. As there
 was no help for it, Eurylochus immediately set forth at the head of his
 twenty-two followers, who went off in a very melancholy state of mind,
--**--**--
 almost brushed his face with its wings.
 
 "Peep, peep, pe--weep!" chirped the bird.
 
 So plaintively intelligent was the sound, that it seemed as if the
 little creature were going to break its heart with some mighty secret
 that it had to tell, and only this one poor note to tell it with.
 
 "My pretty bird," said Eurylochus--for he was a wary person, and let no
 token of harm escape his notice--"my pretty bird, who sent you hither?
 And what is the message which you bring?"
 
 "Peep, peep, pe--weep!" replied the bird, very sorrowfully.
 
 Then it flew towards the edge of the cliff, and looked around at them,
 as if exceedingly anxious that they should return whence they came.
 Eurylochus and a few of the others were inclined to turn back. They
 could not help suspecting that the purple bird must be aware of
 something mischievous that would befall them at the palace, and the
 knowledge of which affected its airy spirit with a human sympathy and
 sorrow. But the rest of the voyagers, snuffing up the smoke from the
 palace kitchen, ridiculed the idea of returning to the vessel. One of
 them (more brutal than his fellows, and the most notorious gormandizer
 in the crew) said such a cruel and wicked thing, that I wonder the mere
 thought did not turn him into a wild beast, in shape, as he already was
 in his nature.
 
 "This troublesome and impertinent little fowl," said he, "would make
 a delicate titbit to begin dinner with. Just one plump morsel, melting
 away between the teeth. If he comes within my reach, I'll catch him, and
 give him to the palace cook to be roasted on a skewer."
 
 The words were hardly out of his mouth, before the purple bird flew
 away, crying, "Peep, peep, pe--weep," more dolorously than ever.
--**--**--
 "It has a twang of the wine cask in it," said one, smacking his lips.
 
 "Make haste!" cried his fellows: "we'll find the wine cask itself at the
 palace, and that will be better than a hundred crystal fountains."
 
 Then they quickened their pace, and capered for joy at the thought of
 the savory banquet at which they hoped to be guests. But Eurylochus told
 them that he felt as if he were walking in a dream.
 
 "If I am really awake," continued he, "then, in my opinion, we are on
 the point of meeting with some stranger adventure than any that
 befell us in the cave of Polyphemus, or among the gigantic man-eating
 Laestrygons, or in the windy palace of King Aeolus, which stands on a
 brazen-walled island. This kind of dreamy feeling always comes over me
 before any wonderful occurrence. If you take my advice, you will turn
 back."
 
 "No, no," answered his comrades, snuffing the air, in which the scent
 from the palace kitchen was now very perceptible. "We would not turn
 back, though we were certain that the king of the Laestrygons, as big as
 a mountain, would sit at the head of the table, and huge Polyphemus, the
 one-eyed Cyclops, at its foot."
 
 At length they came within full sight of the palace, which proved to
 be very large and lofty, with a great number of airy pinnacles upon its
 roof. Though it was midday, and the sun shone brightly over the marble
 front, yet its snowy whiteness, and its fantastic style of architecture,
 made it look unreal, like the frost work on a window pane, or like the
 shapes of castles which one sees among the clouds by moonlight. But,
 just then, a puff of wind brought down the smoke of the kitchen chimney
--**--**--
 frisking about them, and doing no manner of harm; although, as they
 mounted the steps of the palace, you might possibly have heard a low
 growl, particularly from the wolves; as if they thought it a pity, after
 all, to let the strangers pass without so much as tasting what they were
 made of.
 
 Eurylochus and his followers now passed under a lofty portal, and looked
 through the open doorway into the interior of the palace. The first
 thing that they saw was a spacious hall, and a fountain in the middle
 of it, gushing up towards the ceiling out of a marble basin, and falling
 back into it with a continual plash. The water of this fountain, as it
 spouted upward, was constantly taking new shapes, not very distinctly,
 but plainly enough for a nimble fancy to recognize what they were. Now
 it was the shape of a man in a long robe, the fleecy whiteness of which
 was made out of the fountain's spray; now it was a lion, or a tiger, or
 a wolf, or an ass, or, as often as anything else, a hog, wallowing in
 the marble basin as if it were his sty. It was either magic or some very
 curious machinery that caused the gushing waterspout to assume all
 these forms. But, before the strangers had time to look closely at
 this wonderful sight, their attention was drawn off by a very sweet and
 agreeable sound. A woman's voice was singing melodiously in another room
 of the palace, and with her voice was mingled the noise of a loom, at
 which she was probably seated, weaving a rich texture of cloth, and
 intertwining the high and low sweetness of her voice into a rich tissue
 of harmony.
 
 By and by, the song came to an end; and then, all at once, there were
--**--**--
 
 The folding doors swung quickly back, and left him standing behind the
 pillar, in the solitude of the outer hall. There Eurylochus waited until
 he was quite weary, and listened eagerly to every sound, but without
 hearing anything that could help him to guess what had become of his
 friends. Footsteps, it is true, seemed to be passing and repassing, in
 other parts of the palace. Then there was a clatter of silver dishes,
 or golden ones, which made him imagine a rich feast in a splendid
 banqueting hall. But by and by he heard a tremendous grunting and
 squealing, and then a sudden scampering, like that of small, hard hoofs
 over a marble floor, while the voices of the mistress and her four
 handmaidens were screaming all together, in tones of anger and derision.
 Eurylochus could not conceive what had happened, unless a drove of
 swine had broken into the palace, attracted by the smell of the feast.
 Chancing to cast his eyes at the fountain, he saw that it did not shift
 its shape, as formerly, nor looked either like a long-robed man, or
 a lion, a tiger, a wolf, or an ass. It looked like nothing but a hog,
 which lay wallowing in the marble basin, and filled it from brim to
 brim.
 
 But we must leave the prudent Eurylochus waiting in the outer hall, and
 follow his friends into the inner secrecy of the palace. As soon as the
 beautiful woman saw them, she arose from the loom, as I have told you,
 and came forward, smiling, and stretching out her hand. She took the
 hand of the foremost among them, and bade him and the whole party
 welcome.
 
 "You have been long expected, my good friends," said she. "I and my
 maidens are well acquainted with you, although you do not appear to
--**--**--
 "Here is an odd kind of spice in this dish," said one. "I can't say it
 quite suits my palate. Down it goes, however."
 
 "Send a good draught of wine down your throat," said his comrade on
 the next throne. "That is the stuff to make this sort of cookery relish
 well. Though I must needs say, the wine has a queer taste too. But the
 more I drink of it, the better I like the flavor."
 
 Whatever little fault they might find with the dishes, they sat at
 dinner a prodigiously long while; and it would really have made you
 ashamed to see how they swilled down the liquor and gobbled up the food.
 They sat on golden thrones, to be sure; but they behaved like pigs in a
 sty; and, if they had had their wits about them, they might have guessed
 that this was the opinion of their beautiful hostess and her maidens. It
 brings a blush into my face to reckon up, in my own mind, what mountains
 of meat and pudding, and what gallons of wine, these two and twenty
 guzzlers and gormandizers ate and drank. They forgot all about their
 homes, and their wives and children, and all about Ulysses, and
 everything else, except this banquet, at which they wanted to keep
 feasting forever. But at length they began to give over, from mere
 incapacity to hold any more.
 
 "That last bit of fat is too much for me," said one.
 
 "And I have not room for another morsel," said his next neighbor,
 heaving a sigh. "What a pity! My appetite is as sharp as ever."
 
 In short, they all left off eating, and leaned back on their thrones,
 with such a stupid and helpless aspect as made them ridiculous to
 behold. When their hostess saw this, she laughed aloud; so did her four
--**--**--
 they had! what little red eyes, half buried in fat! and what long
 snouts, instead of Grecian noses!
 
 But brutes as they certainly were, they yet had enough of human nature
 in them to be shocked at their own hideousness; and still intending to
 groan, they uttered a viler grunt and squeal than before. So harsh and
 ear-piercing it was, that you would have fancied a butcher was sticking
 his knife into each of their throats, or, at the very least, that
 somebody was pulling every hog by his funny little twist of a tail.
 
 "Begone to your sty!" cried the enchantress, giving them some smart
 strokes with her wand; and then she turned to the serving men--"Drive
 out these swine, and throw down some acorns for them to eat."
 
 The door of the saloon being flung open, the drove of hogs ran in
 all directions save the right one, in accordance with their hoggish
 perversity, but were finally driven into the back yard of the palace. It
 was a sight to bring tears into one's eyes (and I hope none of you will
 be cruel enough to laugh at it), to see the poor creatures go snuffing
 along, picking up here a cabbage leaf and there a turnip top, and
 rooting their noses in the earth for whatever they could find. In their
 sty, moreover, they behaved more piggishly than the pigs that had been
 born so; for they bit and snorted at one another, put their feet in the
 trough, and gobbled up their victuals in a ridiculous hurry; and, when
 there was nothing more to be had, they made a great pile of themselves
 among some unclean straw, and fell fast asleep. If they had any human
 reason left, it was just enough to keep them wondering when they should
--**--**--
 "That little bird, which met me at the edge of the cliff," exclaimed
 Ulysses; "was he a human being once?"
 
 "Yes," answered Quicksilver. "He was once a king, named Picus, and a
 pretty good sort of a king, too, only rather too proud of his purple
 robe, and his crown, and the golden chain about his neck; so he was
 forced to take the shape of a gaudy-feathered bird. The lions, and
 wolves, and tigers, who will come running to meet you, in front of
 the palace, were formerly fierce and cruel men, resembling in their
 disposition the wild beasts whose forms they now rightfully wear."
 
 "And my poor companions," said Ulysses. "Have they undergone a similar
 change, through the arts of this wicked Circe?"
 
 "You well know what gormandizers they were," replied Quicksilver; and
 rogue that he was, he could not help laughing at the joke. "So you will
 not be surprised to hear that they have all taken the shapes of swine!
 If Circe had never done anything worse, I really should not think her so
 very much to blame."
 
 "But can I do nothing to help them?" inquired Ulysses.
 
 "It will require all your wisdom," said Quicksilver, "and a little of my
 own into the bargain, to keep your royal and sagacious self from being
 transformed into a fox. But do as I bid you; and the matter may end
 better than it has begun."
 
 While he was speaking, Quicksilver seemed to be in search of something;
 he went stooping along the ground, and soon laid his hand on a little
 plant with a snow-white flower, which he plucked and smelt of. Ulysses
 had been looking at that very spot only just before; and it appeared
 to him that the plant had burst into full flower the instant when
--**--**--
 as the beautiful enchantress was called (who had deluded so many persons
 that she did not doubt of being able to delude Ulysses, not imagining
 how wise he was), again addressed him:
 
 "Your companions," said she, "have already been received into my palace,
 and have enjoyed the hospitable treatment to which the propriety of
 their behavior so well entitles them. If such be your pleasure, you
 shall first take some refreshment, and then join them in the elegant
 apartment which they now occupy. See, I and my maidens have been weaving
 their figures into this piece of tapestry."
 
 She pointed to the web of beautifully-woven cloth in the loom. Circe and
 the four nymphs must have been very diligently at work since the
 arrival of the mariners; for a great many yards of tapestry had now
 been wrought, in addition to what I before described. In this new
 part, Ulysses saw his two and twenty friends represented as sitting on
 cushions and canopied thrones, greedily devouring dainties, and quaffing
 deep draughts of wine. The work had not yet gone any further. O, no,
 indeed. The enchantress was far too cunning to let Ulysses see the
 mischief which her magic arts had since brought upon the gormandizers.
 
 "As for yourself, valiant sir," said Circe, "judging by the dignity of
 your aspect, I take you to be nothing less than a king. Deign to follow
 me, and you shall be treated as befits your rank."
 
 So Ulysses followed her into the oval saloon, where his two and twenty
 comrades had devoured the banquet, which ended so disastrously for
 themselves. But, all this while, he had held the snow-white flower in
 his hand, and had constantly smelt of it while Circe was speaking; and
 as he crossed the threshold of the saloon, he took good care to inhale
--**--**--
 "It is the wholesomest juice that ever was squeezed out of the grape,"
 said she; "for, instead of disguising a man, as other liquor is apt to
 do, it brings him to his true self, and shows him as he ought to be."
 
 The chief butler liked nothing better than to see people turned into
 swine, or making any kind of a beast of themselves; so he made haste
 to bring the royal goblet, filled with a liquid as bright as gold, and
 which kept sparkling upward, and throwing a sunny spray over the brim.
 But, delightfully as the wine looked, it was mingled with the most
 potent enchantments that Circe knew how to concoct. For every drop of
 the pure grape juice there were two drops of the pure mischief; and the
 danger of the thing was, that the mischief made it taste all the better.
 The mere smell of the bubbles, which effervesced at the brim, was enough
 to turn a man's beard into pig's bristles, or make a lion's claws grow
 out of his fingers, or a fox's brush behind him.
 
 "Drink, my noble guest," said Circe, smiling, as she presented him
 with the goblet. "You will find in this draught a solace for all your
 troubles."
 
 King Ulysses took the goblet with his right hand, while with his left he
 held the snow-white flower to his nostrils, and drew in so long a breath
 that his lungs were quite filled with its pure and simple fragrance.
 Then, drinking off all the wine, he looked the enchantress calmly in the
 face.
 
 "Wretch," cried Circe, giving him a smart stroke with her wand, "how
 dare you keep your human shape a moment longer! Take the form of the
 brute whom you most resemble. If a hog, go join your fellow-swine in
--**--**--
 scrambled and fought for the prize, as if they had tasted not so much as
 a noggin of sour milk for a twelvemonth.
 
 "These must certainly be my comrades," said Ulysses. "I recognize their
 dispositions. They are hardly worth the trouble of changing them into
 the human form again. Nevertheless, we will have it done, lest their
 bad example should corrupt the other hogs. Let them take their original
 shapes, therefore, Dame Circe, if your skill is equal to the task. It
 will require greater magic, I trow, than it did to make swine of them."
 
 So Circe waved her wand again, and repeated a few magic words, at the
 sound of which the two and twenty hogs pricked up their pendulous ears.
 It was a wonder to behold how their snouts grew shorter and shorter, and
 their mouths (which they seemed to be sorry for, because they could not
 gobble so expeditiously) smaller and smaller, and how one and another
 began to stand upon his hind legs, and scratch his nose with his fore
 trotters. At first the spectators hardly knew whether to call them hogs
 or men, but by and by came to the conclusion that they rather resembled
 the latter. Finally, there stood the twenty-two comrades of Ulysses,
 looking pretty much the same as when they left the vessel.
 
 You must not imagine, however, that the swinish quality had entirely
 gone out of them. When once it fastens itself into a person's character,
 it is very difficult getting rid of it. This was proved by the
 hamadryad, who, being exceedingly fond of mischief, threw another
 handful of acorns before the twenty-two newly-restored people; whereupon
 down they wallowed in a moment, and gobbled them up in a very shameful
 way. Then, recollecting themselves, they scrambled to their feet, and
--**--**--
 crown upon his head. He and King Ulysses exchanged with one another
 the courtesies which belong to their elevated rank. But from that time
 forth, King Picus was no longer proud of his crown and his trappings of
 royalty, nor of the fact of his being a king; he felt himself merely the
 upper servant of his people, and that it must be his life-long labor to
 make them better and happier.
 
 As for the lions, tigers, and wolves (though Circe would have restored
 them to their former shapes at his slightest word), Ulysses thought
 it advisable that they should remain as they now were, and thus give
 warning of their cruel dispositions, instead of going about under the
 guise of men, and pretending to human sympathies, while their hearts
 had the blood-thirstiness of wild beasts. So he let them howl as much as
 they liked, but never troubled his head about them. And, when everything
 was settled according to his pleasure, he sent to summon the remainder
 of his comrades, whom he had left at the sea-shore. These being arrived,
 with the prudent Eurylochus at their head, they all made themselves
 comfortable in Circe's enchanted palace, until quite rested and
 refreshed from the toils and hardships of their voyage.
 
 
 
 
 THE POMEGRANATE SEEDS.
 
 Mother Ceres was exceedingly fond of her daughter Proserpina, and seldom
 let her go alone into the fields. But, just at the time when my story
 begins, the good lady was very busy, because she had the care of the
 wheat, and the Indian corn, and the rye and barley and, in short, of the
 crops of every kind, all over the earth; and as the season had thus far
 been uncommonly backward, it was necessary to make the harvest ripen
 more speedily than usual. So she put on her turban, made of poppies (a
--**--**--
 sit with them on the moist sands, all twining wreaths together. But,
 a little farther on, what should she behold? It was a large shrub,
 completely covered with the most magnificent flowers in the world.
 
 "The darlings!" cried Proserpina; and then she thought to herself, "I
 was looking at that spot only a moment ago. How strange it is that I did
 not see the flowers!"
 
 The nearer she approached the shrub, the more attractive it looked,
 until she came quite close to it; and then, although its beauty was
 richer than words can tell, she hardly knew whether to like it or not.
 It bore above a hundred flowers of the most brilliant hues, and each
 different from the others, but all having a kind of resemblance among
 themselves, which showed them to be sister blossoms. But there was a
 deep, glossy luster on the leaves of the shrub, and on the petals of the
 flowers, that made Proserpina doubt whether they might not be poisonous.
 To tell you the truth, foolish as it may seem, she was half inclined to
 turn round and run away.
 
 "What a silly child I am!" thought she, taking courage. "It is really
 the most beautiful shrub that ever sprang out of the earth. I will
 pull it up by the roots, and carry it home, and plant it in my mother's
 garden."
 
 Holding up her apron full of flowers with her left hand, Proserpina
 seized the large shrub with the other, and pulled, and pulled, but was
 hardly able to loosen the soil about its roots. What a deep-rooted plant
 it was! Again the girl pulled with all her might, and observed that the
 earth began to stir and crack to some distance around the stem. She gave
 another pull, but relaxed her hold, fancying that there was a rumbling
--**--**--
 mother.
 
 "Mother, Mother Ceres!" cried she, all in a tremble. "Come quickly and
 save me."
 
 But her voice was too faint for her mother to hear. Indeed, it is most
 probable that Ceres was then a thousand miles off, making the corn
 grow in some far distant country. Nor could it have availed her poor
 daughter, even had she been within hearing; for no sooner did Proserpina
 begin to cry out, than the stranger leaped to the ground, caught the
 child in his arms, and again mounted the chariot, shook the reins, and
 shouted to the four black horses to set off. They immediately broke into
 so swift a gallop, that it seemed rather like flying through the air
 than running along the earth. In a moment, Proserpina lost sight of the
 pleasant vale of Enna, in which she had always dwelt. Another instant,
 and even the summit of Mount Aetna had become so blue in the distance,
 that she could scarcely distinguish it from the smoke that gushed out of
 its crater. But still the poor child screamed, and scattered her apron
 full of flowers along the way, and left a long cry trailing behind the
 chariot; and many mothers, to whose ears it came, ran quickly to see if
 any mischief had befallen their children. But Mother Ceres was a great
 way off, and could not hear the cry.
 
 As they rode on, the stranger did his best to soothe her.
 
 "Why should you be so frightened, my pretty child?" said he, trying to
 soften his rough voice. "I promise not to do you any harm. What! you
 have been gathering flowers? Wait till we come to my palace, and I
 will give you a garden full of prettier flowers than those, all made of
 pearls, and diamonds, and rubies. Can you guess who I am? They call my
--**--**--
 past them, for Pluto urged on his horses, and went faster than ever.
 Proserpina continued to cry out, and screamed so long and so loudly that
 her poor little voice was almost screamed away; and when it was nothing
 but a whisper, she happened to cast her eyes over a great broad field
 of waving grain--and whom do you think she saw? Who, but Mother Ceres,
 making the corn grow, and too busy to notice the golden chariot as it
 went rattling along. The child mustered all her strength, and gave one
 more scream, but was out of sight before Ceres had time to turn her
 head.
 
 King Pluto had taken a road which now began to grow excessively gloomy.
 It was bordered on each side with rocks and precipices, between which
 the rumbling of the chariot wheels was reverberated with a noise like
 rolling thunder. The trees and bushes that grew in the crevices of the
 rocks had very dismal foliage; and by and by, although it was hardly
 noon, the air became obscured with a gray twilight. The black horses had
 rushed along so swiftly, that they were already beyond the limits of the
 sunshine. But the duskier it grew, the more did Pluto's visage assume
 an air of satisfaction. After all, he was not an ill-looking person,
 especially when he left off twisting his features into a smile that did
 not belong to them. Proserpina peeped at his face through the gathering
 dusk, and hoped that he might not be so very wicked as she at first
 thought him.
 
 "Ah, this twilight is truly refreshing," said King Pluto, "after being
 so tormented with that ugly and impertinent glare of the sun. How
 much more agreeable is lamplight or torchlight, more particularly when
 reflected from diamonds! It will be a magnificent sight, when we get to
--**--**--
 have something to love, instead of cheating his heart any longer with
 this tiresome magnificence. And, though he pretended to dislike the
 sunshine of the upper world, yet the effect of the child's presence,
 bedimmed as she was by her tears, was as if a faint and watery sunbeam
 had somehow or other found its way into the enchanted hall.
 
 Pluto now summoned his domestics, and bade them lose no time in
 preparing a most sumptuous banquet, and above all things, not to fail of
 setting a golden beaker of the water of Lethe by Proserpina's plate.
 
 "I will neither drink that nor anything else," said Proserpina. "Nor
 will I taste a morsel of food, even if you keep me forever in your
 palace."
 
 "I should be sorry for that," replied King Pluto, patting her cheek;
 for he really wished to be kind, if he had only known how. "You are a
 spoiled child, I perceive, my little Proserpina; but when you see the
 nice things which my cook will make for you, your appetite will quickly
 come again."
 
 Then, sending for the head cook, he gave strict orders that all sorts
 of delicacies, such as young people are usually fond of, should be
 set before Proserpina. He had a secret motive in this; for, you are to
 understand, it is a fixed law, that when persons are carried off to the
 land of magic, if they once taste any food there, they can never get
 back to their friends. Now, if King Pluto had been cunning enough to
 offer Proserpina some fruit, or bread and milk (which was the simple
 fare to which the child had always been accustomed), it is very probable
 that she would soon have been tempted to eat it. But he left the matter
--**--**--
 search more thoroughly on foot. At all events, this was the way in
 which she began her sorrowful journey, holding her torch before her, and
 looking carefully at every object along the path. And as it happened,
 she had not gone far before she found one of the magnificent flowers
 which grew on the shrub that Proserpina had pulled up.
 
 "Ha!" thought Mother Ceres, examining it by torchlight. "Here is
 mischief in this flower! The earth did not produce it by any help of
 mine, nor of its own accord. It is the work of enchantment, and is
 therefore poisonous; and perhaps it has poisoned my poor child."
 
 But she put the poisonous flower in her bosom, not knowing whether she
 might ever find any other memorial of Proserpina.
 
 All night long, at the door of every cottage and farm-house, Ceres
 knocked, and called up the weary laborers to inquire if they had seen
 her child; and they stood, gaping and half-asleep, at the threshold,
 and answered her pityingly, and besought her to come in and rest. At the
 portal of every palace, too, she made so loud a summons that the menials
 hurried to throw open the gate, thinking that it must be some great king
 or queen, who would demand a banquet for supper and a stately chamber to
 repose in. And when they saw only a sad and anxious woman, with a torch
 in her hand and a wreath of withered poppies on her head, they spoke
 rudely, and sometimes threatened to set the dogs upon her. But nobody
 had seen Proserpina, nor could give Mother Ceres the least hint which
 way to seek her. Thus passed the night; and still she continued her
 search without sitting down to rest, or stopping to take food, or even
--**--**--
 flame of the torch would redden and gleam along the pathway, and she
 continued her search by its light, without ever sitting down to rest.
 
 On the tenth day, she chanced to espy the mouth of a cavern within which
 (though it was bright noon everywhere else) there would have been only
 a dusky twilight; but it so happened that a torch was burning there. It
 flickered, and struggled with the duskiness, but could not half light up
 the gloomy cavern with all its melancholy glimmer. Ceres was resolved to
 leave no spot without a search; so she peeped into the entrance of the
 cave, and lighted it up a little more, by holding her own torch before
 her. In so doing, she caught a glimpse of what seemed to be a woman,
 sitting on the brown leaves of the last autumn, a great heap of which
 had been swept into the cave by the wind. This woman (if woman it were)
 was by no means so beautiful as many of her sex; for her head, they tell
 me, was shaped very much like a dog's, and, by way of ornament, she wore
 a wreath of snakes around it. But Mother Ceres, the moment she saw her,
 knew that this was an odd kind of a person, who put all her enjoyment
 in being miserable, and never would have a word to say to other people,
 unless they were as melancholy and wretched as she herself delighted to
 be.
 
 "I am wretched enough now," thought poor Ceres, "to talk with this
 melancholy Hecate, were she ten times sadder than ever she was yet." So
 she stepped into the cave, and sat down on the withered leaves by the
 dog-headed woman's side. In all the world, since her daughter's loss,
--**--**--
 Proserpina?"
 
 "Proserpina! Proserpina, did you call her name?" answered Phoebus,
 endeavoring to recollect; for there was such a continual flow of
 pleasant ideas in his mind, that he was apt to forget what had happened
 no longer ago than yesterday. "Ah, yes, I remember her now. A very
 lovely child, indeed. I am happy to tell you, my dear madam, that I
 did see the little Proserpina not many days ago. You may make yourself
 perfectly easy about her. She is safe, and in excellent hands."
 
 "O, where is my dear child?" cried Ceres, clasping her hands, and
 flinging herself at his feet.
 
 "Why," said Phoebus--and as he spoke he kept touching his lyre so as to
 make a thread of music run in and out among his words--"as the little
 damsel was gathering flowers (and she has really a very exquisite taste
 for flowers), she was suddenly snatched up by King Pluto, and carried
 off to his dominions. I have never been in that part of the universe;
 but the royal palace, I am told, is built in a very noble style of
 architecture, and of the most splendid and costly materials. Gold,
 diamonds, pearls, and all manner of precious stones will be your
 daughter's ordinary playthings. I recommend to you, my dear lady, to
 give yourself no uneasiness. Proserpina's sense of beauty will be duly
 gratified, and even in spite of the lack of sunshine, she will lead a
 very enviable life."
 
 "Hush! Say not such a word!" answered Ceres, indignantly. "What is there
 to gratify her heart? What are all the splendors you speak of without
 affection? I must have her back again. Will you go with me you go with
 me, Phoebus, to demand my daughter of this wicked Pluto?"
 
 "Pray excuse me," replied Phoebus, with an elegant obeisance. "I
--**--**--
 toilsome way, all alone, and holding up that never-dying torch, the
 flame of which seemed an emblem of the grief and hope that burned
 together in her heart.
 
 So much did she suffer, that, though her aspect had been quite youthful
 when her troubles began, she grew to look like an elderly person in a
 very brief time. She cared not how she was dressed, nor had she ever
 thought of flinging away the wreath of withered poppies, which she put
 on the very morning of Proserpina's disappearance. She roamed about in
 so wild a way, and with her hair so disheveled, that people took her for
 some distracted creature, and never dreamed that this was Mother Ceres,
 who had the oversight of every seed which the husbandman planted.
 Nowadays, however, she gave herself no trouble about seed time nor
 harvest, but left the farmers to take care of their own affairs, and the
 crops to fade or flourish, as the case might be. There was nothing, now,
 in which Ceres seemed to feel an interest, unless when she saw children
 at play, or gathering flowers along the wayside. Then, indeed, she
 would stand and gaze at them with tears in her eyes. The children, too,
 appeared to have a sympathy with her grief, and would cluster themselves
 in a little group about her knees, and look up wistfully in her face;
 and Ceres, after giving them a kiss all round, would lead them to their
 homes, and advise their mothers never to let them stray out of sight.
 
 "For if they do," said she, "it may happen to you, as it has to me, that
 the iron-hearted King Pluto will take a liking to your darlings, and
 snatch them up in his chariot, and carry them away."
 
 One day, during her pilgrimage in quest of the entrance to Pluto's
--**--**--
 child, and allowed neither the king nor the queen to say whether he
 should be bathed in warm or cold water, or what he should eat, or how
 often he should take the air, or when he should be put to bed. You would
 hardly believe me, if I were to tell how quickly the baby prince got rid
 of his ailments, and grew fat, and rosy, and strong, and how he had two
 rows of ivory teeth in less time than any other little fellow, before
 or since. Instead of the palest, and wretchedest, and puniest imp in the
 world (as his own mother confessed him to be, when Ceres first took him
 in charge), he was now a strapping baby, crowing, laughing, kicking up
 his heels, and rolling from one end of the room to the other. All the
 good women of the neighborhood crowded to the palace, and held up their
 hands, in unutterable amazement, at the beauty and wholesomeness of
 this darling little prince. Their wonder was the greater, because he was
 never seen to taste any food; not even so much as a cup of milk.
 
 "Pray, nurse," the queen kept saying, "how is it that you make the child
 thrive so?"
 
 "I was a mother once," Ceres always replied; "and having nursed my own
 child, I know what other children need."
 
 But Queen Metanira, as was very natural, had a great curiosity to know
 precisely what the nurse did to her child. One night, therefore, she hid
 herself in the chamber where Ceres and the little prince were accustomed
 to sleep. There was a fire in the chimney, and it had now crumbled into
 great coals and embers, which lay glowing on the hearth, with a blaze
 flickering up now and then, and flinging a warm and ruddy light upon the
--**--**--
 as before. At length, in her despair, she came to the dreadful
 resolution that not a stalk of grain, nor a blade of grass, not a
 potato, nor a turnip, nor any other vegetable that was good for man
 or beast to eat, should be suffered to grow until her daughter were
 restored. She even forbade the flowers to bloom, lest somebody's heart
 should be cheered by their beauty.
 
 Now, as not so much as a head of asparagus ever presumed to poke itself
 out of the ground, without the especial permission of Ceres, you may
 conceive what a terrible calamity had here fallen upon the earth. The
 husbandmen plowed and planted as usual; but there lay the rich black
 furrows, all as barren as a desert of sand. The pastures looked as brown
 in the sweet month of June as ever they did in chill November. The rich
 man's broad acres and the cottager's small garden patch were equally
 blighted. Every little girl's flower bed showed nothing but dry stalks.
 The old people shook their white heads, and said that the earth had
 grown aged like themselves, and was no longer capable of wearing the
 warm smile of summer on its face. It was really piteous to see the poor,
 starving cattle and sheep, how they followed behind Ceres, lowing and
 bleating, as if their instinct taught them to expect help from her; and
 everybody that was acquainted with her power besought her to have mercy
 on the human race, and, at all events, to let the grass grow. But
 Mother Ceres, though naturally of an affectionate disposition, was now
 inexorable.
 
 "Never," said she. "If the earth is ever again to see any verdure, it
 must first grow along the path which my daughter will tread in coming
--**--**--
 hearts, at bottom, as those of a more cheerful character. If you would
 only stay with me of your own accord, it would make me happier than the
 possession of a hundred such palaces as this."
 
 "Ah," said Proserpina, "you should have tried to make me like you before
 carrying me off. And the best thing you can now do is, to let me go
 again. Then I might remember you sometimes, and think that you were as
 kind as you knew how to be. Perhaps, too, one day or other, I might come
 back, and pay you a visit."
 
 "No, no," answered Pluto, with his gloomy smile, "I will not trust
 you for that. You are too fond of living in the broad daylight, and
 gathering flowers. What an idle and childish taste that is! Are not
 these gems, which I have ordered to be dug for you, and which are richer
 than any in my crown--are they not prettier than a violet?"
 
 "Not half so pretty," said Proserpina, snatching the gems from Pluto's
 hand, and flinging them to the other end of the hall. "O my sweet
 violets, shall I never see you again?"
 
 And then she burst into tears. But young people's tears have very little
 saltness or acidity in them, and do not inflame the eyes so much as
 those of grown persons; so that it is not to be wondered at, if, a few
 moments afterwards, Proserpina was sporting through the hall almost as
 merrily as she and the four sea nymphs had sported along the edge of the
 surf wave. King Pluto gazed after her, and wished that he, too, was a
 child. And little Proserpina, when she turned about, and beheld this
 great king standing in his splendid hall, and looking so grand, and so
--**--**--
 sharpest that ever anybody had) perceived that the child was a little
 confused; and seeing the empty salver, he suspected that she had been
 taking a sly nibble of something or other. As for honest Pluto, he never
 guessed at the secret.
 
 "My little Proserpina," said the king, sitting down, and affectionately
 drawing her between his knees, "here is Quicksilver, who tells me that
 a great many misfortunes have befallen innocent people on account of
 my detaining you in my dominions. To confess the truth, I myself had
 already reflected that it was an unjustifiable act to take you away from
 your good mother. But, then, you must consider, my dear child, that this
 vast palace is apt to be gloomy (although the precious stones certainly
 shine very bright), and that I am not of the most cheerful disposition,
 and that therefore it was a natural thing enough to seek for the society
 of some merrier creature than myself. I hoped you would take my crown
 for a plaything, and me--ah, you laugh, naughty Proserpina--me, grim as
 I am, for a playmate. It was a silly expectation."
 
 "Not so extremely silly," whispered Proserpina. "You have really amused
 me very much, sometimes."
 
 "Thank you," said King Pluto, rather dryly. "But I can see plainly
 enough, that you think my palace a dusky prison, and me the iron-hearted
 keeper of it. And an iron heart I should surely have, if I could detain
 you here any longer, my poor child, when it is now six months since you
 tasted food. I give you your liberty. Go with Quicksilver. Hasten home
 to your dear mother."
 
 Now, although you may not have supposed it, Proserpina found it
 impossible to take leave of poor King Pluto without some regrets, and a
 good deal of compunction for not telling him about the pomegranate. She
--**--**--
 
 Mother Ceres had returned to her deserted home, and was sitting
 disconsolately on the doorstep, with her torch burning in her hand. She
 had been idly watching the flame for some moments past, when, all at
 once, it flickered and went out.
 
 "What does this mean?" thought she. "It was an enchanted torch, and
 should have kept burning till my child came back."
 
 Lifting her eyes, she was surprised to see a sudden verdure flashing
 over the brown and barren fields, exactly as you may have observed a
 golden hue gleaming far and wide across the landscape, from the just
 risen sun.
 
 "Does the earth disobey me?" exclaimed Mother Ceres, indignantly.
 "Does it presume to be green, when I have bidden it be barren, until my
 daughter shall be restored to my arms?"
 
 "Then open your arms, dear mother," cried a well-known voice, "and take
 your little daughter into them."
 
 And Proserpina came running, and flung herself upon her mother's bosom.
 Their mutual transport is not to be described. The grief of their
 separation had caused both of them to shed a great many tears; and now
 they shed a great many more, because their joy could not so well express
 itself in any other way.
 
 When their hearts had grown a little more quiet, Mother Ceres looked
 anxiously at Proserpina.
 
 "My child," said she, "did you taste any food while you were in King
 Pluto's palace?"
 
 "Dearest mother," exclaimed Proserpina, "I will tell you the whole
 truth. Until this very morning, not a morsel of food had passed my lips.
 But to-day, they brought me a pomegranate (a very dry one it was, and
 all shriveled up, till there was little left of it but seeds and skin),
 and having seen no fruit for so long a time, and being faint with
--**--**--
 how to play upon the harp, and how to cure diseases, and how to use the
 sword and shield, together with various other branches of education, in
 which the lads of those days used to be instructed, instead of writing
 and arithmetic.
 
 I have sometimes suspected that Master Chiron was not really very
 different from other people, but that, being a kind-hearted and merry
 old fellow, he was in the habit of making believe that he was a horse,
 and scrambling about the schoolroom on all fours, and letting the little
 boys ride upon his back. And so, when his scholars had grown up, and
 grown old, and were trotting their grandchildren on their knees, they
 told them about the sports of their school days; and these young folks
 took the idea that their grandfathers had been taught their letters by
 a Centaur, half man and half horse. Little children, not quite
 understanding what is said to them, often get such absurd notions into
 their heads, you know.
 
 Be that as it may, it has always been told for a fact (and always will
 be told, as long as the world lasts), that Chiron, with the head of a
 schoolmaster, had the body and legs of a horse. Just imagine the grave
 old gentleman clattering and stamping into the schoolroom on his four
 hoofs, perhaps treading on some little fellow's toes, flourishing his
 switch tail instead of a rod, and, now and then, trotting out of doors
 to eat a mouthful of grass! I wonder what the blacksmith charged him for
 a set of iron shoes?
 
 So Jason dwelt in the cave, with this four-footed Chiron, from the time
 that he was an infant, only a few months old, until he had grown to
 the full height of a man. He became a very good harper, I suppose, and
--**--**--
 or to come. While Jason was gazing at her, a peacock strutted forward,
 and took his stand at the old woman's side.
 
 "I am going to Iolchos," answered the young man, "to bid the wicked
 King Pelias come down from my father's throne, and let me reign in his
 stead."
 
 "Ah, well, then," said the old woman, still with the same cracked voice,
 "if that is all your business, you need not be in a very great hurry.
 Just take me on your back, there's a good youth, and carry me across the
 river. I and my peacock have something to do on the other side, as well
 as yourself."
 
 "Good mother," replied Jason, "your business can hardly be so important
 as the pulling down a king from his throne. Besides, as you may see
 for yourself, the river is very boisterous; and if I should chance to
 stumble, it would sweep both of us away more easily than it has carried
 off yonder uprooted tree. I would gladly help you if I could; but I
 doubt whether I am strong enough to carry you across."
 
 "Then," said she, very scornfully, "neither are you strong enough to
 pull King Pelias off his throne. And, Jason, unless you will help an old
 woman at her need, you ought not to be a king. What are kings made for,
 save to succor the feeble and distressed? But do as you please. Either
 take me on your back, or with my poor old limbs I shall try my best to
 struggle across the stream."
 
 Saying this, the old woman poked with her staff in the river, as if to
 find the safest place in its rocky bed where she might make the first
 step. But Jason, by this time, had grown ashamed of his reluctance to
--**--**--
 There was no time, just then, to inquire what the Speaking Oak had said.
 But the briskness of her tone encouraged the young man; and, besides, he
 had never in his life felt so vigorous and mighty as since taking this
 old woman on his back. Instead of being exhausted, he gathered strength
 as he went on; and, struggling up against the torrent, he at last gained
 the opposite shore, clambered up the bank, and set down the old dame and
 her peacock safely on the grass. As soon as this was done, however, he
 could not help looking rather despondently at his bare foot, with only a
 remnant of the golden string of the sandal clinging round his ankle.
 
 "You will get a handsomer pair of sandals by and by," said the old
 woman, with a kindly look out of her beautiful brown eyes. "Only let
 King Pelias get a glimpse of that bare foot, and you shall see him turn
 as pale as ashes, I promise you. There is your path. Go along, my good
 Jason, and my blessing go with you. And when you sit on your throne
 remember the old woman whom you helped over the river."
 
 With these words, she hobbled away, giving him a smile over her shoulder
 as she departed.
 
 Whether the light of her beautiful brown eyes threw a glory round
 about her, or whatever the cause might be, Jason fancied that there was
 something very noble and majestic in her figure, after all, and that,
 though her gait seemed to be a rheumatic hobble, yet she moved with as
 much grace and dignity as any queen on earth. Her peacock, which had now
 fluttered down from her shoulder, strutted behind her in a prodigious
 pomp, and spread out its magnificent tail on purpose for Jason to admire
--**--**--
 
 "It is no fault of mine," answered Jason. "Your majesty must blame the
 rudeness of your subjects, who have raised all this tumult because one
 of my feet happens to be bare."
 
 When Jason said this, the king gave a quick startled glance down at his
 feet.
 
 "Ha!" muttered he, "here is the one-sandaled fellow, sure enough! What
 can I do with him?"
 
 And he clutched more closely the great knife in his hand, as if he were
 half a mind to slay Jason, instead of the black bull. The people round
 about caught up the king's words, indistinctly as they were uttered; and
 first there was a murmur amongst them, and then a loud shout.
 
 "The one-sandaled man has come! The prophecy must be fulfilled!"
 
 For you are to know, that, many years before, King Pelias had been told
 by the Speaking Oak of Dodona, that a man with one sandal should cast
 him down from his throne. On this account, he had given strict orders
 that nobody should ever come into his presence, unless both sandals were
 securely tied upon his feet; and he kept an officer in his palace, whose
 sole business it was to examine people's sandals, and to supply them
 with a new pair, at the expense of the royal treasury, as soon as the
 old ones began to wear out. In the whole course of the king's reign,
 he had never been thrown into such a fright and agitation as by the
 spectacle of poor Jason's bare foot. But, as he was naturally a bold and
 hard-hearted man, he soon took courage, and began to consider in what
 way he might rid himself of this terrible one-sandaled stranger.
 
 "My good young man," said King Pelias, taking the softest tone
 imaginable, in order to throw Jason off his guard, "you are excessively
--**--**--
 presence, was to go to Dodona, and inquire of the Talking Oak what
 course it was best to pursue. This wonderful tree stood in the center of
 an ancient wood. Its stately trunk rose up a hundred feet into the air,
 and threw a broad and dense shadow over more than an acre of ground.
 Standing beneath it, Jason looked up among the knotted branches and
 green leaves, and into the mysterious heart of the old tree, and spoke
 aloud, as if he were addressing some person who was hidden in the depths
 of the foliage.
 
 "What shall I do," said he, "in order to win the Golden Fleece?"
 
 At first there was a deep silence, not only within the shadow of the
 Talking Oak, but all through the solitary wood. In a moment or two,
 however, the leaves of the oak began to stir and rustle, as if a gentle
 breeze were wandering amongst them, although the other trees of the wood
 were perfectly still. The sound grew louder, and became like the roar of
 a high wind. By and by, Jason imagined that he could distinguish words,
 but very confusedly, because each separate leaf of the tree seemed to be
 a tongue, and the whole myriad of tongues were babbling at once. But the
 noise waxed broader and deeper, until it resembled a tornado sweeping
 through the oak, and making one great utterance out of the thousand and
 thousand of little murmurs which each leafy tongue had caused by its
 rustling. And now, though it still had the tone of a mighty wind roaring
 among the branches, it was also like a deep bass voice, speaking as
 distinctly as a tree could be expected to speak, the following words:
 
 "Go to Argus, the shipbuilder, and bid him build a galley with fifty
--**--**--
 a helmet on her head, from beneath which the long ringlets fell down
 upon her shoulders. On the left arm was a shield, and in its center
 appeared a lifelike representation of the head of Medusa with the snaky
 locks. The right arm was extended, as if pointing onward. The face of
 this wonderful statue, though not angry or forbidding, was so grave and
 majestic, that perhaps you might call it severe; and as for the mouth,
 it seemed just ready to unclose its lips, and utter words of the deepest
 wisdom.
 
 Jason was delighted with the oaken image, and gave the carver no rest
 until it was completed, and set up where a figure-head has always stood,
 from that time to this, in the vessel's prow.
 
 "And now," cried he, as he stood gazing at the calm, majestic face of
 the statue, "I must go to the Talking Oak and inquire what next to do."
 
 "There is no need of that, Jason," said a voice which, though it was
 far lower, reminded him of the mighty tones of the great oak. "When you
 desire good advice, you can seek it of me."
 
 Jason had been looking straight into the face of the image when these
 words were spoken. But he could hardly believe either his ears or his
 eyes. The truth was, however, that the oaken lips had moved, and, to all
 appearance, the voice had proceeded from the statue's mouth. Recovering
 a little from his surprise, Jason bethought himself that the image had
 been carved out of the wood of the Talking Oak, and that, therefore, it
 was really no great wonder, but on the contrary, the most natural thing
 in the world, that it should possess the faculty of speech. It would
 have been very odd, indeed, if it had not. But certainly it was a great
--**--**--
 the most sombre; being, in truth, not so very confident as at some
 former periods that this final step, which would mix me up irrevocably
 with the Blithedale affair, was the wisest that could possibly be
 taken.  It was nothing short of midnight when I went to bed, after
 drinking a glass of particularly fine sherry on which I used to pride
 myself in those days.  It was the very last bottle; and I finished it,
 with a friend, the next forenoon, before setting out for Blithedale.
 
 
 
 II. BLITHEDALE
 
 There can hardly remain for me (who am really getting to be a frosty
 bachelor, with another white hair, every week or so, in my mustache),
 there can hardly flicker up again so cheery a blaze upon the hearth, as
 that which I remember, the next day, at Blithedale.  It was a wood
 fire, in the parlor of an old farmhouse, on an April afternoon, but
 with the fitful gusts of a wintry snowstorm roaring in the chimney.
 Vividly does that fireside re-create itself, as I rake away the ashes
 from the embers in my memory, and blow them up with a sigh, for lack of
 more inspiring breath.  Vividly for an instant, but anon, with the
 dimmest gleam, and with just as little fervency for my heart as for my
 finger-ends!  The staunch oaken logs were long ago burnt out. Their
 genial glow must be represented, if at all, by the merest phosphoric
 glimmer, like that which exudes, rather than shines, from damp
 fragments of decayed trees, deluding the benighted wanderer through a
 forest.  Around such chill mockery of a fire some few of us might sit
 on the withered leaves, spreading out each a palm towards the imaginary
 warmth, and talk over our exploded scheme for beginning the life of
--**--**--
 vision have been worth the having, it is certain never to be
 consummated otherwise than by a failure.  And what of that?  Its
 airiest fragments, impalpable as they may be, will possess a value that
 lurks not in the most ponderous realities of any practicable scheme.
 They are not the rubbish of the mind.  Whatever else I may repent of,
 therefore, let it be reckoned neither among my sins nor follies that I
 once had faith and force enough to form generous hopes of the world's
 destiny--yes!--and to do what in me lay for their accomplishment; even
 to the extent of quitting a warm fireside, flinging away a freshly
 lighted cigar, and travelling far beyond the strike of city clocks,
 through a drifting snowstorm.
 
 There were four of us who rode together through the storm; and
 Hollingsworth, who had agreed to be of the number, was accidentally
 delayed, and set forth at a later hour alone.  As we threaded the
 streets, I remember how the buildings on either side seemed to press
 too closely upon us, insomuch that our mighty hearts found barely room
 enough to throb between them.  The snowfall, too, looked inexpressibly
 dreary (I had almost called it dingy), coming down through an
 atmosphere of city smoke, and alighting on the sidewalk only to be
 moulded into the impress of somebody's patched boot or overshoe.  Thus
 the track of an old conventionalism was visible on what was freshest
 from the sky.  But when we left the pavements, and our muffled
 hoof-tramps beat upon a desolate extent of country road, and were
 effaced by the unfettered blast as soon as stamped, then there was
 better air to breathe.  Air that had not been breathed once and again!
 air that had not been spoken into words of falsehood, formality, and
--**--**--
 Good, comfortable Mrs. Foster (the wife of stout Silas Foster, who was
 to manage the farm at a fair stipend, and be our tutor in the art of
 husbandry) bade us a hearty welcome.  At her back--a back of generous
 breadth--appeared two young women, smiling most hospitably, but looking
 rather awkward withal, as not well knowing what was to be their
 position in our new arrangement of the world.  We shook hands
 affectionately all round, and congratulated ourselves that the blessed
 state of brotherhood and sisterhood, at which we aimed, might fairly be
 dated from this moment.  Our greetings were hardly concluded when the
 door opened, and Zenobia--whom I had never before seen, important as
 was her place in our enterprise--Zenobia entered the parlor.
 
 This (as the reader, if at all acquainted with our literary biography,
 need scarcely be told) was not her real name.  She had assumed it, in
 the first instance, as her magazine signature; and, as it accorded well
 with something imperial which her friends attributed to this lady's
 figure and deportment, they half-laughingly adopted it in their
 familiar intercourse with her.  She took the appellation in good part,
 and even encouraged its constant use; which, in fact, was thus far
 appropriate, that our Zenobia, however humble looked her new
 philosophy, had as much native pride as any queen would have known what
 to do with.
 
 
 
 III. A KNOT OF DREAMERS
 
 Zenobia bade us welcome, in a fine, frank, mellow voice, and gave each
 of us her hand, which was very soft and warm.  She had something
 appropriate, I recollect, to say to every individual; and what she said
 to myself was this:--"I have long wished to know you, Mr. Coverdale,
 and to thank you for your beautiful poetry, some of which I have
 learned by heart; or rather it has stolen into my memory, without my
--**--**--
 Preferable--by way of variety, at least--was Zenobia's bloom, health,
 and vigor, which she possessed in such overflow that a man might well
 have fallen in love with her for their sake only.  In her quiet moods,
 she seemed rather indolent; but when really in earnest, particularly if
 there were a spice of bitter feeling, she grew all alive to her
 finger-tips.
 
 "I am the first comer," Zenobia went on to say, while her smile beamed
 warmth upon us all; "so I take the part of hostess for to-day, and
 welcome you as if to my own fireside.  You shall be my guests, too, at
 supper.  Tomorrow, if you please, we will be brethren and sisters, and
 begin our new life from daybreak."
 
 "Have we our various parts assigned?" asked some one.
 
 "Oh, we of the softer sex," responded Zenobia, with her mellow, almost
 broad laugh,--most delectable to hear, but not in the least like an
 ordinary woman's laugh,--"we women (there are four of us here already)
 will take the domestic and indoor part of the business, as a matter of
 course.  To bake, to boil, to roast, to fry, to stew,--to wash, and
 iron, and scrub, and sweep,--and, at our idler intervals, to repose
 ourselves on knitting and sewing,--these, I suppose, must be feminine
 occupations, for the present.  By and by, perhaps, when our individual
 adaptations begin to develop themselves, it may be that some of us who
 wear the petticoat will go afield, and leave the weaker brethren to
 take our places in the kitchen."
 
 "What a pity," I remarked, "that the kitchen, and the housework
 generally, cannot be left out of our system altogether!  It is odd
 enough that the kind of labor which falls to the lot of women is just
 that which chiefly distinguishes artificial life--the life of
--**--**--
 have been few brighter seasons for us than that.  If ever men might
 lawfully dream awake, and give utterance to their wildest visions
 without dread of laughter or scorn on the part of the audience,--yes,
 and speak of earthly happiness, for themselves and mankind, as an
 object to be hopefully striven for, and probably attained, we who made
 that little semicircle round the blazing fire were those very men.  We
 had left the rusty iron framework of society behind us; we had broken
 through many hindrances that are powerful enough to keep most people on
 the weary treadmill of the established system, even while they feel its
 irksomeness almost as intolerable as we did.  We had stepped down from
 the pulpit; we had flung aside the pen; we had shut up the ledger; we
 had thrown off that sweet, bewitching, enervating indolence, which is
 better, after all, than most of the enjoyments within mortal grasp.  It
 was our purpose--a generous one, certainly, and absurd, no doubt, in
 full proportion with its generosity--to give up whatever we had
 heretofore attained, for the sake of showing mankind the example of a
 life governed by other than the false and cruel principles on which
 human society has all along been based.
 
 And, first of all, we had divorced ourselves from pride, and were
 striving to supply its place with familiar love.  We meant to lessen
 the laboring man's great burden of toil, by performing our due share of
 it at the cost of our own thews and sinews.  We sought our profit by
 mutual aid, instead of wresting it by the strong hand from an enemy, or
 filching it craftily from those less shrewd than ourselves (if, indeed,
 there were any such in New England), or winning it by selfish
 competition with a neighbor; in one or another of which fashions every
--**--**--
 
 Zenobia turned, sidelong, a strange kind of a glance upon me; but,
 before I could make out what it meant, we had entered the kitchen,
 where, in accordance with the rustic simplicity of our new life, the
 supper-table was spread.
 
 
 
 IV. THE SUPPER-TABLE
 
 The pleasant firelight!  I must still keep harping on it.  The kitchen
 hearth had an old-fashioned breadth, depth, and spaciousness, far
 within which lay what seemed the butt of a good-sized oak-tree, with
 the moisture bubbling merrily out at both ends.  It was now half an
 hour beyond dusk.  The blaze from an armful of substantial sticks,
 rendered more combustible by brushwood and pine, flickered powerfully
 on the smoke-blackened walls, and so cheered our spirits that we cared
 not what inclemency might rage and roar on the other side of our
 illuminated windows.  A yet sultrier warmth was bestowed by a goodly
 quantity of peat, which was crumbling to white ashes among the burning
 brands, and incensed the kitchen with its not ungrateful fragrance.
 The exuberance of this household fire would alone have sufficed to
 bespeak us no true farmers; for the New England yeoman, if he have the
 misfortune to dwell within practicable distance of a wood-market, is as
 niggardly of each stick as if it were a bar of California gold.
 
 But it was fortunate for us, on that wintry eve of our untried life, to
 enjoy the warm and radiant luxury of a somewhat too abundant fire. If
 it served no other purpose, it made the men look so full of youth, warm
 blood, and hope, and the women--such of them, at least, as were anywise
 convertible by its magic--so very beautiful, that I would cheerfully
 have spent my last dollar to prolong the blaze.  As for Zenobia, there
 was a glow in her cheeks that made me think of Pandora, fresh from
--**--**--
 I have deserved (which has not often been the case, and, I think,
 never), but if ever I did deserve to be soundly cuffed by a fellow
 mortal, for secretly putting weight upon some imaginary social
 advantage, it must have been while I was striving to prove myself
 ostentatiously his equal and no more.  It was while I sat beside him on
 his cobbler's bench, or clinked my hoe against his own in the
 cornfield, or broke the same crust of bread, my earth-grimed hand to
 his, at our noontide lunch.  The poor, proud man should look at both
 sides of sympathy like this.
 
 The silence which followed upon our sitting down to table grew rather
 oppressive; indeed, it was hardly broken by a word, during the first
 round of Zenobia's fragrant tea.
 
 "I hope," said I, at last, "that our blazing windows will be visible a
 great way off.  There is nothing so pleasant and encouraging to a
 solitary traveller, on a stormy night, as a flood of firelight seen
 amid the gloom.  These ruddy window panes cannot fail to cheer the
 hearts of all that look at them.  Are they not warm with the
 beacon-fire which we have kindled for humanity?"
 
 "The blaze of that brushwood will only last a minute or two longer,"
 observed Silas Foster; but whether he meant to insinuate that our moral
 illumination would have as brief a term, I cannot say.
 
 "Meantime," said Zenobia, "it may serve to guide some wayfarer to a
 shelter."
 
 And, just as she said this, there came a knock at the house door.
 
 "There is one of the world's wayfarers," said I. "Ay, ay, just so!"
 quoth Silas Foster.  "Our firelight will draw stragglers, just as a
 candle draws dorbugs on a summer night."
 
 Whether to enjoy a dramatic suspense, or that we were selfishly
--**--**--
 "Well, well," said Hollingsworth quietly, "We'll make it right."
 
 The stranger, or whatever she were, remained standing precisely on that
 spot of the kitchen floor to which Hollingsworth's kindly hand had
 impelled her.  The cloak falling partly off, she was seen to be a very
 young woman dressed in a poor but decent gown, made high in the neck,
 and without any regard to fashion or smartness.  Her brown hair fell
 down from beneath a hood, not in curls but with only a slight wave; her
 face was of a wan, almost sickly hue, betokening habitual seclusion
 from the sun and free atmosphere, like a flower-shrub that had done its
 best to blossom in too scanty light.  To complete the pitiableness of
 her aspect, she shivered either with cold, or fear, or nervous
 excitement, so that you might have beheld her shadow vibrating on the
 fire-lighted wall.  In short, there has seldom been seen so depressed
 and sad a figure as this young girl's; and it was hardly possible to
 help being angry with her, from mere despair of doing anything for her
 comfort.  The fantasy occurred to me that she was some desolate kind of
 a creature, doomed to wander about in snowstorms; and that, though the
 ruddiness of our window panes had tempted her into a human dwelling,
 she would not remain long enough to melt the icicles out of her hair.
 Another conjecture likewise came into my mind.  Recollecting
 Hollingsworth's sphere of philanthropic action, I deemed it possible
 that he might have brought one of his guilty patients, to be wrought
 upon and restored to spiritual health by the pure influences which our
 mode of life would create.
 
 As yet the girl had not stirred.  She stood near the door, fixing a
 pair of large, brown, melancholy eyes upon Zenobia--only upon
--**--**--
 mere courtesy of manner, he never possessed more than a tolerably
 educated bear; although, in his gentler moods, there was a tenderness
 in his voice, eyes, mouth, in his gesture, and in every indescribable
 manifestation, which few men could resist and no woman. But he now
 looked stern and reproachful; and it was with that inauspicious meaning
 in his glance that Hollingsworth first met Zenobia's eyes, and began
 his influence upon her life.
 
 To my surprise, Zenobia--of whose haughty spirit I had been told so
 many examples--absolutely changed color, and seemed mortified and
 confused.
 
 "You do not quite do me justice, Mr. Hollingsworth," said she almost
 humbly.  "I am willing to be kind to the poor girl.  Is she a protegee
 of yours?  What can I do for her?"
 
 "Have you anything to ask of this lady?" said Hollingsworth kindly to
 the girl.  "I remember you mentioned her name before we left town."
 
 "Only that she will shelter me," replied the girl tremulously.  "Only
 that she will let me be always near her."
 
 "Well, indeed," exclaimed Zenobia, recovering herself and laughing,
 "this is an adventure, and well-worthy to be the first incident in our
 life of love and free-heartedness!  But I accept it, for the present,
 without further question, only," added she, "it would be a convenience
 if we knew your name."
 
 "Priscilla," said the girl; and it appeared to me that she hesitated
 whether to add anything more, and decided in the negative.  "Pray do
 not ask me my other name,--at least not yet,--if you will be so kind to
 a forlorn creature."
 
 Priscilla!--Priscilla!  I repeated the name to myself three or four
 times; and in that little space, this quaint and prim cognomen had so
 amalgamated itself with my idea of the girl, that it seemed as if no
--**--**--
 
 Zenobia happening to change her seat, I took the opportunity, in an
 undertone, to suggest some such notion as the above.
 
 "Since you see the young woman in so poetical a light," replied she in
 the same tone, "you had better turn the affair into a ballad.  It is a
 grand subject, and worthy of supernatural machinery.  The storm, the
 startling knock at the door, the entrance of the sable knight
 Hollingsworth and this shadowy snow-maiden, who, precisely at the
 stroke of midnight, shall melt away at my feet in a pool of ice-cold
 water and give me my death with a pair of wet slippers!  And when the
 verses are written, and polished quite to your mind, I will favor you
 with my idea as to what the girl really is."
 
 "Pray let me have it now," said I; "it shall be woven into the ballad."
 
 "She is neither more nor less," answered Zenobia, "than a seamstress
 from the city; and she has probably no more transcendental purpose than
 to do my miscellaneous sewing, for I suppose she will hardly expect to
 make my dresses."
 
 "How can you decide upon her so easily?"  I inquired.
 
 "Oh, we women judge one another by tokens that escape the obtuseness of
 masculine perceptions!" said Zenobia.  "There is no proof which you
 would be likely to appreciate, except the needle marks on the tip of
 her forefinger.  Then, my supposition perfectly accounts for her
 paleness, her nervousness, and her wretched fragility.  Poor thing! She
 has been stifled with the heat of a salamander stove, in a small, close
 room, and has drunk coffee, and fed upon doughnuts, raisins, candy, and
 all such trash, till she is scarcely half alive; and so, as she has
 hardly any physique, a poet like Mr. Miles Coverdale may be allowed to
--**--**--
 the premises, had it possessed the oil-and-honey flow which the
 aborigines were so often happy in communicating to their local
 appellations; but it chanced to be a harsh, ill-connected, and
 interminable word, which seemed to fill the mouth with a mixture of
 very stiff clay and very crumbly pebbles.  Zenobia suggested "Sunny
 Glimpse," as expressive of a vista into a better system of society.
 This we turned over and over for a while, acknowledging its prettiness,
 but concluded it to be rather too fine and sentimental a name (a fault
 inevitable by literary ladies in such attempts) for sunburnt men to
 work under.  I ventured to whisper "Utopia," which, however, was
 unanimously scouted down, and the proposer very harshly maltreated, as
 if he had intended a latent satire.  Some were for calling our
 institution "The Oasis," in view of its being the one green spot in the
 moral sand-waste of the world; but others insisted on a proviso for
 reconsidering the matter at a twelvemonths' end, when a final decision
 might be had, whether to name it "The Oasis" or "Sahara."  So, at last,
 finding it impracticable to hammer out anything better, we resolved
 that the spot should still be Blithedale, as being of good augury
 enough.
 
 The evening wore on, and the outer solitude looked in upon us through
 the windows, gloomy, wild, and vague, like another state of existence,
 close beside the little sphere of warmth and light in which we were the
 prattlers and bustlers of a moment.  By and by the door was opened by
 Silas Foster, with a cotton handkerchief about his head, and a tallow
 candle in his hand.
 
 "Take my advice, brother farmers," said he, with a great, broad,
 bottomless yawn, "and get to bed as soon as you can.  I shall sound the
--**--**--
 really sick, we must take care of you."
 
 Accordingly he built a fire in my chamber, and, having little else to
 do while the snow lay on the ground, established himself as my nurse. A
 doctor was sent for, who, being homaeopathic, gave me as much medicine,
 in the course of a fortnight's attendance, as would have laid on the
 point of a needle.  They fed me on water-gruel, and I speedily became a
 skeleton above ground.  But, after all, I have many precious
 recollections connected with that fit of sickness.
 
 Hollingsworth's more than brotherly attendance gave me inexpressible
 comfort.  Most men--and certainly I could not always claim to be one of
 the exceptions--have a natural indifference, if not an absolutely
 hostile feeling, towards those whom disease, or weakness, or calamity
 of any kind causes to falter and faint amid the rude jostle of our
 selfish existence.  The education of Christianity, it is true, the
 sympathy of a like experience and the example of women, may soften and,
 possibly, subvert this ugly characteristic of our sex; but it is
 originally there, and has likewise its analogy in the practice of our
 brute brethren, who hunt the sick or disabled member of the herd from
 among them, as an enemy.  It is for this reason that the stricken deer
 goes apart, and the sick lion grimly withdraws himself into his den.
 Except in love, or the attachments of kindred, or other very long and
 habitual affection, we really have no tenderness.  But there was
 something of the woman moulded into the great, stalwart frame of
 Hollingsworth; nor was he ashamed of it, as men often are of what is
 best in them, nor seemed ever to know that there was such a soft place
 in his heart.  I knew it well, however, at that time, although
--**--**--
 the preceding one, it yet so assimilated its richness to the rich
 beauty of the woman, that I thought it the only flower fit to be worn;
 so fit, indeed, that Nature had evidently created this floral gem, in a
 happy exuberance, for the one purpose of worthily adorning Zenobia's
 head.  It might be that my feverish fantasies clustered themselves
 about this peculiarity, and caused it to look more gorgeous and
 wonderful than if beheld with temperate eyes.  In the height of my
 illness, as I well recollect, I went so far as to pronounce it
 preternatural.
 
 "Zenobia is an enchantress!" whispered I once to Hollingsworth.  "She
 is a sister of the Veiled Lady.  That flower in her hair is a talisman.
 If you were to snatch it away, she would vanish, or be transformed into
 something else."
 
 "What does he say?" asked Zenobia.
 
 "Nothing that has an atom of sense in it," answered Hollingsworth. "He
 is a little beside himself, I believe, and talks about your being a
 witch, and of some magical property in the flower that you wear in your
 hair."
 
 "It is an idea worthy of a feverish poet," said she, laughing rather
 compassionately, and taking out the flower.  "I scorn to owe anything
 to magic.  Here, Mr. Hollingsworth, you may keep the spell while it has
 any virtue in it; but I cannot promise you not to appear with a new one
 to-morrow.  It is the one relic of my more brilliant, my happier days!"
 
 The most curious part of the matter was that, long after my slight
 delirium had passed away,--as long, indeed, as I continued to know this
 remarkable woman,--her daily flower affected my imagination, though
 more slightly, yet in very much the same way.  The reason must have
 been that, whether intentionally on her part or not, this favorite
--**--**--
 but sometimes truth.  The spheres of our companions have, at such
 periods, a vastly greater influence upon our own than when robust
 health gives us a repellent and self-defensive energy. Zenobia's
 sphere, I imagine, impressed itself powerfully on mine, and transformed
 me, during this period of my weakness, into something like a mesmerical
 clairvoyant.
 
 Then, also, as anybody could observe, the freedom of her deportment
 (though, to some tastes, it might commend itself as the utmost
 perfection of manner in a youthful widow or a blooming matron) was not
 exactly maiden-like.  What girl had ever laughed as Zenobia did? What
 girl had ever spoken in her mellow tones?  Her unconstrained and
 inevitable manifestation, I said often to myself, was that of a woman
 to whom wedlock had thrown wide the gates of mystery.  Yet sometimes I
 strove to be ashamed of these conjectures.  I acknowledged it as a
 masculine grossness--a sin of wicked interpretation, of which man is
 often guilty towards the other sex--thus to mistake the sweet, liberal,
 but womanly frankness of a noble and generous disposition. Still, it
 was of no avail to reason with myself nor to upbraid myself.
 Pertinaciously the thought, "Zenobia is a wife; Zenobia has lived and
 loved!  There is no folded petal, no latent dewdrop, in this perfectly
 developed rose!"--irresistibly that thought drove out all other
 conclusions, as often as my mind reverted to the subject.
 
 Zenobia was conscious of my observation, though not, I presume, of the
 point to which it led me.
 
 "Mr. Coverdale," said she one day, as she saw me watching her, while
 she arranged my gruel on the table, "I have been exposed to a great
 deal of eye-shot in the few years of my mixing in the world, but never,
 I think, to precisely such glances as you are in the habit of favoring
--**--**--
 
 
 VII. THE CONVALESCENT
 
 As soon as my incommodities allowed me to think of past occurrences, I
 failed not to inquire what had become of the odd little guest whom
 Hollingsworth had been the medium of introducing among us.  It now
 appeared that poor Priscilla had not so literally fallen out of the
 clouds, as we were at first inclined to suppose.  A letter, which
 should have introduced her, had since been received from one of the
 city missionaries, containing a certificate of character and an
 allusion to circumstances which, in the writer's judgment, made it
 especially desirable that she should find shelter in our Community.
 There was a hint, not very intelligible, implying either that Priscilla
 had recently escaped from some particular peril or irksomeness of
 position, or else that she was still liable to this danger or
 difficulty, whatever it might be.  We should ill have deserved the
 reputation of a benevolent fraternity, had we hesitated to entertain a
 petitioner in such need, and so strongly recommended to our kindness;
 not to mention, moreover, that the strange maiden had set herself
 diligently to work, and was doing good service with her needle.  But a
 slight mist of uncertainty still floated about Priscilla, and kept her,
 as yet, from taking a very decided place among creatures of flesh and
 blood.
 
 The mysterious attraction, which, from her first entrance on our scene,
 she evinced for Zenobia, had lost nothing of its force.  I often heard
 her footsteps, soft and low, accompanying the light but decided tread
 of the latter up the staircase, stealing along the passage-way by her
 new friend's side, and pausing while Zenobia entered my chamber.
 Occasionally Zenobia would be a little annoyed by Priscilla's too close
 attendance.  In an authoritative and not very kindly tone, she would
--**--**--
 had drawn my notice.
 
 "Priscilla," I inquired, "did you ever see Miss Margaret Fuller?"
 
 "No," she answered.
 
 "Because," said I, "you reminded me of her just now,--and it happens,
 strangely enough, that this very letter is from her."
 
 Priscilla, for whatever reason, looked very much discomposed.
 
 "I wish people would not fancy such odd things in me!" she said rather
 petulantly.  "How could I possibly make myself resemble this lady
 merely by holding her letter in my hand?"
 
 "Certainly, Priscilla, it would puzzle me to explain it," I replied;
 "nor do I suppose that the letter had anything to do with it.  It was
 just a coincidence, nothing more."
 
 She hastened out of the room, and this was the last that I saw of
 Priscilla until I ceased to be an invalid.
 
 Being much alone during my recovery, I read interminably in Mr.
 Emerson's Essays, "The Dial," Carlyle's works, George Sand's romances
 (lent me by Zenobia), and other books which one or another of the
 brethren or sisterhood had brought with them.  Agreeing in little else,
 most of these utterances were like the cry of some solitary sentinel,
 whose station was on the outposts of the advance guard of human
 progression; or sometimes the voice came sadly from among the shattered
 ruins of the past, but yet had a hopeful echo in the future. They were
 well adapted (better, at least, than any other intellectual products,
 the volatile essence of which had heretofore tinctured a printed page)
 to pilgrims like ourselves, whose present bivouac was considerably
 further into the waste of chaos than any mortal army of crusaders had
 ever marched before.  Fourier's works, also, in a series of horribly
 tedious volumes, attracted a good deal of my attention, from the
 analogy which I could not but recognize between his system and our own.
--**--**--
 an intolerable bore.  Such prolonged fiddling upon one string--such
 multiform presentation of one idea!  His specific object (of which he
 made the public more than sufficiently aware, through the medium of
 lectures and pamphlets) was to obtain funds for the construction of an
 edifice, with a sort of collegiate endowment.  On this foundation he
 purposed to devote himself and a few disciples to the reform and mental
 culture of our criminal brethren.  His visionary edifice was
 Hollingsworth's one castle in the air; it was the material type in
 which his philanthropic dream strove to embody itself; and he made the
 scheme more definite, and caught hold of it the more strongly, and kept
 his clutch the more pertinaciously, by rendering it visible to the
 bodily eye.  I have seen him, a hundred times, with a pencil and sheet
 of paper, sketching the facade, the side-view, or the rear of the
 structure, or planning the internal arrangements, as lovingly as
 another man might plan those of the projected home where he meant to be
 happy with his wife and children. I have known him to begin a model of
 the building with little stones, gathered at the brookside, whither we
 had gone to cool ourselves in the sultry noon of haying-time.  Unlike
 all other ghosts, his spirit haunted an edifice, which, instead of
 being time-worn, and full of storied love, and joy, and sorrow, had
 never yet come into existence.
 
 "Dear friend," said I once to Hollingsworth, before leaving my
 sick-chamber, "I heartily wish that I could make your schemes my
 schemes, because it would be so great a happiness to find myself
 treading the same path with you.  But I am afraid there is not stuff in
 me stern enough for a philanthropist,--or not in this peculiar
 direction,--or, at all events, not solely in this.  Can you bear with
--**--**--
 subdued in tint and rather cool, but with a capacity of sunshine, and
 bringing us a few Alpine blossoms, as earnest of something richer,
 though hardly more beautiful, hereafter.  The best type of her is one
 of those anemones."
 
 "What I find most singular in Priscilla, as her health improves,"
 observed Zenobia, "is her wildness.  Such a quiet little body as she
 seemed, one would not have expected that.  Why, as we strolled the
 woods together, I could hardly keep her from scrambling up the trees,
 like a squirrel.  She has never before known what it is to live in the
 free air, and so it intoxicates her as if she were sipping wine. And
 she thinks it such a paradise here, and all of us, particularly Mr.
 Hollingsworth and myself, such angels!  It is quite ridiculous, and
 provokes one's malice almost, to see a creature so happy, especially a
 feminine creature."
 
 "They are always happier than male creatures," said I.
 
 "You must correct that opinion, Mr. Coverdale," replied Zenobia
 contemptuously, "or I shall think you lack the poetic insight.  Did you
 ever see a happy woman in your life?  Of course, I do not mean a girl,
 like Priscilla and a thousand others,--for they are all alike, while on
 the sunny side of experience,--but a grown woman.  How can she be
 happy, after discovering that fate has assigned her but one single
 event, which she must contrive to make the substance of her whole life?
 A man has his choice of innumerable events."
 
 "A woman, I suppose," answered I, "by constant repetition of her one
 event, may compensate for the lack of variety."
 
 "Indeed!" said Zenobia.
 
 While we were talking, Priscilla caught sight of Hollingsworth at a
 distance, in a blue frock, and with a hoe over his shoulder, returning
--**--**--
 greatly care--at least, I never did--for the written constitution under
 which our millennium had commenced.  My hope was, that, between theory
 and practice, a true and available mode of life might be struck out;
 and that, even should we ultimately fail, the months or years spent in
 the trial would not have been wasted, either as regarded passing
 enjoyment, or the experience which makes men wise.
 
 Arcadians though we were, our costume bore no resemblance to the
 beribboned doublets, silk breeches and stockings, and slippers fastened
 with artificial roses, that distinguish the pastoral people of poetry
 and the stage.  In outward show, I humbly conceive, we looked rather
 like a gang of beggars, or banditti, than either a company of honest
 laboring-men, or a conclave of philosophers. Whatever might be our
 points of difference, we all of us seemed to have come to Blithedale
 with the one thrifty and laudable idea of wearing out our old clothes.
 Such garments as had an airing, whenever we strode afield!  Coats with
 high collars and with no collars, broad-skirted or swallow-tailed, and
 with the waist at every point between the hip and arm-pit; pantaloons
 of a dozen successive epochs, and greatly defaced at the knees by the
 humiliations of the wearer before his lady-love,--in short, we were a
 living epitome of defunct fashions, and the very raggedest presentment
 of men who had seen better days.  It was gentility in tatters.  Often
 retaining a scholarlike or clerical air, you might have taken us for
 the denizens of Grub Street, intent on getting a comfortable livelihood
 by agricultural labor; or Coleridge's projected Pantisocracy in full
 experiment; or Candide and his motley associates at work in their
 cabbage garden; or anything else that was miserably out at elbows, and
 most clumsily patched in the rear.  We might have been sworn comrades
--**--**--
 solacing himself with the weed."
 
 "Your literature," continued Zenobia, apparently delighted with her
 description, "will be the 'Farmer's Almanac;' for I observe our friend
 Foster never gets so far as the newspaper.  When you happen to sit
 down, at odd moments, you will fall asleep, and make nasal proclamation
 of the fact, as he does; and invariably you must be jogged out of a
 nap, after supper, by the future Mrs. Coverdale, and persuaded to go
 regularly to bed.  And on Sundays, when you put on a blue coat with
 brass buttons, you will think of nothing else to do but to go and
 lounge over the stone walls and rail fences, and stare at the corn
 growing.  And you will look with a knowing eye at oxen, and will have a
 tendency to clamber over into pigsties, and feel of the hogs, and give
 a guess how much they will weigh after you shall have stuck and dressed
 them.  Already I have noticed you begin to speak through your nose, and
 with a drawl.  Pray, if you really did make any poetry to-day, let us
 hear it in that kind of utterance!"
 
 "Coverdale has given up making verses now," said Hollingsworth, who
 never had the slightest appreciation of my poetry.  "Just think of him
 penning a sonnet with a fist like that!  There is at least this good in
 a life of toil, that it takes the nonsense and fancy-work out of a man,
 and leaves nothing but what truly belongs to him.  If a farmer can make
 poetry at the plough-tail, it must be because his nature insists on it;
 and if that be the case, let him make it, in Heaven's name!"
 
 "And how is it with you?" asked Zenobia, in a different voice; for she
--**--**--
 When a young girl comes within the sphere of such a man, she is as
 perilously situated as the maiden whom, in the old classical myths, the
 people used to expose to a dragon.  If I had any duty whatever, in
 reference to Hollingsworth, it was to endeavor to save Priscilla from
 that kind of personal worship which her sex is generally prone to
 lavish upon saints and heroes.  It often requires but one smile out of
 the hero's eyes into the girl's or woman's heart, to transform this
 devotion, from a sentiment of the highest approval and confidence, into
 passionate love.  Now, Hollingsworth smiled much upon Priscilla,--more
 than upon any other person.  If she thought him beautiful, it was no
 wonder.  I often thought him so, with the expression of tender human
 care and gentlest sympathy which she alone seemed to have power to call
 out upon his features.  Zenobia, I suspect, would have given her eyes,
 bright as they were, for such a look; it was the least that our poor
 Priscilla could do, to give her heart for a great many of them.  There
 was the more danger of this, inasmuch as the footing on which we all
 associated at Blithedale was widely different from that of conventional
 society.  While inclining us to the soft affections of the golden age,
 it seemed to authorize any individual, of either sex, to fall in love
 with any other, regardless of what would elsewhere be judged suitable
 and prudent. Accordingly the tender passion was very rife among us, in
 various degrees of mildness or virulence, but mostly passing away with
 the state of things that had given it origin.  This was all well
 enough; but, for a girl like Priscilla and a woman like Zenobia to
 jostle one another in their love of a man like Hollingsworth, was
--**--**--
 listening to a distant voice.
 
 "For my part," I continued, beneficently seeking to overshadow her with
 my own sombre humor, "my past life has been a tiresome one enough; yet
 I would rather look backward ten times than forward once. For, little
 as we know of our life to come, we may be very sure, for one thing,
 that the good we aim at will not be attained.  People never do get just
 the good they seek.  If it come at all, it is something else, which
 they never dreamed of, and did not particularly want.  Then, again, we
 may rest certain that our friends of to-day will not be our friends of
 a few years hence; but, if we keep one of them, it will be at the
 expense of the others; and most probably we shall keep none.  To be
 sure, there are more to be had; but who cares about making a new set of
 friends, even should they be better than those around us?"
 
 "Not I!" said Priscilla.  "I will live and die with these!"
 
 "Well; but let the future go," resumed I. "As for the present moment,
 if we could look into the hearts where we wish to be most valued, what
 should you expect to see?  One's own likeness, in the innermost,
 holiest niche?  Ah!  I don't know!  It may not be there at all.  It may
 be a dusty image, thrust aside into a corner, and by and by to be flung
 out of doors, where any foot may trample upon it.  If not to-day, then
 to-morrow!  And so, Priscilla, I do not see much wisdom in being so
 very merry in this kind of a world."
 
 It had taken me nearly seven years of worldly life to hive up the
 bitter honey which I here offered to Priscilla.  And she rejected it!
--**--**--
 have been valuable while new.  And she seemed ready to fling it away as
 uncalculatingly as Priscilla herself.  I could not but suspect that, if
 merely at play with Hollingsworth, she was sporting with a power which
 she did not fully estimate.  Or if in earnest, it might chance, between
 Zenobia's passionate force and his dark, self-delusive egotism, to turn
 out such earnest as would develop itself in some sufficiently tragic
 catastrophe, though the dagger and the bowl should go for nothing in it.
 
 Meantime, the gossip of the Community set them down as a pair of
 lovers.  They took walks together, and were not seldom encountered in
 the wood-paths: Hollingsworth deeply discoursing, in tones solemn and
 sternly pathetic; Zenobia, with a rich glow on her cheeks, and her eyes
 softened from their ordinary brightness, looked so beautiful, that had
 her companion been ten times a philanthropist, it seemed impossible but
 that one glance should melt him back into a man. Oftener than anywhere
 else, they went to a certain point on the slope of a pasture,
 commanding nearly the whole of our own domain, besides a view of the
 river, and an airy prospect of many distant hills.  The bond of our
 Community was such, that the members had the privilege of building
 cottages for their own residence within our precincts, thus laying a
 hearthstone and fencing in a home private and peculiar to all desirable
 extent, while yet the inhabitants should continue to share the
 advantages of an associated life.  It was inferred that Hollingsworth
 and Zenobia intended to rear their dwelling on this favorite spot.
 
 I mentioned those rumors to Hollingsworth in a playful way.
 
 "Had you consulted me," I went on to observe, "I should have
 recommended a site farther to the left, just a little withdrawn into
--**--**--
 
 "Ah, thank you," said our guest.  "Yes, Mr. Coverdale, I used to sell a
 good many of those little purses."
 
 He spoke languidly, and only those few words, like a watch with an
 inelastic spring, that just ticks a moment or two and stops again. He
 seemed a very forlorn old man.  In the wantonness of youth, strength,
 and comfortable condition,--making my prey of people's individualities,
 as my custom was,--I tried to identify my mind with the old fellow's,
 and take his view of the world, as if looking through a smoke-blackened
 glass at the sun.  It robbed the landscape of all its life.  Those
 pleasantly swelling slopes of our farm, descending towards the wide
 meadows, through which sluggishly circled the brimful tide of the
 Charles, bathing the long sedges on its hither and farther shores; the
 broad, sunny gleam over the winding water; that peculiar
 picturesqueness of the scene where capes and headlands put themselves
 boldly forth upon the perfect level of the meadow, as into a green
 lake, with inlets between the promontories; the shadowy woodland, with
 twinkling showers of light falling into its depths; the sultry
 heat-vapor, which rose everywhere like incense, and in which my soul
 delighted, as indicating so rich a fervor in the passionate day, and in
 the earth that was burning with its love,--I beheld all these things as
 through old Moodie's eyes.  When my eyes are dimmer than they have yet
 come to be, I will go thither again, and see if I did not catch the
 tone of his mind aright, and if the cold and lifeless tint of his
 perceptions be not then repeated in my own.
 
 Yet it was unaccountable to myself, the interest that I felt in him.
 
 "Have you any objection," said I, "to telling me who made those little
--**--**--
 
 "Mr. Hollingsworth!" said the old man in his hesitating way.
 
 "Well," answered Hollingsworth.
 
 "Has there been any call for Priscilla?" asked Moodie; and though his
 face was hidden from us, his tone gave a sure indication of the
 mysterious nod and wink with which he put the question.  "You know, I
 think, sir, what I mean."
 
 "I have not the remotest suspicion what you mean, Mr. Moodie," replied
 Hollingsworth; "nobody, to my knowledge, has called for Priscilla,
 except yourself.  But come; we are losing time, and I have several
 things to say to you by the way."
 
 "And, Mr. Hollingsworth!" repeated Moodie.
 
 "Well, again!" cried my friend rather impatiently.  "What now?"
 
 "There is a lady here," said the old man; and his voice lost some of
 its wearisome hesitation.  "You will account it a very strange matter
 for me to talk about; but I chanced to know this lady when she was but
 a little child.  If I am rightly informed, she has grown to be a very
 fine woman, and makes a brilliant figure in the world, with her beauty,
 and her talents, and her noble way of spending her riches.  I should
 recognize this lady, so people tell me, by a magnificent flower in her
 hair."
 
 "What a rich tinge it gives to his colorless ideas, when he speaks of
 Zenobia!"  I whispered to Hollingsworth.  "But how can there possibly
 be any interest or connecting link between him and her?"
 
 "The old man, for years past," whispered Hollingsworth, "has been a
 little out of his right mind, as you probably see."
 
 "What I would inquire," resumed Moodie, "is whether this beautiful lady
 is kind to my poor Priscilla."
 
 "Very kind," said Hollingsworth.
 
 "Does she love her?" asked Moodie.
 
 "It should seem so," answered my friend.  "They are always together."
--**--**--
 shook his uplifted staff.
 
 
 
 XI. THE WOOD-PATH
 
 Not long after the preceding incident, in order to get the ache of too
 constant labor out of my bones, and to relieve my spirit of the
 irksomeness of a settled routine, I took a holiday.  It was my purpose
 to spend it all alone, from breakfast-time till twilight, in the
 deepest wood-seclusion that lay anywhere around us.  Though fond of
 society, I was so constituted as to need these occasional retirements,
 even in a life like that of Blithedale, which was itself characterized
 by a remoteness from the world.  Unless renewed by a yet further
 withdrawal towards the inner circle of self-communion, I lost the
 better part of my individuality.  My thoughts became of little worth,
 and my sensibilities grew as arid as a tuft of moss (a thing whose life
 is in the shade, the rain, or the noontide dew), crumbling in the
 sunshine after long expectance of a shower.  So, with my heart full of
 a drowsy pleasure, and cautious not to dissipate my mood by previous
 intercourse with any one, I hurried away, and was soon pacing a
 wood-path, arched overhead with boughs, and dusky-brown beneath my feet.
 
 At first I walked very swiftly, as if the heavy flood tide of social
 life were roaring at my heels, and would outstrip and overwhelm me,
 without all the better diligence in my escape.  But, threading the more
 distant windings of the track, I abated my pace, and looked about me
 for some side-aisle, that should admit me into the innermost sanctuary
 of this green cathedral, just as, in human acquaintanceship, a casual
 opening sometimes lets us, all of a sudden, into the long-sought
 intimacy of a mysterious heart.  So much was I absorbed in my
 reflections,--or, rather, in my mood, the substance of which was as yet
--**--**--
 vulgar.  But he had no fineness of nature; there was in his eyes
 (although they might have artifice enough of another sort) the naked
 exposure of something that ought not to be left prominent.  With these
 vague allusions to what I have seen in other faces as well as his, I
 leave the quality to be comprehended best--because with an intuitive
 repugnance--by those who possess least of it.
 
 His hair, as well as his beard and mustache, was coal-black; his eyes,
 too, were black and sparkling, and his teeth remarkably brilliant. He
 was rather carelessly but well and fashionably dressed, in a
 summer-morning costume.  There was a gold chain, exquisitely wrought,
 across his vest.  I never saw a smoother or whiter gloss than that upon
 his shirt-bosom, which had a pin in it, set with a gem that glimmered,
 in the leafy shadow where he stood, like a living tip of fire.  He
 carried a stick with a wooden head, carved in vivid imitation of that
 of a serpent.  I hated him, partly, I do believe, from a comparison of
 my own homely garb with his well-ordered foppishness.
 
 "Well, sir," said I, a little ashamed of my first irritation, but still
 with no waste of civility, "be pleased to speak at once, as I have my
 own business in hand."
 
 "I regret that my mode of addressing you was a little unfortunate,"
 said the stranger, smiling; for he seemed a very acute sort of person,
 and saw, in some degree, how I stood affected towards him.  "I intended
 no offence, and shall certainly comport myself with due ceremony
 hereafter.  I merely wish to make a few inquiries respecting a lady,
 formerly of my acquaintance, who is now resident in your Community,
 and, I believe, largely concerned in your social enterprise.  You call
--**--**--
 take a peculiar interest.  She is one of those delicate, nervous young
 creatures, not uncommon in New England, and whom I suppose to have
 become what we find them by the gradual refining away of the physical
 system among your women.  Some philosophers choose to glorify this
 habit of body by terming it spiritual; but, in my opinion, it is rather
 the effect of unwholesome food, bad air, lack of outdoor exercise, and
 neglect of bathing, on the part of these damsels and their female
 progenitors, all resulting in a kind of hereditary dyspepsia.  Zenobia,
 even with her uncomfortable surplus of vitality, is far the better
 model of womanhood.  But--to revert again to this young person--she
 goes among you by the name of Priscilla.  Could you possibly afford me
 the means of speaking with her?"
 
 "You have made so many inquiries of me," I observed, "that I may at
 least trouble you with one.  What is your name?"
 
 He offered me a card, with "Professor Westervelt" engraved on it.  At
 the same time, as if to vindicate his claim to the professorial
 dignity, so often assumed on very questionable grounds, he put on a
 pair of spectacles, which so altered the character of his face that I
 hardly knew him again.  But I liked the present aspect no better than
 the former one.
 
 "I must decline any further connection with your affairs," said I,
 drawing back.  "I have told you where to find Zenobia.  As for
 Priscilla, she has closer friends than myself, through whom, if they
 see fit, you can gain access to her."
 
 "In that case," returned the Professor, ceremoniously raising his hat,
 "good-morning to you."
 
 He took his departure, and was soon out of sight among the windings of
 the wood-path.  But after a little reflection, I could not help
--**--**--
 Priscilla.
 
 "Tell her," said I, "that her fragile thread of life has inextricably
 knotted itself with other and tougher threads, and most likely it will
 be broken.  Tell her that Zenobia will not be long her friend. Say that
 Hollingsworth's heart is on fire with his own purpose, but icy for all
 human affection; and that, if she has given him her love, it is like
 casting a flower into a sepulchre.  And say that if any mortal really
 cares for her, it is myself; and not even I for her realities,--poor
 little seamstress, as Zenobia rightly called her!--but for the
 fancy-work with which I have idly decked her out!"
 
 The pleasant scent of the wood, evolved by the hot sun, stole up to my
 nostrils, as if I had been an idol in its niche.  Many trees mingled
 their fragrance into a thousand-fold odor.  Possibly there was a
 sensual influence in the broad light of noon that lay beneath me.  It
 may have been the cause, in part, that I suddenly found myself
 possessed by a mood of disbelief in moral beauty or heroism, and a
 conviction of the folly of attempting to benefit the world. Our
 especial scheme of reform, which, from my observatory, I could take in
 with the bodily eye, looked so ridiculous that it was impossible not to
 laugh aloud.
 
 "But the joke is a little too heavy," thought I. "If I were wise, I
 should get out of the scrape with all diligence, and then laugh at my
 companions for remaining in it."
 
 While thus musing, I heard with perfect distinctness, somewhere in the
 wood beneath, the peculiar laugh which I have described as one of the
 disagreeable characteristics of Professor Westervelt.  It brought my
 thoughts back to our recent interview.  I recognized as chiefly due to
--**--**--
 we subtilize them into something akin to imaginary stuff, and hardly
 capable of being distinguished from it.  In a few moments they were
 completely beyond ear-shot.  A breeze stirred after them, and awoke the
 leafy tongues of the surrounding trees, which forthwith began to
 babble, as if innumerable gossips had all at once got wind of Zenobia's
 secret.  But, as the breeze grew stronger, its voice among the branches
 was as if it said, "Hush!  Hush!" and I resolved that to no mortal
 would I disclose what I had heard.  And, though there might be room for
 casuistry, such, I conceive, is the most equitable rule in all similar
 conjunctures.
 
 
 
 XIII. ZENOBIA'S LEGEND
 
 The illustrious Society of Blithedale, though it toiled in downright
 earnest for the good of mankind, yet not unfrequently illuminated its
 laborious life with an afternoon or evening of pastime.  Picnics under
 the trees were considerably in vogue; and, within doors, fragmentary
 bits of theatrical performance, such as single acts of tragedy or
 comedy, or dramatic proverbs and charades.  Zenobia, besides, was fond
 of giving us readings from Shakespeare, and often with a depth of
 tragic power, or breadth of comic effect, that made one feel it an
 intolerable wrong to the world that she did not at once go upon the
 stage.  Tableaux vivants were another of our occasional modes of
 amusement, in which scarlet shawls, old silken robes, ruffs, velvets,
 furs, and all kinds of miscellaneous trumpery converted our familiar
 companions into the people of a pictorial world.  We had been thus
 engaged on the evening after the incident narrated in the last chapter.
 Several splendid works of art--either arranged after engravings from
 the old masters, or original illustrations of scenes in history or
 romance--had been presented, and we were earnestly entreating Zenobia
 for more.
--**--**--
 the head of a skeleton; it was a monstrous visage, with snaky locks,
 like Medusa's, and one great red eye in the centre of the forehead.
 Again, it was affirmed that there was no single and unchangeable set of
 features beneath the veil; but that whosoever should be bold enough to
 lift it would behold the features of that person, in all the world, who
 was destined to be his fate; perhaps he would be greeted by the tender
 smile of the woman whom he loved, or, quite as probably, the deadly
 scowl of his bitterest enemy would throw a blight over his life.  They
 quoted, moreover, this startling explanation of the whole affair: that
 the magician who exhibited the Veiled Lady--and who, by the bye, was
 the handsomest man in the whole world--had bartered his own soul for
 seven years' possession of a familiar fiend, and that the last year of
 the contract was wearing towards its close.
 
 If it were worth our while, I could keep you till an hour beyond
 midnight listening to a thousand such absurdities as these.  But
 finally our friend Theodore, who prided himself upon his common-sense,
 found the matter getting quite beyond his patience.
 
 "I offer any wager you like," cried he, setting down his glass so
 forcibly as to break the stem of it, "that this very evening I find out
 the mystery of the Veiled Lady!"
 
 Young men, I am told, boggle at nothing over their wine; so, after a
 little more talk, a wager of considerable amount was actually laid, the
 money staked, and Theodore left to choose his own method of settling
 the dispute.
 
 How he managed it I know not, nor is it of any great importance to this
 veracious legend.  The most natural way, to be sure, was by bribing the
--**--**--
 And Theodore, partly recovering his audacity, stept forward on the
 instant, to do as the Veiled Lady had suggested.  But she floated
 backward to the opposite side of the room, as if the young man's breath
 had possessed power enough to waft her away.
 
 "Pause, one little instant," said the soft, low voice, "and learn the
 conditions of what thou art so bold to undertake.  Thou canst go hence,
 and think of me no more; or, at thy option, thou canst lift this
 mysterious veil, beneath which I am a sad and lonely prisoner, in a
 bondage which is worse to me than death.  But, before raising it, I
 entreat thee, in all maiden modesty, to bend forward and impress a kiss
 where my breath stirs the veil; and my virgin lips shall come forward
 to meet thy lips; and from that instant, Theodore, thou shalt be mine,
 and I thine, with never more a veil between us.  And all the felicity
 of earth and of the future world shall be thine and mine together.  So
 much may a maiden say behind the veil.  If thou shrinkest from this,
 there is yet another way."  "And what is that?" asked Theodore.  "Dost
 thou hesitate," said the Veiled Lady, "to pledge thyself to me, by
 meeting these lips of mine, while the veil yet hides my face?  Has not
 thy heart recognized me?  Dost thou come hither, not in holy faith, nor
 with a pure and generous purpose, but in scornful scepticism and idle
 curiosity?  Still, thou mayest lift the veil!  But, from that instant,
 Theodore, I am doomed to be thy evil fate; nor wilt thou ever taste
 another breath of happiness!"
 
 There was a shade of inexpressible sadness in the utterance of these
 last words.  But Theodore, whose natural tendency was towards
--**--**--
 attached herself.
 
 But one morning the lady was wandering in the woods, and there met her
 a figure in an Oriental robe, with a dark beard, and holding in his
 hand a silvery veil.  He motioned her to stay.  Being a woman of some
 nerve, she did not shriek, nor run away, nor faint, as many ladies
 would have been apt to do, but stood quietly, and bade him speak.  The
 truth was, she had seen his face before, but had never feared it,
 although she knew him to be a terrible magician.
 
 "Lady," said he, with a warning gesture, "you are in peril!"  "Peril!"
 she exclaimed.  "And of what nature?"
 
 "There is a certain maiden," replied the magician, "who has come out of
 the realm of mystery, and made herself your most intimate companion.
 Now, the fates have so ordained it, that, whether by her own will or
 no, this stranger is your deadliest enemy.  In love, in worldly
 fortune, in all your pursuit of happiness, she is doomed to fling a
 blight over your prospects.  There is but one possibility of thwarting
 her disastrous influence."
 
 "Then tell me that one method," said the lady.
 
 "Take this veil," he answered, holding forth the silvery texture. "It
 is a spell; it is a powerful enchantment, which I wrought for her sake,
 and beneath which she was once my prisoner.  Throw it, at unawares,
 over the head of this secret foe, stamp your foot, and cry, 'Arise,
 Magician!  Here is the Veiled Lady!' and immediately I will rise up
 through the earth, and seize her; and from that moment you are safe!"
 
 So the lady took the silvery veil, which was like woven air, or like
 some substance airier than nothing, and that would float upward and be
 lost among the clouds, were she once to let it go.  Returning homeward,
--**--**--
 
 "How do you find yourself, my love?" said Zenobia, lifting a corner of
 the gauze, and peeping beneath it with a mischievous smile.  "Ah, the
 dear little soul!  Why, she is really going to faint!  Mr. Coverdale,
 Mr. Coverdale, pray bring a glass of water!"
 
 Her nerves being none of the strongest, Priscilla hardly recovered her
 equanimity during the rest of the evening.  This, to be sure, was a
 great pity; but, nevertheless, we thought it a very bright idea of
 Zenobia's to bring her legend to so effective a conclusion.
 
 
 
 XIV. ELIOT'S PULPIT
 
 Our Sundays at Blithedale were not ordinarily kept with such rigid
 observance as might have befitted the descendants of the Pilgrims,
 whose high enterprise, as we sometimes flattered ourselves, we had
 taken up, and were carrying it onward and aloft, to a point which they
 never dreamed of attaining.
 
 On that hallowed day, it is true, we rested from our labors.  Our oxen,
 relieved from their week-day yoke, roamed at large through the pasture;
 each yoke-fellow, however, keeping close beside his mate, and
 continuing to acknowledge, from the force of habit and sluggish
 sympathy, the union which the taskmaster had imposed for his own hard
 ends.  As for us human yoke-fellows, chosen companions of toil, whose
 hoes had clinked together throughout the week, we wandered off, in
 various directions, to enjoy our interval of repose.  Some, I believe,
 went devoutly to the village church.  Others, it may be, ascended a
 city or a country pulpit, wearing the clerical robe with so much
 dignity that you would scarcely have suspected the yeoman's frock to
 have been flung off only since milking-time.  Others took long rambles
 among the rustic lanes and by-paths, pausing to look at black old
 farmhouses, with their sloping roofs; and at the modern cottage, so
--**--**--
 with the fullest welcome, their natural utterance in public.
 
 "It shall not always be so!" cried she.  "If I live another year, I
 will lift up my own voice in behalf of woman's wider liberty!"
 
 She perhaps saw me smile.
 
 "What matter of ridicule do you find in this, Miles Coverdale?"
 exclaimed Zenobia, with a flash of anger in her eyes.  "That smile,
 permit me to say, makes me suspicious of a low tone of feeling and
 shallow thought.  It is my belief--yes, and my prophecy, should I die
 before it happens--that, when my sex shall achieve its rights, there
 will be ten eloquent women where there is now one eloquent man.  Thus
 far, no woman in the world has ever once spoken out her whole heart and
 her whole mind.  The mistrust and disapproval of the vast bulk of
 society throttles us, as with two gigantic hands at our throats!  We
 mumble a few weak words, and leave a thousand better ones unsaid. You
 let us write a little, it is true, on a limited range of subjects. But
 the pen is not for woman.  Her power is too natural and immediate.  It
 is with the living voice alone that she can compel the world to
 recognize the light of her intellect and the depth of her heart!"
 
 Now,--though I could not well say so to Zenobia,--I had not smiled from
 any unworthy estimate of woman, or in denial of the claims which she is
 beginning to put forth.  What amused and puzzled me was the fact, that
 women, however intellectually superior, so seldom disquiet themselves
 about the rights or wrongs of their sex, unless their own individual
 affections chance to lie in idleness, or to be ill at ease. They are
 not natural reformers, but become such by the pressure of exceptional
--**--**--
 I looked at Zenobia, however, fully expecting her to resent--as I felt,
 by the indignant ebullition of my own blood, that she ought this
 outrageous affirmation of what struck me as the intensity of masculine
 egotism.  It centred everything in itself, and deprived woman of her
 very soul, her inexpressible and unfathomable all, to make it a mere
 incident in the great sum of man.  Hollingsworth had boldly uttered
 what he, and millions of despots like him, really felt. Without
 intending it, he had disclosed the wellspring of all these troubled
 waters.  Now, if ever, it surely behooved Zenobia to be the champion of
 her sex.
 
 But, to my surprise, and indignation too, she only looked humbled. Some
 tears sparkled in her eyes, but they were wholly of grief, not anger.
 
 "Well, be it so," was all she said.  "I, at least, have deep cause to
 think you right.  Let man be but manly and godlike, and woman is only
 too ready to become to him what you say!"
 
 I smiled--somewhat bitterly, it is true--in contemplation of my own
 ill-luck.  How little did these two women care for me, who had freely
 conceded all their claims, and a great deal more, out of the fulness of
 my heart; while Hollingsworth, by some necromancy of his horrible
 injustice, seemed to have brought them both to his feet!
 
 "Women almost invariably behave thus," thought I. "What does the fact
 mean?  Is it their nature?  Or is it, at last, the result of ages of
 compelled degradation?  And, in either case, will it be possible ever
 to redeem them?"
 
 An intuition now appeared to possess all the party, that, for this
 time, at least, there was no more to be said.  With one accord, we
 arose from the ground, and made our way through the tangled undergrowth
--**--**--
 many people in the world mistrust him,--so many disbelieve and
 ridicule, while hardly any do him justice, or acknowledge him for the
 wonderful man he is,--that it is really a blessed thing for him to have
 won the sympathy of such a woman as Zenobia.  Any man might be proud of
 that.  Any man, even if he be as great as Hollingsworth, might love so
 magnificent a woman.  How very beautiful Zenobia is!  And Hollingsworth
 knows it, too."
 
 There may have been some petty malice in what I said.  Generosity is a
 very fine thing, at a proper time and within due limits.  But it is an
 insufferable bore to see one man engrossing every thought of all the
 women, and leaving his friend to shiver in outer seclusion, without
 even the alternative of solacing himself with what the more fortunate
 individual has rejected.  Yes, it was out of a foolish bitterness of
 heart that I had spoken.
 
 "Go on before," said Priscilla abruptly, and with true feminine
 imperiousness, which heretofore I had never seen her exercise.  "It
 pleases me best to loiter along by myself.  I do not walk so fast as
 you."
 
 With her hand she made a little gesture of dismissal.  It provoked me;
 yet, on the whole, was the most bewitching thing that Priscilla had
 ever done.  I obeyed her, and strolled moodily homeward, wondering--as
 I had wondered a thousand times already--how Hollingsworth meant to
 dispose of these two hearts, which (plainly to my perception, and, as I
 could not but now suppose, to his) he had engrossed into his own huge
 egotism.
 
 There was likewise another subject hardly less fruitful of speculation.
 In what attitude did Zenobia present herself to Hollingsworth?  Was it
 in that of a free woman, with no mortgage on her affections nor
--**--**--
 will be no harm) out of our severe trials and hardships. In a century
 or two, we shall, every one of us, be mythical personages, or
 exceedingly picturesque and poetical ones, at all events.  They will
 have a great public hall, in which your portrait, and mine, and twenty
 other faces that are living now, shall be hung up; and as for me, I
 will be painted in my shirtsleeves, and with the sleeves rolled up, to
 show my muscular development.  What stories will be rife among them
 about our mighty strength!" continued I, lifting a big stone and
 putting it into its place, "though our posterity will really be far
 stronger than ourselves, after several generations of a simple,
 natural, and active life.  What legends of Zenobia's beauty, and
 Priscilla's slender and shadowy grace, and those mysterious qualities
 which make her seem diaphanous with spiritual light!  In due course of
 ages, we must all figure heroically in an epic poem; and we will
 ourselves--at least, I will--bend unseen over the future poet, and lend
 him inspiration while he writes it."
 
 "You seem," said Hollingsworth, "to be trying how much nonsense you can
 pour out in a breath."
 
 "I wish you would see fit to comprehend," retorted I, "that the
 profoundest wisdom must be mingled with nine tenths of nonsense, else
 it is not worth the breath that utters it.  But I do long for the
 cottages to be built, that the creeping plants may begin to run over
 them, and the moss to gather on the walls, and the trees--which we will
 set out--to cover them with a breadth of shadow.  This spick-and-span
 novelty does not quite suit my taste.  It is time, too, for children to
 be born among us.  The first-born child is still to come.  And I shall
--**--**--
 
 "Why are you so secret in your operations?"  I asked.  "God forbid that
 I should accuse you of intentional wrong; but the besetting sin of a
 philanthropist, it appears to me, is apt to be a moral obliquity. His
 sense of honor ceases to be the sense of other honorable men. At some
 point of his course--I know not exactly when or where--he is tempted to
 palter with the right, and can scarcely forbear persuading himself that
 the importance of his public ends renders it allowable to throw aside
 his private conscience.  Oh, my dear friend, beware this error!  If you
 meditate the overthrow of this establishment, call together our
 companions, state your design, support it with all your eloquence, but
 allow them an opportunity of defending themselves."
 
 "It does not suit me," said Hollingsworth.  "Nor is it my duty to do
 so."
 
 "I think it is," replied I.
 
 Hollingsworth frowned; not in passion, but, like fate, inexorably.
 
 "I will not argue the point," said he.  "What I desire to know of you
 is,--and you can tell me in one word,--whether I am to look for your
 cooperation in this great scheme of good?  Take it up with me!  Be my
 brother in it!  It offers you (what you have told me, over and over
 again, that you most need) a purpose in life, worthy of the extremest
 self-devotion,--worthy of martyrdom, should God so order it!  In this
 view, I present it to you.  You can greatly benefit mankind.  Your
 peculiar faculties, as I shall direct them, are capable of being so
 wrought into this enterprise that not one of them need lie idle. Strike
 hands with me, and from this moment you shall never again feel the
 languor and vague wretchedness of an indolent or half-occupied man.
 There may be no more aimless beauty in your life; but, in its stead,
--**--**--
 addressing whatever is best and noblest in her."
 
 Hollingsworth was looking on the ground.  But, as he often did
 so,--generally, indeed, in his habitual moods of thought,--I could not
 judge whether it was from any special unwillingness now to meet my
 eyes.  What it was that dictated my next question, I cannot precisely
 say.  Nevertheless, it rose so inevitably into my mouth, and, as it
 were, asked itself so involuntarily, that there must needs have been an
 aptness in it.
 
 "What is to become of Priscilla?"
 
 Hollingsworth looked at me fiercely, and with glowing eyes.  He could
 not have shown any other kind of expression than that, had he meant to
 strike me with a sword.
 
 "Why do you bring in the names of these women?" said he, after a moment
 of pregnant silence.  "What have they to do with the proposal which I
 make you?  I must have your answer!  Will you devote yourself, and
 sacrifice all to this great end, and be my friend of friends forever?"
 
 "In Heaven's name, Hollingsworth," cried I, getting angry, and glad to
 be angry, because so only was it possible to oppose his tremendous
 concentrativeness and indomitable will, "cannot you conceive that a man
 may wish well to the world, and struggle for its good, on some other
 plan than precisely that which you have laid down?  And will you cast
 off a friend for no unworthiness, but merely because he stands upon his
 right as an individual being, and looks at matters through his own
 optics, instead of yours?"
 
 "Be with me," said Hollingsworth, "or be against me!  There is no third
 choice for you."
 
 "Take this, then, as my decision," I answered.  "I doubt the wisdom of
 your scheme.  Furthermore, I greatly fear that the methods by which you
--**--**--
 more!"  And were my life to be spent over again, I would invariably
 lend my ear to this Cassandra of the inward depths, however clamorous
 the music and the merriment of a more superficial region.
 
 My outbreak with Hollingsworth, though never definitely known to our
 associates, had really an effect upon the moral atmosphere of the
 Community.  It was incidental to the closeness of relationship into
 which we had brought ourselves, that an unfriendly state of feeling
 could not occur between any two members without the whole society being
 more or less commoted and made uncomfortable thereby.  This species of
 nervous sympathy (though a pretty characteristic enough, sentimentally
 considered, and apparently betokening an actual bond of love among us)
 was yet found rather inconvenient in its practical operation, mortal
 tempers being so infirm and variable as they are. If one of us happened
 to give his neighbor a box on the ear, the tingle was immediately felt
 on the same side of everybody's head. Thus, even on the supposition
 that we were far less quarrelsome than the rest of the world, a great
 deal of time was necessarily wasted in rubbing our ears.
 
 Musing on all these matters, I felt an inexpressible longing for at
 least a temporary novelty.  I thought of going across the Rocky
 Mountains, or to Europe, or up the Nile; of offering myself a volunteer
 on the Exploring Expedition; of taking a ramble of years, no matter in
 what direction, and coming back on the other side of the world.  Then,
 should the colonists of Blithedale have established their enterprise on
 a permanent basis, I might fling aside my pilgrim staff and dusty
 shoon, and rest as peacefully here as elsewhere.  Or, in case
 Hollingsworth should occupy the ground with his School of Reform, as he
--**--**--
 "I never wish to go away," said she.
 
 "I have sometimes thought," observed I, smiling, "that you, Priscilla,
 are a little prophetess, or, at least, that you have spiritual
 intimations respecting matters which are dark to us grosser people. If
 that be the case, I should like to ask you what is about to happen; for
 I am tormented with a strong foreboding that, were I to return even so
 soon as to-morrow morning, I should find everything changed. Have you
 any impressions of this nature?"
 
 "Ah, no," said Priscilla, looking at me apprehensively.  "If any such
 misfortune is coming, the shadow has not reached me yet.  Heaven
 forbid!  I should be glad if there might never be any change, but one
 summer follow another, and all just like this."
 
 "No summer ever came back, and no two summers ever were alike," said I,
 with a degree of Orphic wisdom that astonished myself.  "Times change,
 and people change; and if our hearts do not change as readily, so much
 the worse for us.  Good-by, Priscilla!"
 
 I gave her hand a pressure, which, I think, she neither resisted nor
 returned.  Priscilla's heart was deep, but of small compass; it had
 room but for a very few dearest ones, among whom she never reckoned me.
 
 On the doorstep I met Hollingsworth.  I had a momentary impulse to hold
 out my hand, or at least to give a parting nod, but resisted both.
 When a real and strong affection has come to an end, it is not well to
 mock the sacred past with any show of those commonplace civilities that
 belong to ordinary intercourse.  Being dead henceforth to him, and he
 to me, there could be no propriety in our chilling one another with the
 touch of two corpse-like hands, or playing at looks of courtesy with
--**--**--
 mosaic-work had lately been wrought into my life.  True, if you look at
 it in one way, it had been only a summer in the country.  But,
 considered in a profounder relation, it was part of another age, a
 different state of society, a segment of an existence peculiar in its
 aims and methods, a leaf of some mysterious volume interpolated into
 the current history which time was writing off.  At one moment, the
 very circumstances now surrounding me--my coal fire and the dingy room
 in the bustling hotel--appeared far off and intangible; the next
 instant Blithedale looked vague, as if it were at a distance both in
 time and space, and so shadowy that a question might be raised whether
 the whole affair had been anything more than the thoughts of a
 speculative man.  I had never before experienced a mood that so robbed
 the actual world of its solidity.  It nevertheless involved a charm, on
 which--a devoted epicure of my own emotions--I resolved to pause, and
 enjoy the moral sillabub until quite dissolved away.
 
 Whatever had been my taste for solitude and natural scenery, yet the
 thick, foggy, stifled element of cities, the entangled life of many men
 together, sordid as it was, and empty of the beautiful, took quite as
 strenuous a hold upon my mind.  I felt as if there could never be
 enough of it.  Each characteristic sound was too suggestive to be
 passed over unnoticed.  Beneath and around me, I heard the stir of the
 hotel; the loud voices of guests, landlord, or bar-keeper; steps
 echoing on the staircase; the ringing of a bell, announcing arrivals or
 departures; the porter lumbering past my door with baggage, which he
 thumped down upon the floors of neighboring chambers; the lighter feet
 of chambermaids scudding along the passages;--it is ridiculous to think
--**--**--
 From the upper story to the first floor, they were so much alike, that
 I could only conceive of the inhabitants as cut out on one identical
 pattern, like little wooden toy-people of German manufacture.  One
 long, united roof, with its thousands of slates glittering in the rain,
 extended over the whole.  After the distinctness of separate characters
 to which I had recently been accustomed, it perplexed and annoyed me
 not to be able to resolve this combination of human interests into
 well-defined elements.  It seemed hardly worth while for more than one
 of those families to be in existence, since they all had the same
 glimpse of the sky, all looked into the same area, all received just
 their equal share of sunshine through the front windows, and all
 listened to precisely the same noises of the street on which they
 boarded.  Men are so much alike in their nature, that they grow
 intolerable unless varied by their circumstances.
 
 Just about this time a waiter entered my room.  The truth was, I had
 rung the bell and ordered a sherry-cobbler.
 
 
 "Can you tell me," I inquired, "what families reside in any of those
 houses opposite?"
 
 "The one right opposite is a rather stylish boarding-house," said the
 waiter.  "Two of the gentlemen boarders keep horses at the stable of
 our establishment.  They do things in very good style, sir, the people
 that live there."
 
 I might have found out nearly as much for myself, on examining the
 house a little more closely, in one of the upper chambers I saw a young
 man in a dressing-gown, standing before the glass and brushing his hair
 for a quarter of an hour together.  He then spent an equal space of
 time in the elaborate arrangement of his cravat, and finally made his
--**--**--
 of her course, however, she swerved aside, flew upward, and vanished,
 as did, likewise, the slight, fantastic pathos with which I had
 invested her.
 
 
 
 XVIII. THE BOARDING-HOUSE
 
 The next day, as soon as I thought of looking again towards the
 opposite house, there sat the dove again, on the peak of the same
 dormer window!  It was by no means an early hour, for the preceding
 evening I had ultimately mustered enterprise enough to visit the
 theatre, had gone late to bed, and slept beyond all limit, in my
 remoteness from Silas Foster's awakening horn.  Dreams had tormented me
 throughout the night.  The train of thoughts which, for months past,
 had worn a track through my mind, and to escape which was one of my
 chief objects in leaving Blithedale, kept treading remorselessly to and
 fro in their old footsteps, while slumber left me impotent to regulate
 them.  It was not till I had quitted my three friends that they first
 began to encroach upon my dreams.  In those of the last night,
 Hollingsworth and Zenobia, standing on either side of my bed, had bent
 across it to exchange a kiss of passion. Priscilla, beholding
 this,--for she seemed to be peeping in at the chamber window,--had
 melted gradually away, and left only the sadness of her expression in
 my heart.  There it still lingered, after I awoke; one of those
 unreasonable sadnesses that you know not how to deal with, because it
 involves nothing for common-sense to clutch.
 
 It was a gray and dripping forenoon; gloomy enough in town, and still
 gloomier in the haunts to which my recollections persisted in
 transporting me.  For, in spite of my efforts to think of something
 else, I thought how the gusty rain was drifting over the slopes and
 valleys of our farm; how wet must be the foliage that overshadowed the
--**--**--
 consummating my escape, as I thought, from these goblins of flesh and
 blood, and pausing to revive myself with a breath or two of an
 atmosphere in which they should have no share,--it was a positive
 despair to find the same figures arraying themselves before me, and
 presenting their old problem in a shape that made it more insoluble
 than ever.
 
 I began to long for a catastrophe.  If the noble temper of
 Hollingsworth's soul were doomed to be utterly corrupted by the too
 powerful purpose which had grown out of what was noblest in him; if the
 rich and generous qualities of Zenobia's womanhood might not save her;
 if Priscilla must perish by her tenderness and faith, so simple and so
 devout, then be it so!  Let it all come!  As for me, I would look on,
 as it seemed my part to do, understandingly, if my intellect could
 fathom the meaning and the moral, and, at all events, reverently and
 sadly.  The curtain fallen, I would pass onward with my poor individual
 life, which was now attenuated of much of its proper substance, and
 diffused among many alien interests.
 
 Meanwhile, Zenobia and her companion had retreated from the window.
 Then followed an interval, during which I directed my eves towards the
 figure in the boudoir.  Most certainly it was Priscilla, although
 dressed with a novel and fanciful elegance.  The vague perception of
 it, as viewed so far off, impressed me as if she had suddenly passed
 out of a chrysalis state and put forth wings.  Her hands were not now
 in motion.  She had dropt her work, and sat with her head thrown back,
 in the same attitude that I had seen several times before, when she
 seemed to be listening to an imperfectly distinguished sound.
 
 Again the two figures in the drawing-room became visible.  They were
--**--**--
 between a character like hers and a perceptive faculty like mine.  For,
 was mine a mere vulgar curiosity? Zenobia should have known me better
 than to suppose it.  She should have been able to appreciate that
 quality of the intellect and the heart which impelled me (often against
 my own will, and to the detriment of my own comfort) to live in other
 lives, and to endeavor--by generous sympathies, by delicate intuitions,
 by taking note of things too slight for record, and by bringing my
 human spirit into manifold accordance with the companions whom God
 assigned me--to learn the secret which was hidden even from themselves.
 
 Of all possible observers, methought a woman like Zenobia and a man
 like Hollingsworth should have selected me.  And now when the event has
 long been past, I retain the same opinion of my fitness for the office.
 True, I might have condemned them.  Had I been judge as well as
 witness, my sentence might have been stern as that of destiny itself.
 But, still, no trait of original nobility of character, no struggle
 against temptation,--no iron necessity of will, on the one hand, nor
 extenuating circumstance to be derived from passion and despair, on the
 other,--no remorse that might coexist with error, even if powerless to
 prevent it,--no proud repentance that should claim retribution as a
 meed,--would go unappreciated.  True, again, I might give my full
 assent to the punishment which was sure to follow. But it would be
 given mournfully, and with undiminished love.  And, after all was
 finished, I would come as if to gather up the white ashes of those who
 had perished at the stake, and to tell the world--the wrong being now
 atoned for--how much had perished there which it had never yet known
 how to praise.
--**--**--
 characteristic flower, though it seemed to be still there, had
 undergone a cold and bright transfiguration; it was a flower
 exquisitely imitated in jeweller's work, and imparting the last touch
 that transformed Zenobia into a work of art.
 
 "I scarcely feel," I could not forbear saying, "as if we had ever met
 before.  How many years ago it seems since we last sat beneath Eliot's
 pulpit, with Hollingsworth extended on the fallen leaves, and Priscilla
 at his feet!  Can it be, Zenobia, that you ever really numbered
 yourself with our little band of earnest, thoughtful, philanthropic
 laborers?"
 
 "Those ideas have their time and place," she answered coldly.  "But I
 fancy it must be a very circumscribed mind that can find room for no
 other."
 
 Her manner bewildered me.  Literally, moreover, I was dazzled by the
 brilliancy of the room.  A chandelier hung down in the centre, glowing
 with I know not how many lights; there were separate lamps, also, on
 two or three tables, and on marble brackets, adding their white
 radiance to that of the chandelier.  The furniture was exceedingly
 rich.  Fresh from our old farmhouse, with its homely board and benches
 in the dining-room, and a few wicker chairs in the best parlor, it
 struck me that here was the fulfilment of every fantasy of an
 imagination revelling in various methods of costly self-indulgence and
 splendid ease.  Pictures, marbles, vases,--in brief, more shapes of
 luxury than there could be any object in enumerating, except for an
 auctioneer's advertisement,--and the whole repeated and doubled by the
 reflection of a great mirror, which showed me Zenobia's proud figure,
 likewise, and my own.  It cost me, I acknowledge, a bitter sense of
 shame, to perceive in myself a positive effort to bear up against the
 effect which Zenobia sought to impose on me.  I reasoned against her,
--**--**--
 that I condemn those who give themselves up to it more entirely than I,
 for myself, should deem it wise to do."
 
 It irritated me, this self-complacent, condescending, qualified
 approval and criticism of a system to which many individuals--perhaps
 as highly endowed as our gorgeous Zenobia--had contributed their all of
 earthly endeavor, and their loftiest aspirations.  I determined to make
 proof if there were any spell that would exorcise her out of the part
 which she seemed to be acting.  She should be compelled to give me a
 glimpse of something true; some nature, some passion, no matter whether
 right or wrong, provided it were real.
 
 "Your allusion to that class of circumscribed characters who can live
 only in one mode of life," remarked I coolly, "reminds me of our poor
 friend Hollingsworth.  Possibly he was in your thoughts when you spoke
 thus.  Poor fellow!  It is a pity that, by the fault of a narrow
 education, he should have so completely immolated himself to that one
 idea of his, especially as the slightest modicum of common-sense would
 teach him its utter impracticability.  Now that I have returned into
 the world, and can look at his project from a distance, it requires
 quite all my real regard for this respectable and well-intentioned man
 to prevent me laughing at him,--as I find society at large does."
 
 Zenobia's eyes darted lightning, her cheeks flushed, the vividness of
 her expression was like the effect of a powerful light flaming up
 suddenly within her.  My experiment had fully succeeded.  She had shown
 me the true flesh and blood of her heart, by thus involuntarily
 resenting my slight, pitying, half-kind, half-scornful mention of the
 man who was all in all with her.  She herself probably felt this; for
 it was hardly a moment before she tranquillized her uneven breath, and
--**--**--
 "Oh, there is substance in these fingers of mine," she answered, giving
 my hand the faintest possible pressure, and then taking away her own.
 "Why do you call me a dream?  Zenobia is much more like one than I; she
 is so very, very beautiful!  And, I suppose," added Priscilla, as if
 thinking aloud, "everybody sees it, as I do."
 
 But, for my part, it was Priscilla's beauty, not Zenobia's, of which I
 was thinking at that moment.  She was a person who could be quite
 obliterated, so far as beauty went, by anything unsuitable in her
 attire; her charm was not positive and material enough to bear up
 against a mistaken choice of color, for instance, or fashion.  It was
 safest, in her case, to attempt no art of dress; for it demanded the
 most perfect taste, or else the happiest accident in the world, to give
 her precisely the adornment which she needed.  She was now dressed in
 pure white, set off with some kind of a gauzy fabric, which--as I bring
 up her figure in my memory, with a faint gleam on her shadowy hair, and
 her dark eyes bent shyly on mine, through all the vanished years--seems
 to be floating about her like a mist.  I wondered what Zenobia meant by
 evolving so much loveliness out of this poor girl.  It was what few
 women could afford to do; for, as I looked from one to the other, the
 sheen and splendor of Zenobia's presence took nothing from Priscilla's
 softer spell, if it might not rather be thought to add to it.
 
 "What do you think of her?" asked Zenobia.
 
 I could not understand the look of melancholy kindness with which
 Zenobia regarded her.  She advanced a step, and beckoning Priscilla
 near her, kissed her cheek; then, with a slight gesture of repulse, she
--**--**--
 
 As I spoke the word, a carriage had rumbled along the street, and stopt
 before the house.  The doorbell rang, and steps were immediately
 afterwards heard on the staircase.  Zenobia had thrown a shawl over her
 dress.
 
 "Mr. Coverdale," said she, with cool courtesy, "you will perhaps excuse
 us.  We have an engagement, and are going out."
 
 "Whither?"  I demanded.
 
 "Is not that a little more than you are entitled to inquire?" said she,
 with a smile.  "At all events, it does not suit me to tell you."
 
 The door of the drawing-room opened, and Westervelt appeared.  I
 observed that he was elaborately dressed, as if for some grand
 entertainment.  My dislike for this man was infinite.  At that moment
 it amounted to nothing less than a creeping of the flesh, as when,
 feeling about in a dark place, one touches something cold and slimy,
 and questions what the secret hatefulness may be.  And still I could
 not but acknowledge that, for personal beauty, for polish of manner,
 for all that externally befits a gentleman, there was hardly another
 like him.  After bowing to Zenobia, and graciously saluting Priscilla
 in her corner, he recognized me by a slight but courteous inclination.
 
 "Come, Priscilla," said Zenobia; "it is time.  Mr. Coverdale,
 good-evening."
 
 As Priscilla moved slowly forward, I met her in the middle of the
 drawing-room.
 
 "Priscilla," said I, in the hearing of them all, "do you know whither
 you are going?"
 
 "I do not know," she answered.
 
 "Is it wise to go, and is it your choice to go?"  I asked.  "If not, I
 am your friend, and Hollingsworth's friend.  Tell me so, at once."
 
 "Possibly," observed Westervelt, smiling, "Priscilla sees in me an
 older friend than either Mr. Coverdale or Mr. Hollingsworth.  I shall
 willingly leave the matter at her option."
--**--**--
 it took away the grossness from what was fleshiest and fattest, and
 thus helped the life of man, even in its earthliest relations, to
 appear rich and noble, as well as warm, cheerful, and substantial.
 There were pictures, too, of gallant revellers, those of the old time,
 Flemish, apparently, with doublets and slashed sleeves, drinking their
 wine out of fantastic, long-stemmed glasses; quaffing joyously,
 quaffing forever, with inaudible laughter and song; while the champagne
 bubbled immortally against their moustaches, or the purple tide of
 Burgundy ran inexhaustibly down their throats.
 
 But, in an obscure corner of the saloon, there was a little Picture
 excellently done, moreover of a ragged, bloated, New England toper,
 stretched out on a bench, in the heavy, apoplectic sleep of
 drunkenness.  The death-in-life was too well portrayed.  You smelt the
 fumy liquor that had brought on this syncope.  Your only comfort lay in
 the forced reflection, that, real as he looked, the poor caitiff was
 but imaginary, a bit of painted canvass, whom no delirium tremens, nor
 so much as a retributive headache, awaited, on the morrow.
 
 By this time, it being past eleven o'clock, the two bar-keepers of the
 saloon were in pretty constant activity.  One of these young men had a
 rare faculty in the concoction of gin-cocktails.  It was a spectacle to
 behold, how, with a tumbler in each hand, he tossed the contents from
 one to the other.  Never conveying it awry, nor spilling the least
 drop, he compelled the frothy liquor, as it seemed to me, to spout
 forth from one glass and descend into the other, in a great parabolic
 curve, as well-defined and calculable as a planet's orbit.  He had a
 good forehead, with a particularly large development just above the
 eyebrows; fine intellectual gifts, no doubt, which he had educated to
--**--**--
 fishes went gleaming about, now turning up the sheen of a golden side,
 and now vanishing into the shadows of the water, like the fanciful
 thoughts that coquet with a poet in his dream.  Never before, I
 imagine, did a company of water-drinkers remain so entirely
 uncontaminated by the bad example around them; nor could I help
 wondering that it had not occurred to any freakish inebriate to empty a
 glass of liquor into their lakelet.  What a delightful idea!  Who would
 not be a fish, if he could inhale jollity with the essential element of
 his existence!
 
 I had begun to despair of meeting old Moodie, when, all at once, I
 recognized his hand and arm protruding from behind a screen that was
 set up for the accommodation of bashful topers.  As a matter of course,
 he had one of Priscilla's little purses, and was quietly insinuating it
 under the notice of a person who stood near.  This was always old
 Moodie's way.  You hardly ever saw him advancing towards you, but
 became aware of his proximity without being able to guess how he had
 come thither.  He glided about like a spirit, assuming visibility close
 to your elbow, offering his petty trifles of merchandise, remaining
 long enough for you to purchase, if so disposed, and then taking
 himself off, between two breaths, while you happened to be thinking of
 something else.
 
 By a sort of sympathetic impulse that often controlled me in those more
 impressible days of my life, I was induced to approach this old man in
 a mode as undemonstrative as his own.  Thus, when, according to his
 custom, he was probably just about to vanish, he found me at his elbow.
 
 "Ah!" said he, with more emphasis than was usual with him.  "It is Mr.
--**--**--
 Five-and-twenty years ago, at the epoch of this story, there dwelt in
 one of the Middle States a man whom we shall call Fauntleroy; a man of
 wealth, and magnificent tastes, and prodigal expenditure.  His home
 might almost be styled a palace; his habits, in the ordinary sense,
 princely.  His whole being seemed to have crystallized itself into an
 external splendor, wherewith he glittered in the eyes of the world, and
 had no other life than upon this gaudy surface.  He had married a
 lovely woman, whose nature was deeper than his own.  But his affection
 for her, though it showed largely, was superficial, like all his other
 manifestations and developments; he did not so truly keep this noble
 creature in his heart, as wear her beauty for the most brilliant
 ornament of his outward state.  And there was born to him a child, a
 beautiful daughter, whom he took from the beneficent hand of God with
 no just sense of her immortal value, but as a man already rich in gems
 would receive another jewel.  If he loved her, it was because she shone.
 
 After Fauntleroy had thus spent a few empty years, coruscating
 continually an unnatural light, the source of it--which was merely his
 gold--began to grow more shallow, and finally became exhausted. He saw
 himself in imminent peril of losing all that had heretofore
 distinguished him; and, conscious of no innate worth to fall back upon,
 he recoiled from this calamity with the instinct of a soul shrinking
 from annihilation.  To avoid it,--wretched man!--or rather to defer it,
 if but for a month, a day, or only to procure himself the life of a few
 breaths more amid the false glitter which was now less his own than
 ever,--he made himself guilty of a crime.  It was just the sort of
--**--**--
 further guilt.  His character appeared to have been radically changed
 (as, indeed, from its shallowness, it well might) by his miserable
 fate; or, it may be, the traits now seen in him were portions of the
 same character, presenting itself in another phase.  Instead of any
 longer seeking to live in the sight of the world, his impulse was to
 shrink into the nearest obscurity, and to be unseen of men, were it
 possible, even while standing before their eyes.  He had no pride; it
 was all trodden in the dust.  No ostentation; for how could it survive,
 when there was nothing left of Fauntleroy, save penury and shame!  His
 very gait demonstrated that he would gladly have faded out of view, and
 have crept about invisibly, for the sake of sheltering himself from the
 irksomeness of a human glance.  Hardly, it was averred, within the
 memory of those who knew him now, had he the hardihood to show his full
 front to the world.  He skulked in corners, and crept about in a sort
 of noonday twilight, making himself gray and misty, at all hours, with
 his morbid intolerance of sunshine.
 
 In his torpid despair, however, he had done an act which that condition
 of the spirit seems to prompt almost as often as prosperity and hope.
 Fauntleroy was again married.  He had taken to wife a forlorn,
 meek-spirited, feeble young woman, a seamstress, whom he found dwelling
 with her mother in a contiguous chamber of the old gubernatorial
 residence.  This poor phantom--as the beautiful and noble companion of
 his former life had done brought him a daughter. And sometimes, as from
 one dream into another, Fauntleroy looked forth out of his present
 grimy environment into that past magnificence, and wondered whether the
 grandee of yesterday or the pauper of to-day were real.  But, in my
--**--**--
 followed the dim thing into a dark corner, behold! she was not there.
 And it was true that Priscilla had strange ways; strange ways, and
 stranger words, when she uttered any words at all.  Never stirring out
 of the old governor's dusky house, she sometimes talked of distant
 places and splendid rooms, as if she had just left them.  Hidden things
 were visible to her (at least so the people inferred from obscure hints
 escaping unawares out of her mouth), and silence was audible.  And in
 all the world there was nothing so difficult to be endured, by those
 who had any dark secret to conceal, as the glance of Priscilla's timid
 and melancholy eyes.
 
 Her peculiarities were the theme of continual gossip among the other
 inhabitants of the gubernatorial mansion.  The rumor spread thence into
 a wider circle.  Those who knew old Moodie, as he was now called, used
 often to jeer him, at the very street-corners, about his daughter's
 gift of second-sight and prophecy.  It was a period when science
 (though mostly through its empirical professors) was bringing forward,
 anew, a hoard of facts and imperfect theories, that had partially won
 credence in elder times, but which modern scepticism had swept away as
 rubbish.  These things were now tossed up again, out of the surging
 ocean of human thought and experience.  The story of Priscilla's
 preternatural manifestations, therefore, attracted a kind of notice of
 which it would have been deemed wholly unworthy a few years earlier.
 One day a gentleman ascended the creaking staircase, and inquired which
 was old Moodie's chamber door.  And, several times, he came again.  He
 was a marvellously handsome man,--still youthful, too, and fashionably
 dressed.  Except that Priscilla, in those days, had no beauty, and, in
 the languor of her existence, had not yet blossomed into womanhood,
--**--**--
 young man.  The incidents and appearances, however, which led to this
 surmise soon passed away, and were forgotten.
 
 Nor was her reputation seriously affected by the report.  In fact, so
 great was her native power and influence, and such seemed the careless
 purity of her nature, that whatever Zenobia did was generally
 acknowledged as right for her to do.  The world never criticised her so
 harshly as it does most women who transcend its rules.  It almost
 yielded its assent, when it beheld her stepping out of the common path,
 and asserting the more extensive privileges of her sex, both
 theoretically and by her practice.  The sphere of ordinary womanhood
 was felt to be narrower than her development required.
 
 A portion of Zenobia's more recent life is told in the foregoing pages.
 Partly in earnest,--and, I imagine, as was her disposition, half in a
 proud jest, or in a kind of recklessness that had grown upon her, out
 of some hidden grief,--she had given her countenance, and promised
 liberal pecuniary aid, to our experiment of a better social state.  And
 Priscilla followed her to Blithedale.  The sole bliss of her life had
 been a dream of this beautiful sister, who had never so much as known
 of her existence.  By this time, too, the poor girl was enthralled in
 an intolerable bondage, from which she must either free herself or
 perish.  She deemed herself safest near Zenobia, into whose large heart
 she hoped to nestle.
 
 One evening, months after Priscilla's departure, when Moodie (or shall
 we call him Fauntleroy?) was sitting alone in the state-chamber of the
 old governor, there came footsteps up the staircase.  There was a pause
 on the landing-place.  A lady's musical yet haughty accents were heard
 making an inquiry from some denizen of the house, who had thrust a head
--**--**--
 the splendor of those jewels on her neck, like lamps that burn before
 some fair temple, and the jewelled flower in her hair, more than the
 murky, yellow light, that helped him to see her beauty. But he beheld
 it, and grew proud at heart; his own figure, in spite of his mean
 habiliments, assumed an air of state and grandeur.
 
 "It is well," cried old Moodie.  "Keep your wealth.  You are right
 worthy of it.  Keep it, therefore, but with one condition only."
 
 Zenobia thought the old man beside himself, and was moved with pity.
 
 "Have you none to care for you?" asked she.  "No daughter?--no
 kind-hearted neighbor?--no means of procuring the attendance which you
 need?  Tell me once again, can I do nothing for you?"
 
 "Nothing," he replied.  "I have beheld what I wished.  Now leave me.
 Linger not a moment longer, or I may be tempted to say what would bring
 a cloud over that queenly brow.  Keep all your wealth, but with only
 this one condition: Be kind--be no less kind than sisters are--to my
 poor Priscilla!"
 
 And, it may be, after Zenobia withdrew, Fauntleroy paced his gloomy
 chamber, and communed with himself as follows,--or, at all events, it
 is the only solution which I can offer of the enigma presented in his
 character:--"I am unchanged,--the same man as of yore!" said he. "True,
 my brother's wealth--he dying intestate--is legally my own.  I know it;
 yet of my own choice, I live a beggar, and go meanly clad, and hide
 myself behind a forgotten ignominy.  Looks this like ostentation?  Ah!
 but in Zenobia I live again!  Beholding her, so beautiful,--so fit to
 be adorned with all imaginable splendor of outward state,--the cursed
 vanity, which, half a lifetime since, dropt off like tatters of once
 gaudy apparel from my debased and ruined person, is all renewed for her
--**--**--
 activity to no purpose.  Thus it was still in our familiar
 Massachusetts--in one of its white country villages--that I must next
 particularize an incident.
 
 The scene was one of those lyceum halls, of which almost every village
 has now its own, dedicated to that sober and pallid, or rather
 drab-colored, mode of winter-evening entertainment, the lecture.  Of
 late years this has come strangely into vogue, when the natural
 tendency of things would seem to be to substitute lettered for oral
 methods of addressing the public.  But, in halls like this, besides the
 winter course of lectures, there is a rich and varied series of other
 exhibitions.  Hither comes the ventriloquist, with all his mysterious
 tongues; the thaumaturgist, too, with his miraculous transformations of
 plates, doves, and rings, his pancakes smoking in your hat, and his
 cellar of choice liquors represented in one small bottle.  Here, also,
 the itinerant professor instructs separate classes of ladies and
 gentlemen in physiology, and demonstrates his lessons by the aid of
 real skeletons, and manikins in wax, from Paris.  Here is to be heard
 the choir of Ethiopian melodists, and to be seen the diorama of Moscow
 or Bunker Hill, or the moving panorama of the Chinese wall.  Here is
 displayed the museum of wax figures, illustrating the wide catholicism
 of earthly renown, by mixing up heroes and statesmen, the pope and the
 Mormon prophet, kings, queens, murderers, and beautiful ladies; every
 sort of person, in short, except authors, of whom I never beheld even
 the most famous done in wax.  And here, in this many-purposed hall
 (unless the selectmen of the village chance to have more than their
 share of the Puritanism, which, however diversified with later
 patchwork, still gives its prevailing tint to New England
 character),--here the company of strolling players sets up its little
--**--**--
 After sitting awhile in contemplation of this person's familiar
 contour, I was irresistibly moved to step over the intervening benches,
 lay my hand on his shoulder, put my mouth close to his ear, and address
 him in a sepulchral, melodramatic whisper: "Hollingsworth! where have
 you left Zenobia?"
 
 His nerves, however, were proof against my attack.  He turned half
 around, and looked me in the face with great sad eyes, in which there
 was neither kindness nor resentment, nor any perceptible surprise.
 
 "Zenobia, when I last saw her," he answered, "was at Blithedale."
 
 He said no more.  But there was a great deal of talk going on near me,
 among a knot of people who might be considered as representing the
 mysticism, or rather the mystic sensuality, of this singular age. The
 nature of the exhibition that was about to take place had probably
 given the turn to their conversation.
 
 I heard, from a pale man in blue spectacles, some stranger stories than
 ever were written in a romance; told, too, with a simple, unimaginative
 steadfastness, which was terribly efficacious in compelling the auditor
 to receive them into the category of established facts.  He cited
 instances of the miraculous power of one human being over the will and
 passions of another; insomuch that settled grief was but a shadow
 beneath the influence of a man possessing this potency, and the strong
 love of years melted away like a vapor.  At the bidding of one of these
 wizards, the maiden, with her lover's kiss still burning on her lips,
 would turn from him with icy indifference; the newly made widow would
 dig up her buried heart out of her young husband's grave before the
 sods had taken root upon it; a mother with her babe's milk in her bosom
 would thrust away her child.  Human character was but soft wax in his
--**--**--
 salaam, but a bow, took his station at the desk, and first blowing his
 nose with a white handkerchief, prepared to speak.  The environment of
 the homely village hall, and the absence of many ingenious contrivances
 of stage effect with which the exhibition had heretofore been set off,
 seemed to bring the artifice of this character more openly upon the
 surface.  No sooner did I behold the bearded enchanter, than, laying my
 hand again on Hollingsworth's shoulder, I whispered in his ear, "Do you
 know him?"
 
 "I never saw the man before," he muttered, without turning his head.
 
 But I had seen him three times already.
 
 Once, on occasion of my first visit to the Veiled Lady; a second time,
 in the wood-path at Blithedale; and lastly, in Zenobia's drawing-room.
 It was Westervelt.  A quick association of ideas made me shudder from
 head to foot; and again, like an evil spirit, bringing up reminiscences
 of a man's sins, I whispered a question in Hollingsworth's ear,--"What
 have you done with Priscilla?"
 
 He gave a convulsive start, as if I had thrust a knife into him,
 writhed himself round on his seat, glared fiercely into my eyes, but
 answered not a word.
 
 The Professor began his discourse, explanatory of the psychological
 phenomena, as he termed them, which it was his purpose to exhibit to
 the spectators.  There remains no very distinct impression of it on my
 memory.  It was eloquent, ingenious, plausible, with a delusive show of
 spirituality, yet really imbued throughout with a cold and dead
 materialism.  I shivered, as at a current of chill air issuing out of a
 sepulchral vault, and bringing the smell of corruption along with it.
 He spoke of a new era that was dawning upon the world; an era that
 would link soul to soul, and the present life to what we call futurity,
--**--**--
 dash of invigorating ice-temper in the air, but a coolness that soon
 gave place to the brisk glow of exercise, while the vigor remained as
 elastic as before.  The atmosphere had a spirit and sparkle in it.
 Each breath was like a sip of ethereal wine, tempered, as I said, with
 a crystal lump of ice.  I had started on this expedition in an
 exceedingly sombre mood, as well befitted one who found himself tending
 towards home, but was conscious that nobody would be quite overjoyed to
 greet him there.  My feet were hardly off the pavement, however, when
 this morbid sensation began to yield to the lively influences of air
 and motion.  Nor had I gone far, with fields yet green on either side,
 before my step became as swift and light as if Hollingsworth were
 waiting to exchange a friendly hand-grip, and Zenobia's and Priscilla's
 open arms would welcome the wanderer's reappearance.  It has happened
 to me on other occasions, as well as this, to prove how a state of
 physical well-being can create a kind of joy, in spite of the
 profoundest anxiety of mind.
 
 The pathway of that walk still runs along, with sunny freshness,
 through my memory.  I know not why it should be so.  But my mental eye
 can even now discern the September grass, bordering the pleasant
 roadside with a brighter verdure than while the summer heats were
 scorching it; the trees, too, mostly green, although here and there a
 branch or shrub has donned its vesture of crimson and gold a week or
 two before its fellows.  I see the tufted barberry-bushes, with their
 small clusters of scarlet fruit; the toadstools, likewise,--some
 spotlessly white, others yellow or red,--mysterious growths, springing
 suddenly from no root or seed, and growing nobody can tell how or
--**--**--
 fellowship with all the sons of labor.  I could have knelt down, and
 have laid my breast against that soil.  The red clay of which my frame
 was moulded seemed nearer akin to those crumbling furrows than to any
 other portion of the world's dust.  There was my home, and there might
 be my grave.
 
 I felt an invincible reluctance, nevertheless, at the idea of
 presenting myself before my old associates, without first ascertaining
 the state in which they were.  A nameless foreboding weighed upon me.
 Perhaps, should I know all the circumstances that had occurred, I might
 find it my wisest course to turn back, unrecognized, unseen, and never
 look at Blithedale more.  Had it been evening, I would have stolen
 softly to some lighted window of the old farmhouse, and peeped darkling
 in, to see all their well-known faces round the supper-board.  Then,
 were there a vacant seat, I might noiselessly unclose the door, glide
 in, and take my place among them, without a word.  My entrance might be
 so quiet, my aspect so familiar, that they would forget how long I had
 been away, and suffer me to melt into the scene, as a wreath of vapor
 melts into a larger cloud. I dreaded a boisterous greeting.  Beholding
 me at table, Zenobia, as a matter of course, would send me a cup of
 tea, and Hollingsworth fill my plate from the great dish of pandowdy,
 and Priscilla, in her quiet way, would hand the cream, and others help
 me to the bread and butter.  Being one of them again, the knowledge of
 what had happened would come to me without a shock.  For still, at
 every turn of my shifting fantasies, the thought stared me in the face
 that some evil thing had befallen us, or was ready to befall.
--**--**--
 "Hush!"  I heard the pretty gypsy fortuneteller say.  "Who is that
 laughing?"
 
 "Some profane intruder!" said the goddess Diana.  "I shall send an
 arrow through his heart, or change him into a stag, as I did Actaeon,
 if he peeps from behind the trees!"
 
 "Me take his scalp!" cried the Indian chief, brandishing his tomahawk,
 and cutting a great caper in the air.
 
 "I'll root him in the earth with a spell that I have at my tongue's
 end!" squeaked Moll Pitcher.  "And the green moss shall grow all over
 him, before he gets free again!"
 
 "The voice was Miles Coverdale's," said the fiendish fiddler, with a
 whisk of his tail and a toss of his horns.  "My music has brought him
 hither.  He is always ready to dance to the Devil's tune!"
 
 Thus put on the right track, they all recognized the voice at once, and
 set up a simultaneous shout.
 
 "Miles!  Miles!  Miles Coverdale, where are you?" they cried. "Zenobia!
 Queen Zenobia! here is one of your vassals lurking in the wood.
 Command him to approach and pay his duty!"
 
 The whole fantastic rabble forthwith streamed off in pursuit of me, so
 that I was like a mad poet hunted by chimeras.  Having fairly the start
 of them, however, I succeeded in making my escape, and soon left their
 merriment and riot at a good distance in the rear.  Its fainter tones
 assumed a kind of mournfulness, and were finally lost in the hush and
 solemnity of the wood.  In my haste, I stumbled over a heap of logs and
 sticks that had been cut for firewood, a great while ago, by some
 former possessor of the soil, and piled up square, in order to be
 carted or sledded away to the farmhouse.  But, being forgotten, they
--**--**--
 many months past had kept my heart and my imagination idly feverish.
 Zenobia's whole character and history; the true nature of her
 mysterious connection with Westervelt; her later purposes towards
 Hollingsworth, and, reciprocally, his in reference to her; and,
 finally, the degree in which Zenobia had been cognizant of the plot
 against Priscilla, and what, at last, had been the real object of that
 scheme.  On these points, as before, I was left to my own conjectures.
 One thing, only, was certain.  Zenobia and Hollingsworth were friends
 no longer.  If their heartstrings were ever intertwined, the knot had
 been adjudged an entanglement, and was now violently broken.
 
 But Zenobia seemed unable to rest content with the matter in the
 posture which it had assumed.
 
 "Ah! do we part so?" exclaimed she, seeing Hollingsworth about to
 retire.
 
 "And why not?" said he, with almost rude abruptness.  "What is there
 further to be said between us?"
 
 "Well, perhaps nothing," answered Zenobia, looking him in the face, and
 smiling.  "But we have come many times before to this gray rock, and we
 have talked very softly among the whisperings of the birch-trees.  They
 were pleasant hours!  I love to make the latest of them, though not
 altogether so delightful, loiter away as slowly as may be.  And,
 besides, you have put many queries to me at this, which you design to
 be our last interview; and being driven, as I must acknowledge, into a
 corner, I have responded with reasonable frankness.  But now, with your
 free consent, I desire the privilege of asking a few questions, in my
 turn."
 
 "I have no concealments," said Hollingsworth.
 
 "We shall see," answered Zenobia.  "I would first inquire whether you
 have supposed me to be wealthy?"
 
 "On that point," observed Hollingsworth, "I have had the opinion which
--**--**--
 latter would not take it thus.
 
 "True, we are sisters!" she replied; and, moved by the sweet word, she
 stooped down and kissed Priscilla; but not lovingly, for a sense of
 fatal harm received through her seemed to be lurking in Zenobia's
 heart.  "We had one father!  You knew it from the first; I, but a
 little while,--else some things that have chanced might have been
 spared you.  But I never wished you harm.  You stood between me and an
 end which I desired.  I wanted a clear path.  No matter what I meant.
 It is over now.  Do you forgive me?"
 
 "O Zenobia," sobbed Priscilla, "it is I that feel like the guilty one!"
 
 "No, no, poor little thing!" said Zenobia, with a sort of contempt.
 "You have been my evil fate, but there never was a babe with less
 strength or will to do an injury.  Poor child!  Methinks you have but a
 melancholy lot before you, sitting all alone in that wide, cheerless
 heart, where, for aught you know,--and as I, alas! believe,--the fire
 which you have kindled may soon go out.  Ah, the thought makes me
 shiver for you!  What will you do, Priscilla, when you find no spark
 among the ashes?"
 
 "Die!" she answered.
 
 "That was well said!" responded Zenobia, with an approving smile.
 "There is all a woman in your little compass, my poor sister.
 Meanwhile, go with him, and live!"
 
 She waved her away with a queenly gesture, and turned her own face to
 the rock.  I watched Priscilla, wondering what judgment she would pass
 between Zenobia and Hollingsworth; how interpret his behavior, so as to
 reconcile it with true faith both towards her sister and herself; how
 compel her love for him to keep any terms whatever with her sisterly
 affection!  But, in truth, there was no such difficulty as I imagined.
--**--**--
 detect this one secret, hidden beneath many a revelation which perhaps
 concerned me less.  In simple truth, however, as Zenobia leaned her
 forehead against the rock, shaken with that tearless agony, it seemed
 to me that the self-same pang, with hardly mitigated torment, leaped
 thrilling from her heartstrings to my own.  Was it wrong, therefore, if
 I felt myself consecrated to the priesthood by sympathy like this, and
 called upon to minister to this woman's affliction, so far as mortal
 could?
 
 But, indeed, what could mortal do for her?  Nothing!  The attempt would
 be a mockery and an anguish.  Time, it is true, would steal away her
 grief, and bury it and the best of her heart in the same grave.  But
 Destiny itself, methought, in its kindliest mood, could do no better
 for Zenobia, in the way of quick relief; than to cause the impending
 rock to impend a little farther, and fall upon her head. So I leaned
 against a tree, and listened to her sobs, in unbroken silence.  She was
 half prostrate, half kneeling, with her forehead still pressed against
 the rock.  Her sobs were the only sound; she did not groan, nor give
 any other utterance to her distress.  It was all involuntary.
 
 At length she sat up, put back her hair, and stared about her with a
 bewildered aspect, as if not distinctly recollecting the scene through
 which she had passed, nor cognizant of the situation in which it left
 her.  Her face and brow were almost purple with the rush of blood.
 They whitened, however, by and by, and for some time retained this
 deathlike hue.  She put her hand to her forehead, with a gesture that
 made me forcibly conscious of an intense and living pain there.
 
 Her glance, wandering wildly to and fro, passed over me several times,
--**--**--
 story. Furthermore, there occurs in the "American Note-Books" (August
 27, 1837), a reminiscence of the author's family, to the following
 effect. Philip English, a character well-known in early Salem annals,
 was among those who suffered from John Hathorne's magisterial
 harshness, and he maintained in consequence a lasting feud with the old
 Puritan official. But at his death English left daughters, one of whom
 is said to have married the son of Justice John Hathorne, whom English
 had declared he would never forgive. It is scarcely necessary to point
 out how clearly this foreshadows the final union of those hereditary
 foes, the Pyncheons and Maules, through the marriage of Phoebe and
 Holgrave. The romance, however, describes the Maules as possessing some
 of the traits known to have been characteristic of the Hawthornes: for
 example, "so long as any of the race were to be found, they had been
 marked out from other men--not strikingly, nor as with a sharp line,
 but with an effect that was felt rather than spoken of--by an
 hereditary characteristic of reserve." Thus, while the general
 suggestion of the Hawthorne line and its fortunes was followed in the
 romance, the Pyncheons taking the place of the author's family, certain
 distinguishing marks of the Hawthornes were assigned to the imaginary
 Maule posterity.
 
 There are one or two other points which indicate Hawthorne's method of
 basing his compositions, the result in the main of pure invention, on
 the solid ground of particular facts.  Allusion is made, in the first
 chapter of the "Seven Gables," to a grant of lands in Waldo County,
 Maine, owned by the Pyncheon family.  In the "American Note-Books"
 there is an entry, dated August 12, 1837, which speaks of the
 Revolutionary general, Knox, and his land-grant in Waldo County, by
 virtue of which the owner had hoped to establish an estate on the
--**--**--
 in the vicinity; among them, Herman Melville, whose intercourse
 Hawthorne greatly enjoyed, Henry James, Sr., Doctor Holmes, J.  T.
 Headley, James Russell Lowell, Edwin P.  Whipple, Frederika Bremer, and
 J.  T.  Fields; so that there was no lack of intellectual society in
 the midst of the beautiful and inspiring mountain scenery of the place.
 "In the afternoons, nowadays," he records, shortly before beginning the
 work, "this valley in which I dwell seems like a vast basin filled with
 golden Sunshine as with wine;" and, happy in the companionship of his
 wife and their three children, he led a simple, refined, idyllic life,
 despite the restrictions of a scanty and uncertain income.  A letter
 written by Mrs. Hawthorne, at this time, to a member of her family,
 gives incidentally a glimpse of the scene, which may properly find a
 place here.  She says:  "I delight to think that you also can look
 forth, as I do now, upon a broad valley and a fine amphitheater of
 hills, and are about to watch the stately ceremony of the sunset from
 your piazza.  But you have not this lovely lake, nor, I suppose, the
 delicate purple mist which folds these slumbering mountains in airy
 veils.  Mr. Hawthorne has been lying down in the sun shine, slightly
 fleckered with the shadows of a tree, and Una and Julian have been
 making him look like the mighty Pan, by covering his chin and breast
 with long grass-blades, that looked like a verdant and venerable
 beard." The pleasantness and peace of his surroundings and of his
 modest home, in Lenox, may be taken into account as harmonizing with
 the mellow serenity of the romance then produced.  Of the work, when it
 appeared in the early spring of 1851, he wrote to Horatio Bridge these
 words, now published for the first time:--
--**--**--
 materials long in use for constructing castles in the air.  The
 personages of the tale--though they give themselves out to be of
 ancient stability and considerable prominence--are really of the
 author's own making, or at all events, of his own mixing; their virtues
 can shed no lustre, nor their defects redound, in the remotest degree,
 to the discredit of the venerable town of which they profess to be
 inhabitants.  He would be glad, therefore, if-especially in the quarter
 to which he alludes-the book may be read strictly as a Romance, having
 a great deal more to do with the clouds overhead than with any portion
 of the actual soil of the County of Essex.
 
 LENOX, January 27, 1851.
 
 
 
 
 THE HOUSE OF SEVEN GABLES
 
 
 by
 
 Nathaniel Hawthorne
 
 
 
 
                        I  The Old Pyncheon Family
 
 
 HALFWAY down a by-street of one of our New England towns stands a rusty
 wooden house, with seven acutely peaked gables, facing towards various
 points of the compass, and a huge, clustered chimney in the midst.  The
 street is Pyncheon Street; the house is the old Pyncheon House; and an
 elm-tree, of wide circumference, rooted before the door, is familiar to
 every town-born child by the title of the Pyncheon Elm.  On my
 occasional visits to the town aforesaid, I seldom failed to turn down
 Pyncheon Street, for the sake of passing through the shadow of these
 two antiquities,--the great elm-tree and the weather-beaten edifice.
 
 The aspect of the venerable mansion has always affected me like a human
 countenance, bearing the traces not merely of outward storm and
 sunshine, but expressive also, of the long lapse of mortal life, and
 accompanying vicissitudes that have passed within.  Were these to be
 worthily recounted, they would form a narrative of no small interest
 and instruction, and possessing, moreover, a certain remarkable unity,
--**--**--
 witchcraft; nor did it fail to be whispered, that there was an
 invidious acrimony in the zeal with which he had sought the
 condemnation of Matthew Maule.  It was well known that the victim had
 recognized the bitterness of personal enmity in his persecutor's
 conduct towards him, and that he declared himself hunted to death for
 his spoil.  At the moment of execution--with the halter about his neck,
 and while Colonel Pyncheon sat on horseback, grimly gazing at the scene
 Maule had addressed him from the scaffold, and uttered a prophecy, of
 which history, as well as fireside tradition, has preserved the very
 words.  "God," said the dying man, pointing his finger, with a ghastly
 look, at the undismayed countenance of his enemy,--"God will give him
 blood to drink!"  After the reputed wizard's death, his humble
 homestead had fallen an easy spoil into Colonel Pyncheon's grasp.  When
 it was understood, however, that the Colonel intended to erect a family
 mansion-spacious, ponderously framed of oaken timber, and calculated to
 endure for many generations of his posterity over the spot first
 covered by the log-built hut of Matthew Maule, there was much shaking
 of the head among the village gossips.  Without absolutely expressing a
 doubt whether the stalwart Puritan had acted as a man of conscience and
 integrity throughout the proceedings which have been sketched, they,
 nevertheless, hinted that he was about to build his house over an
 unquiet grave.  His home would include the home of the dead and buried
 wizard, and would thus afford the ghost of the latter a kind of
 privilege to haunt its new apartments, and the chambers into which
 future bridegrooms were to lead their brides, and where children of the
 Pyncheon blood were to be born.  The terror and ugliness of Maule's
 crime, and the wretchedness of his punishment, would darken the freshly
--**--**--
 the servant aside, "that this is no less a man than the
 lieutenant-governor? Summon Colonel Pyncheon at once! I know that he
 received letters from England this morning; and, in the perusal and
 consideration of them, an hour may have passed away without his
 noticing it.  But he will be ill-pleased, I judge, if you suffer him to
 neglect the courtesy due to one of our chief rulers, and who may be
 said to represent King William, in the absence of the governor himself.
 Call your master instantly."
 
 "Nay, please your worship," answered the man, in much perplexity, but
 with a backwardness that strikingly indicated the hard and severe
 character of Colonel Pyncheon's domestic rule; "my master's orders were
 exceeding strict; and, as your worship knows, he permits of no
 discretion in the obedience of those who owe him service.  Let who list
 open yonder door; I dare not, though the governor's own voice should
 bid me do it!"
 
 "Pooh, pooh, master high sheriff!" cried the lieutenant-governor, who
 had overheard the foregoing discussion, and felt himself high enough in
 station to play a little with his dignity.  "I will take the matter
 into my own hands.  It is time that the good Colonel came forth to
 greet his friends; else we shall be apt to suspect that he has taken a
 sip too much of his Canary wine, in his extreme deliberation which cask
 it were best to broach in honor of the day! But since he is so much
 behindhand, I will give him a remembrancer myself!"
 
 Accordingly, with such a tramp of his ponderous riding-boots as might
 of itself have been audible in the remotest of the seven gables, he
 advanced to the door, which the servant pointed out, and made its new
 panels reecho with a loud, free knock.  Then, looking round, with a
--**--**--
 that had impelled them into his private retirement.
 
 A little boy--the Colonel's grandchild, and the only human being that
 ever dared to be familiar with him--now made his way among the guests,
 and ran towards the seated figure; then pausing halfway, he began to
 shriek with terror.  The company, tremulous as the leaves of a tree,
 when all are shaking together, drew nearer, and perceived that there
 was an unnatural distortion in the fixedness of Colonel Pyncheon's
 stare; that there was blood on his ruff, and that his hoary beard was
 saturated with it.  It was too late to give assistance.  The
 iron-hearted Puritan, the relentless persecutor, the grasping and
 strong-willed man was dead! Dead, in his new house! There is a
 tradition, only worth alluding to as lending a tinge of superstitious
 awe to a scene perhaps gloomy enough without it, that a voice spoke
 loudly among the guests, the tones of which were like those of old
 Matthew Maule, the executed wizard,--"God hath given him blood to
 drink!"
 
 Thus early had that one guest,--the only guest who is certain, at one
 time or another, to find his way into every human dwelling,--thus early
 had Death stepped across the threshold of the House of the Seven Gables!
 
 Colonel Pyncheon's sudden and mysterious end made a vast deal of noise
 in its day.  There were many rumors, some of which have vaguely drifted
 down to the present time, how that appearances indicated violence; that
 there were the marks of fingers on his throat, and the print of a
 bloody hand on his plaited ruff; and that his peaked beard was
 dishevelled, as if it had been fiercely clutched and pulled.  It was
 averred, likewise, that the lattice window, near the Colonel's chair,
 was open; and that, only a few minutes before the fatal occurrence, the
--**--**--
 prosperity, than wear away and destroy it.  For, not only had his son
 and heir come into immediate enjoyment of a rich estate, but there was
 a claim through an Indian deed, confirmed by a subsequent grant of the
 General Court, to a vast and as yet unexplored and unmeasured tract of
 Eastern lands.  These possessions--for as such they might almost
 certainly be reckoned--comprised the greater part of what is now known
 as Waldo County, in the state of Maine, and were more extensive than
 many a dukedom, or even a reigning prince's territory, on European
 soil.  When the pathless forest that still covered this wild
 principality should give place--as it inevitably must, though perhaps
 not till ages hence--to the golden fertility of human culture, it would
 be the source of incalculable wealth to the Pyncheon blood.  Had the
 Colonel survived only a few weeks longer, it is probable that his great
 political influence, and powerful connections at home and abroad, would
 have consummated all that was necessary to render the claim available.
 But, in spite of good Mr. Higginson's congratulatory eloquence, this
 appeared to be the one thing which Colonel Pyncheon, provident and
 sagacious as he was, had allowed to go at loose ends.  So far as the
 prospective territory was concerned, he unquestionably died too soon.
 His son lacked not merely the father's eminent position, but the talent
 and force of character to achieve it: he could, therefore, effect
 nothing by dint of political interest; and the bare justice or legality
 of the claim was not so apparent, after the Colonel's decease, as it
 had been pronounced in his lifetime.  Some connecting link had slipped
 out of the evidence, and could not anywhere be found.
 
 Efforts, it is true, were made by the Pyncheons, not only then, but at
--**--**--
 period as to obviate the propriety of substituting right for wrong.  It
 was the belief of those who knew him best, that he would positively
 have taken the very singular step of giving up the House of the Seven
 Gables to the representative of Matthew Maule, but for the unspeakable
 tumult which a suspicion of the old gentleman's project awakened among
 his Pyncheon relatives.  Their exertions had the effect of suspending
 his purpose; but it was feared that he would perform, after death, by
 the operation of his last will, what he had so hardly been prevented
 from doing in his proper lifetime.  But there is no one thing which men
 so rarely do, whatever the provocation or inducement, as to bequeath
 patrimonial property away from their own blood.  They may love other
 individuals far better than their relatives,--they may even cherish
 dislike, or positive hatred, to the latter; but yet, in view of death,
 the strong prejudice of propinquity revives, and impels the testator to
 send down his estate in the line marked out by custom so immemorial
 that it looks like nature.  In all the Pyncheons, this feeling had the
 energy of disease.  It was too powerful for the conscientious scruples
 of the old bachelor; at whose death, accordingly, the mansion-house,
 together with most of his other riches, passed into the possession of
 his next legal representative.
 
 This was a nephew, the cousin of the miserable young man who had been
 convicted of the uncle's murder.  The new heir, up to the period of his
 accession, was reckoned rather a dissipated youth, but had at once
 reformed, and made himself an exceedingly respectable member of
 society.   In fact, he showed more of the Pyncheon quality, and had won
 higher eminence in the world, than any of his race since the time of
--**--**--
 continued to regard the memory of the reputed witches.  The mantle, or
 rather the ragged cloak, of old Matthew Maule had fallen upon his
 children.  They were half believed to inherit mysterious attributes;
 the family eye was said to possess strange power.  Among other
 good-for-nothing properties and privileges, one was especially assigned
 them,--that of exercising an influence over people's dreams.  The
 Pyncheons, if all stories were true, haughtily as they bore themselves
 in the noonday streets of their native town, were no better than
 bond-servants to these plebeian Maules, on entering the topsy-turvy
 commonwealth of sleep.  Modern psychology, it may be, will endeavor to
 reduce these alleged necromancies within a system, instead of rejecting
 them as altogether fabulous.
 
 A descriptive paragraph or two, treating of the seven-gabled mansion in
 its more recent aspect, will bring this preliminary chapter to a close.
 The street in which it upreared its venerable peaks has long ceased to
 be a fashionable quarter of the town; so that, though the old edifice
 was surrounded by habitations of modern date, they were mostly small,
 built entirely of wood, and typical of the most plodding uniformity of
 common life.   Doubtless, however, the whole story of human existence
 may be latent in each of them, but with no picturesqueness, externally,
 that can attract the imagination or sympathy to seek it there.  But as
 for the old structure of our story, its white-oak frame, and its
 boards, shingles, and crumbling plaster, and even the huge, clustered
 chimney in the midst, seemed to constitute only the least and meanest
 part of its reality.  So much of mankind's varied experience had passed
 there,--so much had been suffered, and something, too, enjoyed,--that
 the very timbers were oozy, as with the moisture of a heart.  It was
 itself like a great human heart, with a life of its own, and full of
--**--**--
 
 The maiden lady's devotions are concluded.  Will she now issue forth
 over the threshold of our story?  Not yet, by many moments.  First,
 every drawer in the tall, old-fashioned bureau is to be opened, with
 difficulty, and with a succession of spasmodic jerks then, all must
 close again, with the same fidgety reluctance.  There is a rustling of
 stiff silks; a tread of backward and forward footsteps to and fro
 across the chamber.  We suspect Miss Hepzibah, moreover, of taking a
 step upward into a chair, in order to give heedful regard to her
 appearance on all sides, and at full length, in the oval, dingy-framed
 toilet-glass, that hangs above her table.  Truly! well, indeed! who
 would have thought it! Is all this precious time to be lavished on the
 matutinal repair and beautifying of an elderly person, who never goes
 abroad, whom nobody ever visits, and from whom, when she shall have
 done her utmost, it were the best charity to turn one's eyes another
 way?
 
 Now she is almost ready.  Let us pardon her one other pause; for it is
 given to the sole sentiment, or, we might better say,--heightened and
 rendered intense, as it has been, by sorrow and seclusion,--to the
 strong passion of her life.  We heard the turning of a key in a small
 lock; she has opened a secret drawer of an escritoire, and is probably
 looking at a certain miniature, done in Malbone's most perfect style,
 and representing a face worthy of no less delicate a pencil.  It was
 once our good fortune to see this picture.  It is a likeness of a young
 man, in a silken dressing-gown of an old fashion, the soft richness of
 which is well adapted to the countenance of reverie, with its full,
 tender lips, and beautiful eyes, that seem to indicate not so much
--**--**--
 hue.  In the way of furniture, there were two tables:  one, constructed
 with perplexing intricacy and exhibiting as many feet as a centipede;
 the other, most delicately wrought, with four long and slender legs, so
 apparently frail that it was almost incredible what a length of time
 the ancient tea-table had stood upon them.  Half a dozen chairs stood
 about the room, straight and stiff, and so ingeniously contrived for
 the discomfort of the human person that they were irksome even to
 sight, and conveyed the ugliest possible idea of the state of society
 to which they could have been adapted.  One exception there was,
 however, in a very antique elbow-chair, with a high back, carved
 elaborately in oak, and a roomy depth within its arms, that made up, by
 its spacious comprehensiveness, for the lack of any of those artistic
 curves which abound in a modern chair.
 
 As for ornamental articles of furniture, we recollect but two, if such
 they may be called.  One was a map of the Pyncheon territory at the
 eastward, not engraved, but the handiwork of some skilful old
 draughtsman, and grotesquely illuminated with pictures of Indians and
 wild beasts, among which was seen a lion; the natural history of the
 region being as little known as its geography, which was put down most
 fantastically awry.  The other adornment was the portrait of old
 Colonel Pyncheon, at two thirds length, representing the stern features
 of a Puritanic-looking personage, in a skull-cap, with a laced band and
 a grizzly beard; holding a Bible with one hand, and in the other
 uplifting an iron sword-hilt.  The latter object, being more
 successfully depicted by the artist, stood out in far greater
 prominence than the sacred volume.  Face to face with this picture, on
 entering the apartment, Miss Hepzibah Pyncheon came to a pause;
--**--**--
 needs turn aside and laugh at her.  For here,--and if we fail to
 impress it suitably upon the reader, it is our own fault, not that of
 the theme, here is one of the truest points of melancholy interest that
 occur in ordinary life.  It was the final throe of what called itself
 old gentility.  A lady--who had fed herself from childhood with the
 shadowy food of aristocratic reminiscences, and whose religion it was
 that a lady's hand soils itself irremediably by doing aught for
 bread,--this born lady, after sixty years of narrowing means, is fain
 to step down from her pedestal of imaginary rank.  Poverty, treading
 closely at her heels for a lifetime, has come up with her at last.  She
 must earn her own food, or starve! And we have stolen upon Miss
 Hepzibah Pyncheon, too irreverently, at the instant of time when the
 patrician lady is to be transformed into the plebeian woman.
 
 In this republican country, amid the fluctuating waves of our social
 life, somebody is always at the drowning-point.  The tragedy is enacted
 with as continual a repetition as that of a popular drama on a holiday,
 and, nevertheless, is felt as deeply, perhaps, as when an hereditary
 noble sinks below his order.  More deeply; since, with us, rank is the
 grosser substance of wealth and a splendid establishment, and has no
 spiritual existence after the death of these, but dies hopelessly along
 with them.  And, therefore, since we have been unfortunate enough to
 introduce our heroine at so inauspicious a juncture, we would entreat
 for a mood of due solemnity in the spectators of her fate.  Let us
 behold, in poor Hepzibah, the immemorial, lady--two hundred years old,
 on this side of the water, and thrice as many on the other,--with her
 antique portraits, pedigrees, coats of arms, records and traditions,
--**--**--
 can be wrought into a scene like this! How can we elevate our history
 of retribution for the sin of long ago, when, as one of our most
 prominent figures, we are compelled to introduce--not a young and
 lovely woman, nor even the stately remains of beauty, storm-shattered
 by affliction--but a gaunt, sallow, rusty-jointed maiden, in a
 long-waisted silk gown, and with the strange horror of a turban on her
 head! Her visage is not even ugly.  It is redeemed from insignificance
 only by the contraction of her eyebrows into a near-sighted scowl.
 And, finally, her great life-trial seems to be, that, after sixty years
 of idleness, she finds it convenient to earn comfortable bread by
 setting up a shop in a small way.  Nevertheless, if we look through all
 the heroic fortunes of mankind, we shall find this same entanglement of
 something mean and trivial with whatever is noblest in joy or sorrow.
 Life is made up of marble and mud.  And, without all the deeper trust
 in a comprehensive sympathy above us, we might hence be led to suspect
 the insult of a sneer, as well as an immitigable frown, on the iron
 countenance of fate.  What is called poetic insight is the gift of
 discerning, in this sphere of strangely mingled elements, the beauty
 and the majesty which are compelled to assume a garb so sordid.
 
 
 
 
                          III The First Customer
 
 
 MISS HEPZIBAH PYNCHEON sat in the oaken elbow-chair, with her hands
 over her face, giving way to that heavy down-sinking of the heart which
 most persons have experienced, when the image of hope itself seems
 ponderously moulded of lead, on the eve of an enterprise at once
 doubtful and momentous.  She was suddenly startled by the tinkling
 alarum--high, sharp, and irregular--of a little bell.  The maiden lady
--**--**--
 standing, as you do, on the outer verge of your long seclusion, and
 peopling the world with ugly shapes, which you will soon find to be as
 unreal as the giants and ogres of a child's story-book.  I find nothing
 so singular in life, as that everything appears to lose its substance
 the instant one actually grapples with it.  So it will be with what you
 think so terrible."
 
 "But I am a woman!" said Hepzibah piteously.  "I was going to say, a
 lady,--but I consider that as past."
 
 "Well; no matter if it be past!" answered the artist, a strange gleam
 of half-hidden sarcasm flashing through the kindliness of his manner.
 "Let it go! You are the better without it.  I speak frankly, my dear
 Miss Pyncheon!--for are we not friends? I look upon this as one of the
 fortunate days of your life.  It ends an epoch and begins one.
 Hitherto, the life-blood has been gradually chilling in your veins as
 you sat aloof, within your circle of gentility, while the rest of the
 world was fighting out its battle with one kind of necessity or
 another.  Henceforth, you will at least have the sense of healthy and
 natural effort for a purpose, and of lending your strength be it great
 or small--to the united struggle of mankind.  This is success,--all the
 success that anybody meets with!"
 
 "It is natural enough, Mr. Holgrave, that you should have ideas like
 these," rejoined Hepzibah, drawing up her gaunt figure with slightly
 offended dignity.  "You are a man, a young man, and brought up, I
 suppose, as almost everybody is nowadays, with a view to seeking your
 fortune.  But I was born a lady, and have always lived one; no matter
 in what narrowness of means, always a lady."
 
 "But I was not born a gentleman; neither have I lived like one," said
--**--**--
 "That Jim Crow there in the window," answered the urchin, holding out a
 cent, and pointing to the gingerbread figure that had attracted his
 notice, as he loitered along to school; "the one that has not a broken
 foot."
 
 So Hepzibah put forth her lank arm, and, taking the effigy from the
 shop-window, delivered it to her first customer.
 
 "No matter for the money," said she, giving him a little push towards
 the door; for her old gentility was contumaciously squeamish at sight
 of the copper coin, and, besides, it seemed such pitiful meanness to
 take the child's pocket-money in exchange for a bit of stale
 gingerbread.  "No matter for the cent.  You are welcome to Jim Crow."
 
 The child, staring with round eyes at this instance of liberality,
 wholly unprecedented in his large experience of cent-shops, took the
 man of gingerbread, and quitted the premises.  No sooner had he reached
 the sidewalk (little cannibal that he was!) than Jim Crow's head was in
 his mouth.  As he had not been careful to shut the door, Hepzibah was
 at the pains of closing it after him, with a pettish ejaculation or two
 about the troublesomeness of young people, and particularly of small
 boys.  She had just placed another representative of the renowned Jim
 Crow at the window, when again the shop-bell tinkled clamorously, and
 again the door being thrust open, with its characteristic jerk and jar,
 disclosed the same sturdy little urchin who, precisely two minutes ago,
 had made his exit.  The crumbs and discoloration of the cannibal feast,
 as yet hardly consummated, were exceedingly visible about his mouth.
 
 "What is it now, child?" asked the maiden lady rather impatiently; "did
 you come back to shut the door?"
 
 "No," answered the urchin, pointing to the figure that had just been
--**--**--
 Several times, moreover, besides the above instance, her lady-like
 sensibilities were seriously infringed upon by the familiar, if not
 rude, tone with which people addressed her.  They evidently considered
 themselves not merely her equals, but her patrons and superiors.  Now,
 Hepzibah had unconsciously flattered herself with the idea that there
 would be a gleam or halo, of some kind or other, about her person,
 which would insure an obeisance to her sterling gentility, or, at
 least, a tacit recognition of it.  On the other hand, nothing tortured
 her more intolerably than when this recognition was too prominently
 expressed.  To one or two rather officious offers of sympathy, her
 responses were little short of acrimonious; and, we regret to say,
 Hepzibah was thrown into a positively unchristian state of mind by the
 suspicion that one of her customers was drawn to the shop, not by any
 real need of the article which she pretended to seek, but by a wicked
 wish to stare at her.  The vulgar creature was determined to see for
 herself what sort of a figure a mildewed piece of aristocracy, after
 wasting all the bloom and much of the decline of her life apart from
 the world, would cut behind a counter.  In this particular case,
 however mechanical and innocuous it might be at other times, Hepzibah's
 contortion of brow served her in good stead.
 
 "I never was so frightened in my life!" said the curious customer, in
 describing the incident to one of her acquaintances.  "She's a real old
 vixen, take my word of it! She says little, to be sure; but if you
 could only see the mischief in her eye!"
 
 On the whole, therefore, her new experience led our decayed gentlewoman
 to very disagreeable conclusions as to the temper and manners of what
--**--**--
 After this incident, Hepzibah retreated to the back parlor, where she
 at first caught up a half-finished stocking, and began knitting at it
 with nervous and irregular jerks; but quickly finding herself at odds
 with the stitches, she threw it aside, and walked hurriedly about the
 room. At length she paused before the portrait of the stern old
 Puritan, her ancestor, and the founder of the house. In one sense, this
 picture had almost faded into the canvas, and hidden itself behind the
 duskiness of age; in another, she could not but fancy that it had been
 growing more prominent and strikingly expressive, ever since her
 earliest familiarity with it as a child. For, while the physical
 outline and substance were darkening away from the beholder's eye, the
 bold, hard, and, at the same time, indirect character of the man seemed
 to be brought out in a kind of spiritual relief. Such an effect may
 occasionally be observed in pictures of antique date. They acquire a
 look which an artist (if he have anything like the complacency of
 artists nowadays) would never dream of presenting to a patron as his
 own characteristic expression, but which, nevertheless, we at once
 recognize as reflecting the unlovely truth of a human soul.  In such
 cases, the painter's deep conception of his subject's inward traits has
 wrought itself into the essence of the picture, and is seen after the
 superficial coloring has been rubbed off by time.
 
 While gazing at the portrait, Hepzibah trembled under its eye.  Her
 hereditary reverence made her afraid to judge the character of the
 original so harshly as a perception of the truth compelled her to do.
 But still she gazed, because the face of the picture enabled her--at
 least, she fancied so--to read more accurately, and to a greater depth,
--**--**--
 
 In his younger days--for, after all, there was a dim tradition that he
 had been, not young, but younger--Uncle Venner was commonly regarded as
 rather deficient, than otherwise, in his wits.  In truth he had
 virtually pleaded guilty to the charge, by scarcely aiming at such
 success as other men seek, and by taking only that humble and modest
 part in the intercourse of life which belongs to the alleged
 deficiency.  But now, in his extreme old age,--whether it were that his
 long and hard experience had actually brightened him, or that his
 decaying judgment rendered him less capable of fairly measuring
 himself,--the venerable man made pretensions to no little wisdom, and
 really enjoyed the credit of it.  There was likewise, at times, a vein
 of something like poetry in him; it was the moss or wall-flower of his
 mind in its small dilapidation, and gave a charm to what might have
 been vulgar and commonplace in his earlier and middle life.  Hepzibah
 had a regard for him, because his name was ancient in the town and had
 formerly been respectable.  It was a still better reason for awarding
 him a species of familiar reverence that Uncle Venner was himself the
 most ancient existence, whether of man or thing, in Pyncheon Street,
 except the House of the Seven Gables, and perhaps the elm that
 overshadowed it.
 
 This patriarch now presented himself before Hepzibah, clad in an old
 blue coat, which had a fashionable air, and must have accrued to him
 from the cast-off wardrobe of some dashing clerk.  As for his trousers,
 they were of tow-cloth, very short in the legs, and bagging down
 strangely in the rear, but yet having a suitableness to his figure
 which his other garment entirely lacked.  His hat had relation to no
 other part of his dress, and but very little to the head that wore it.
--**--**--
 believe! At any rate, the Judge bowed and smiled!"
 
 "Yes," said Hepzibah, with something bitter stealing unawares into her
 tone; "my cousin Jaffrey is thought to have a very pleasant smile!"
 
 "And so he has" replied Uncle Venner.  "And that's rather remarkable in
 a Pyncheon; for, begging your pardon, Miss Hepzibah, they never had the
 name of being an easy and agreeable set of folks.  There was no getting
 close to them.  But Now, Miss Hepzibah, if an old man may be bold to
 ask, why don't Judge Pyncheon, with his great means, step forward, and
 tell his cousin to shut up her little shop at once? It's for your
 credit to be doing something, but it's not for the Judge's credit to
 let you!"
 
 "We won't talk of this, if you please, Uncle Venner," said Hepzibah
 coldly.  "I ought to say, however, that, if I choose to earn bread for
 myself, it is not Judge Pyncheon's fault.  Neither will he deserve the
 blame," added she more kindly, remembering Uncle Venner's privileges of
 age and humble familiarity, "if I should, by and by, find it convenient
 to retire with you to your farm."
 
 "And it's no bad place, either, that farm of mine!" cried the old man
 cheerily, as if there were something positively delightful in the
 prospect.  "No bad place is the great brick farm-house, especially for
 them that will find a good many old cronies there, as will be my case.
 I quite long to be among them, sometimes, of the winter evenings; for
 it is but dull business for a lonesome elderly man, like me, to be
 nodding, by the hour together, with no company but his air-tight stove.
 Summer or winter, there's a great deal to be said in favor of my farm!
 And, take it in the autumn, what can be pleasanter than to spend a
--**--**--
 cavalier with a smile, the cheery glow of which was seen reflected on
 his own face as he reentered the vehicle.  The girl then turned towards
 the House of the Seven Gables, to the door of which, meanwhile,--not
 the shop-door, but the antique portal,--the omnibus-man had carried a
 light trunk and a bandbox.  First giving a sharp rap of the old iron
 knocker, he left his passenger and her luggage at the door-step, and
 departed.
 
 "Who can it be?" thought Hepzibah, who had been screwing her visual
 organs into the acutest focus of which they were capable.  "The girl
 must have mistaken the house."  She stole softly into the hall, and,
 herself invisible, gazed through the dusty side-lights of the portal at
 the young, blooming, and very cheerful face which presented itself for
 admittance into the gloomy old mansion.  It was a face to which almost
 any door would have opened of its own accord.
 
 The young girl, so fresh, so unconventional, and yet so orderly and
 obedient to common rules, as you at once recognized her to be, was
 widely in contrast, at that moment, with everything about her.  The
 sordid and ugly luxuriance of gigantic weeds that grew in the angle of
 the house, and the heavy projection that overshadowed her, and the
 time-worn framework of the door,--none of these things belonged to her
 sphere.  But, even as a ray of sunshine, fall into what dismal place it
 may, instantaneously creates for itself a propriety in being there, so
 did it seem altogether fit that the girl should be standing at the
 threshold.  It was no less evidently proper that the door should swing
 open to admit her.   The maiden lady herself, sternly inhospitable in
 her first purposes, soon began to feel that the door ought to be shoved
--**--**--
 Phoebe's process we find it impossible to say.  She appeared to have no
 preliminary design, but gave a touch here and another there; brought
 some articles of furniture to light and dragged others into the shadow;
 looped up or let down a window-curtain; and, in the course of half an
 hour, had fully succeeded in throwing a kindly and hospitable smile
 over the apartment.  No longer ago than the night before, it had
 resembled nothing so much as the old maid's heart; for there was
 neither sunshine nor household fire in one nor the other, and, save for
 ghosts and ghostly reminiscences, not a guest, for many years gone by,
 had entered the heart or the chamber.
 
 There was still another peculiarity of this inscrutable charm.  The
 bedchamber, no doubt, was a chamber of very great and varied
 experience, as a scene of human life:  the joy of bridal nights had
 throbbed itself away here; new immortals had first drawn earthly breath
 here; and here old people had died.  But--whether it were the white
 roses, or whatever the subtile influence might be--a person of delicate
 instinct would have known at once that it was now a maiden's
 bedchamber, and had been purified of all former evil and sorrow by her
 sweet breath and happy thoughts.  Her dreams of the past night, being
 such cheerful ones, had exorcised the gloom, and now haunted the
 chamber in its stead.
 
 After arranging matters to her satisfaction, Phoebe emerged from her
 chamber, with a purpose to descend again into the garden.  Besides the
 rosebush, she had observed several other species of flowers growing
 there in a wilderness of neglect, and obstructing one another's
 development (as is often the parallel case in human society) by their
 uneducated entanglement and confusion.  At the head of the stairs,
--**--**--
 effort, and with frequent outbreaks of song, which were exceedingly
 pleasant to the ear.  This natural tunefulness made Phoebe seem like a
 bird in a shadowy tree; or conveyed the idea that the stream of life
 warbled through her heart as a brook sometimes warbles through a
 pleasant little dell.  It betokened the cheeriness of an active
 temperament, finding joy in its activity, and, therefore, rendering it
 beautiful; it was a New England trait,--the stern old stuff of
 Puritanism with a gold thread in the web.
 
 Hepzibah brought out some old silver spoons with the family crest upon
 them, and a china tea-set painted over with grotesque figures of man,
 bird, and beast, in as grotesque a landscape.  These pictured people
 were odd humorists, in a world of their own,--a world of vivid
 brilliancy, so far as color went, and still unfaded, although the
 teapot and small cups were as ancient as the custom itself of
 tea-drinking.
 
 "Your great-great-great-great-grandmother had these cups, when she was
 married," said Hepzibah to Phoebe.  "She was a Davenport, of a good
 family.  They were almost the first teacups ever seen in the colony;
 and if one of them were to be broken, my heart would break with it.
 But it is nonsense to speak so about a brittle teacup, when I remember
 what my heart has gone through without breaking."
 
 The cups--not having been used, perhaps, since Hepzibah's youth--had
 contracted no small burden of dust, which Phoebe washed away with so
 much care and delicacy as to satisfy even the proprietor of this
 invaluable china.
 
 "What a nice little housewife you are!" exclaimed the latter, smiling,
 and at the same time frowning so prodigiously that the smile was
 sunshine under a thunder-cloud.  "Do you do other things as well?   Are
 you as good at your book as you are at washing teacups?"
--**--**--
 "We must renew our stock, Cousin Hepzibah!" cried the little
 saleswoman.  "The gingerbread figures are all gone, and so are those
 Dutch wooden milkmaids, and most of our other playthings.  There has
 been constant inquiry for cheap raisins, and a great cry for whistles,
 and trumpets, and jew's-harps; and at least a dozen little boys have
 asked for molasses-candy.  And we must contrive to get a peck of russet
 apples, late in the season as it is.  But, dear cousin, what an
 enormous heap of copper!  Positively a copper mountain!"
 
 "Well done! well done! well done!" quoth Uncle Venner, who had taken
 occasion to shuffle in and out of the shop several times in the course
 of the day.  "Here's a girl that will never end her days at my farm!
 Bless my eyes, what a brisk little soul!"
 
 "Yes, Phoebe is a nice girl!" said Hepzibah, with a scowl of austere
 approbation.  "But, Uncle Venner, you have known the family a great
 many years.  Can you tell me whether there ever was a Pyncheon whom she
 takes after?"
 
 "I don't believe there ever was," answered the venerable man.  "At any
 rate, it never was my luck to see her like among them, nor, for that
 matter, anywhere else.  I've seen a great deal of the world, not only
 in people's kitchens and back-yards but at the street-corners, and on
 the wharves, and in other places where my business calls me; and I'm
 free to say, Miss Hepzibah, that I never knew a human creature do her
 work so much like one of God's angels as this child Phoebe does!"
 
 Uncle Venner's eulogium, if it appear rather too high-strained for the
 person and occasion, had, nevertheless, a sense in which it was both
 subtile and true.  There was a spiritual quality in Phoebe's activity.
--**--**--
 her cousin Hepzibah's, who had no taste nor spirits for the lady-like
 employment of cultivating flowers, and--with her recluse habits, and
 tendency to shelter herself within the dismal shadow of the
 house--would hardly have come forth under the speck of open sky to weed
 and hoe among the fraternity of beans and squashes.
 
 It being her first day of complete estrangement from rural objects,
 Phoebe found an unexpected charm in this little nook of grass, and
 foliage, and aristocratic flowers, and plebeian vegetables.  The eye of
 Heaven seemed to look down into it pleasantly, and with a peculiar
 smile, as if glad to perceive that nature, elsewhere overwhelmed, and
 driven out of the dusty town, had here been able to retain a
 breathing-place.  The spot acquired a somewhat wilder grace, and yet a
 very gentle one, from the fact that a pair of robins had built their
 nest in the pear-tree, and were making themselves exceedingly busy and
 happy in the dark intricacy of its boughs.  Bees, too,--strange to
 say,--had thought it worth their while to come hither, possibly from
 the range of hives beside some farm-house miles away.  How many aerial
 voyages might they have made, in quest of honey, or honey-laden,
 betwixt dawn and sunset! Yet, late as it now was, there still arose a
 pleasant hum out of one or two of the squash-blossoms, in the depths of
 which these bees were plying their golden labor.  There was one other
 object in the garden which Nature might fairly claim as her inalienable
 property, in spite of whatever man could do to render it his own.  This
 was a fountain, set round with a rim of old mossy stones, and paved, in
 its bed, with what appeared to be a sort of mosaic-work of variously
 colored pebbles.  The play and slight agitation of the water, in its
--**--**--
 "If you would permit me," said the artist, looking at Phoebe, "I should
 like to try whether the daguerreotype can bring out disagreeable traits
 on a perfectly amiable face.  But there certainly is truth in what you
 have said.  Most of my likenesses do look unamiable; but the very
 sufficient reason, I fancy, is, because the originals are so.  There is
 a wonderful insight in Heaven's broad and simple sunshine.  While we
 give it credit only for depicting the merest surface, it actually
 brings out the secret character with a truth that no painter would ever
 venture upon, even could he detect it.  There is, at least, no flattery
 in my humble line of art.  Now, here is a likeness which I have taken
 over and over again, and still with no better result.  Yet the original
 wears, to common eyes, a very different expression.  It would gratify
 me to have your judgment on this character."
 
 He exhibited a daguerreotype miniature in a morocco case.  Phoebe
 merely glanced at it, and gave it back.
 
 "I know the face," she replied; "for its stern eye has been following
 me about all day.  It is my Puritan ancestor, who hangs yonder in the
 parlor.  To be sure, you have found some way of copying the portrait
 without its black velvet cap and gray beard, and have given him a
 modern coat and satin cravat, instead of his cloak and band.  I don't
 think him improved by your alterations."
 
 "You would have seen other differences had you looked a little longer,"
 said Holgrave, laughing, yet apparently much struck.  "I can assure you
 that this is a modern face, and one which you will very probably meet.
 Now, the remarkable point is, that the original wears, to the world's
 eye,--and, for aught I know, to his most intimate friends,--an
--**--**--
 garden.
 
 "There," said Holgrave, "it is time to give over work! That last stroke
 of the hoe has cut off a beanstalk.  Good-night, Miss Phoebe Pyncheon!
 Any bright day, if you will put one of those rosebuds in your hair, and
 come to my rooms in Central Street, I will seize the purest ray of
 sunshine, and make a picture of the flower and its wearer."  He retired
 towards his own solitary gable, but turned his head, on reaching the
 door, and called to Phoebe, with a tone which certainly had laughter in
 it, yet which seemed to be more than half in earnest.
 
 "Be careful not to drink at Maule's well!" said he.  "Neither drink nor
 bathe your face in it!"
 
 "Maule's well!" answered Phoebe.  "Is that it with the rim of mossy
 stones? I have no thought of drinking there,--but why not?"
 
 "Oh," rejoined the daguerreotypist, "because, like an old lady's cup of
 tea, it is water bewitched!"
 
 He vanished; and Phoebe, lingering a moment, saw a glimmering light,
 and then the steady beam of a lamp, in a chamber of the gable.  On
 returning into Hepzibah's apartment of the house, she found the
 low-studded parlor so dim and dusky that her eyes could not penetrate
 the interior.  She was indistinctly aware, however, that the gaunt
 figure of the old gentlewoman was sitting in one of the straight-backed
 chairs, a little withdrawn from the window, the faint gleam of which
 showed the blanched paleness of her cheek, turned sideways towards a
 corner.
 
 "Shall I light a lamp, Cousin Hepzibah?" she asked.
 
 "Do, if you please, my dear child," answered Hepzibah.  "But put it on
 the table in the corner of the passage.  My eyes are weak; and I can
 seldom bear the lamplight on them."
 
 What an instrument is the human voice! How wonderfully responsive to
--**--**--
 stairs, and, hastening down, found Hepzibah already in the kitchen.
 She stood by a window, holding a book in close contiguity to her nose,
 as if with the hope of gaining an olfactory acquaintance with its
 contents, since her imperfect vision made it not very easy to read
 them.  If any volume could have manifested its essential wisdom in the
 mode suggested, it would certainly have been the one now in Hepzibah's
 hand; and the kitchen, in such an event, would forthwith have streamed
 with the fragrance of venison, turkeys, capons, larded partridges,
 puddings, cakes, and Christmas pies, in all manner of elaborate mixture
 and concoction.  It was a cookery book, full of innumerable old
 fashions of English dishes, and illustrated with engravings, which
 represented the arrangements of the table at such banquets as it might
 have befitted a nobleman to give in the great hall of his castle.  And,
 amid these rich and potent devices of the culinary art (not one of
 which, probably, had been tested, within the memory of any man's
 grandfather), poor Hepzibah was seeking for some nimble little titbit,
 which, with what skill she had, and such materials as were at hand, she
 might toss up for breakfast.
 
 Soon, with a deep sigh, she put aside the savory volume, and inquired
 of Phoebe whether old Speckle, as she called one of the hens, had laid
 an egg the preceding day.  Phoebe ran to see, but returned without the
 expected treasure in her hand.  At that instant, however, the blast of
 a fish-dealer's conch was heard, announcing his approach along the
 street.  With energetic raps at the shop-window, Hepzibah summoned the
 man in, and made purchase of what he warranted as the finest mackerel
 in his cart, and as fat a one as ever he felt with his finger so early
--**--**--
 loosened his grasp without opening it.  Hepzibah, her hands
 convulsively clasped, stood gazing at the entrance.
 
 "Dear Cousin Hepzibah, pray don't look so!" said Phoebe, trembling; for
 her cousin's emotion, and this mysteriously reluctant step, made her
 feel as if a ghost were coming into the room.  "You really frighten me!
 Is something awful going to happen?"
 
 "Hush!" whispered Hepzibah.  "Be cheerful! whatever may happen, be
 nothing but cheerful!"
 
 The final pause at the threshold proved so long, that Hepzibah, unable
 to endure the suspense, rushed forward, threw open the door, and led in
 the stranger by the hand.  At the first glance, Phoebe saw an elderly
 personage, in an old-fashioned dressing-gown of faded damask, and
 wearing his gray or almost white hair of an unusual length.  It quite
 overshadowed his forehead, except when he thrust it back, and stared
 vaguely about the room.  After a very brief inspection of his face, it
 was easy to conceive that his footstep must necessarily be such an one
 as that which, slowly and with as indefinite an aim as a child's first
 journey across a floor, had just brought him hitherward.  Yet there
 were no tokens that his physical strength might not have sufficed for a
 free and determined gait.  It was the spirit of the man that could not
 walk.  The expression of his countenance--while, notwithstanding it had
 the light of reason in it--seemed to waver, and glimmer, and nearly to
 die away, and feebly to recover itself again.  It was like a flame
 which we see twinkling among half-extinguished embers; we gaze at it
 more intently than if it were a positive blaze, gushing vividly
 upward,--more intently, but with a certain impatience, as if it ought
 either to kindle itself into satisfactory splendor, or be at once
 extinguished.
 
 For an instant after entering the room, the guest stood still,
--**--**--
 
 Under this delicate and powerful influence he sat more erect, and
 looked out from his eyes with a glance that took note of what it rested
 on.  It was not so much that his expression grew more intellectual;
 this, though it had its share, was not the most peculiar effect.
 Neither was what we call the moral nature so forcibly awakened as to
 present itself in remarkable prominence.  But a certain fine temper of
 being was now not brought out in full relief, but changeably and
 imperfectly betrayed, of which it was the function to deal with all
 beautiful and enjoyable things.  In a character where it should exist
 as the chief attribute, it would bestow on its possessor an exquisite
 taste, and an enviable susceptibility of happiness.  Beauty would be
 his life; his aspirations would all tend toward it; and, allowing his
 frame and physical organs to be in consonance, his own developments
 would likewise be beautiful.  Such a man should have nothing to do with
 sorrow; nothing with strife; nothing with the martyrdom which, in an
 infinite variety of shapes, awaits those who have the heart, and will,
 and conscience, to fight a battle with the world.  To these heroic
 tempers, such martyrdom is the richest meed in the world's gift.  To
 the individual before us, it could only be a grief, intense in due
 proportion with the severity of the infliction.  He had no right to be
 a martyr; and, beholding him so fit to be happy and so feeble for all
 other purposes, a generous, strong, and noble spirit would, methinks,
 have been ready to sacrifice what little enjoyment it might have
 planned for itself,--it would have flung down the hopes, so paltry in
 its regard,--if thereby the wintry blasts of our rude sphere might come
--**--**--
 forward) now felt herself moved to address the stranger.
 
 "Here is a new kind of rose, which I found this morning in the garden,"
 said she, choosing a small crimson one from among the flowers in the
 vase.  "There will be but five or six on the bush this season.  This is
 the most perfect of them all; not a speck of blight or mildew in it.
 And how sweet it is!--sweet like no other rose! One can never forget
 that scent!"
 
 "Ah!--let me see!--let me hold it!" cried the guest, eagerly seizing
 the flower, which, by the spell peculiar to remembered odors, brought
 innumerable associations along with the fragrance that it exhaled.
 "Thank you! This has done me good.  I remember how I used to prize this
 flower,--long ago, I suppose, very long ago!--or was it only yesterday?
 It makes me feel young again!  Am I young? Either this remembrance is
 singularly distinct, or this consciousness strangely dim! But how kind
 of the fair young girl! Thank you! Thank you!"
 
 The favorable excitement derived from this little crimson rose afforded
 Clifford the brightest moment which he enjoyed at the breakfast-table.
 It might have lasted longer, but that his eyes happened, soon
 afterwards, to rest on the face of the old Puritan, who, out of his
 dingy frame and lustreless canvas, was looking down on the scene like a
 ghost, and a most ill-tempered and ungenial one.  The guest made an
 impatient gesture of the hand, and addressed Hepzibah with what might
 easily be recognized as the licensed irritability of a petted member of
 the family.
 
 "Hepzibah!--Hepzibah!" cried he with no little force and distinctness,
 "why do you keep that odious picture on the wall?  Yes, yes!--that is
 precisely your taste! I have told you, a thousand times, that it was
--**--**--
 course, and a custom of old--on the one person in the world that loved
 him.  "I have never heard such a hateful clamor! Why do you permit it?
 In the name of all dissonance, what can it be?"
 
 It was very remarkable into what prominent relief--even as if a dim
 picture should leap suddenly from its canvas--Clifford's character was
 thrown by this apparently trifling annoyance.  The secret was, that an
 individual of his temper can always be pricked more acutely through his
 sense of the beautiful and harmonious than through his heart.  It is
 even possible--for similar cases have often happened--that if Clifford,
 in his foregoing life, had enjoyed the means of cultivating his taste
 to its utmost perfectibility, that subtile attribute might, before this
 period, have completely eaten out or filed away his affections.  Shall
 we venture to pronounce, therefore, that his long and black calamity
 may not have had a redeeming drop of mercy at the bottom?
 
 "Dear Clifford, I wish I could keep the sound from your ears," said
 Hepzibah, patiently, but reddening with a painful suffusion of shame.
 "It is very disagreeable even to me.  But, do you know, Clifford, I
 have something to tell you? This ugly noise,--pray run, Phoebe, and see
 who is there!--this naughty little tinkle is nothing but our shop-bell!"
 
 "Shop-bell!" repeated Clifford, with a bewildered stare.
 
 "Yes, our shop-bell," said Hepzibah, a certain natural dignity, mingled
 with deep emotion, now asserting itself in her manner.  "For you must
 know, dearest Clifford, that we are very poor.  And there was no other
 resource, but either to accept assistance from a hand that I would push
 aside (and so would you!) were it to offer bread when we were dying for
 it,--no help, save from him, or else to earn our subsistence with my
--**--**--
 purported to be the outward reflection.  And if the observer chanced to
 be ill-natured, as well as acute and susceptible, he would probably
 suspect that the smile on the gentleman's face was a good deal akin to
 the shine on his boots, and that each must have cost him and his
 boot-black, respectively, a good deal of hard labor to bring out and
 preserve them.
 
 As the stranger entered the little shop, where the projection of the
 second story and the thick foliage of the elm-tree, as well as the
 commodities at the window, created a sort of gray medium, his smile
 grew as intense as if he had set his heart on counteracting the whole
 gloom of the atmosphere (besides any moral gloom pertaining to Hepzibah
 and her inmates) by the unassisted light of his countenance.  On
 perceiving a young rose-bud of a girl, instead of the gaunt presence of
 the old maid, a look of surprise was manifest.  He at first knit his
 brows; then smiled with more unctuous benignity than ever.
 
 "Ah, I see how it is!" said he in a deep voice,--a voice which, had it
 come from the throat of an uncultivated man, would have been gruff,
 but, by dint of careful training, was now sufficiently agreeable,--"I
 was not aware that Miss Hepzibah Pyncheon had commenced business under
 such favorable auspices.  You are her assistant, I suppose?"
 
 "I certainly am," answered Phoebe, and added, with a little air of
 lady-like assumption (for, civil as the gentleman was, he evidently
 took her to be a young person serving for wages), "I am a cousin of
 Miss Hepzibah, on a visit to her."
 
 "Her cousin?--and from the country? Pray pardon me, then," said the
 gentleman, bowing and smiling, as Phoebe never had been bowed to nor
--**--**--
 On raising her eyes, Phoebe was startled by the change in Judge
 Pyncheon's face.  It was quite as striking, allowing for the difference
 of scale, as that betwixt a landscape under a broad sunshine and just
 before a thunder-storm; not that it had the passionate intensity of the
 latter aspect, but was cold, hard, immitigable, like a day-long
 brooding cloud.
 
 "Dear me! what is to be done now?" thought the country-girl to herself.
 "He looks as if there were nothing softer in him than a rock, nor
 milder than the east wind! I meant no harm! Since he is really my
 cousin, I would have let him kiss me, if I could!"
 
 Then, all at once, it struck Phoebe that this very Judge Pyncheon was
 the original of the miniature which the daguerreotypist had shown her
 in the garden, and that the hard, stern, relentless look, now on his
 face, was the same that the sun had so inflexibly persisted in bringing
 out.  Was it, therefore, no momentary mood, but, however skilfully
 concealed, the settled temper of his life?  And not merely so, but was
 it hereditary in him, and transmitted down, as a precious heirloom,
 from that bearded ancestor, in whose picture both the expression and,
 to a singular degree, the features of the modern Judge were shown as by
 a kind of prophecy?  A deeper philosopher than Phoebe might have found
 something very terrible in this idea.  It implied that the weaknesses
 and defects, the bad passions, the mean tendencies, and the moral
 diseases which lead to crime are handed down from one generation to
 another, by a far surer process of transmission than human law has been
 able to establish in respect to the riches and honors which it seeks to
 entail upon posterity.
 
 But, as it happened, scarcely had Phoebe's eyes rested again on the
--**--**--
 to his ends, doing his utmost to beat down the strong.  Whether the
 Judge in any degree resembled him, the further progress of our
 narrative may show.
 
 Scarcely any of the items in the above-drawn parallel occurred to
 Phoebe, whose country birth and residence, in truth, had left her
 pitifully ignorant of most of the family traditions, which lingered,
 like cobwebs and incrustations of smoke, about the rooms and
 chimney-corners of the House of the Seven Gables.  Yet there was a
 circumstance, very trifling in itself, which impressed her with an odd
 degree of horror.  She had heard of the anathema flung by Maule, the
 executed wizard, against Colonel Pyncheon and his posterity,--that God
 would give them blood to drink,--and likewise of the popular notion,
 that this miraculous blood might now and then be heard gurgling in
 their throats.  The latter scandal--as became a person of sense, and,
 more especially, a member of the Pyncheon family--Phoebe had set down
 for the absurdity which it unquestionably was.  But ancient
 superstitions, after being steeped in human hearts and embodied in
 human breath, and passing from lip to ear in manifold repetition,
 through a series of generations, become imbued with an effect of homely
 truth.  The smoke of the domestic hearth has scented them through and
 through.  By long transmission among household facts, they grow to look
 like them, and have such a familiar way of making themselves at home
 that their influence is usually greater than we suspect.  Thus it
 happened, that when Phoebe heard a certain noise in Judge Pyncheon's
 throat,--rather habitual with him, not altogether voluntary, yet
 indicative of nothing, unless it were a slight bronchial complaint, or,
 as some people hinted, an apoplectic symptom,--when the girl heard this
 queer and awkward ingurgitation (which the writer never did hear, and
--**--**--
 "May Heaven forgive you, Hepzibah," said Judge Pyncheon,--reverently
 lifting his eyes towards that high court of equity to which he
 appealed,--"if you suffer any ancient prejudice or animosity to weigh
 with you in this matter.  I stand here with an open heart, willing and
 anxious to receive yourself and Clifford into it.  Do not refuse my
 good offices,--my earnest propositions for your welfare! They are such,
 in all respects, as it behooves your nearest kinsman to make.  It will
 be a heavy responsibility, cousin, if you confine your brother to this
 dismal house and stifled air, when the delightful freedom of my
 country-seat is at his command."
 
 "It would never suit Clifford," said Hepzibah, as briefly as before.
 
 "Woman!" broke forth the Judge, giving way to his resentment, "what is
 the meaning of all this? Have you other resources? Nay, I suspected as
 much! Take care, Hepzibah, take care! Clifford is on the brink of as
 black a ruin as ever befell him yet! But why do I talk with you, woman
 as you are? Make way!--I must see Clifford!"
 
 Hepzibah spread out her gaunt figure across the door, and seemed really
 to increase in bulk; looking the more terrible, also, because there was
 so much terror and agitation in her heart.  But Judge Pyncheon's
 evident purpose of forcing a passage was interrupted by a voice from
 the inner room; a weak, tremulous, wailing voice, indicating helpless
 alarm, with no more energy for self-defence than belongs to a
 frightened infant.
 
 "Hepzibah, Hepzibah!" cried the voice; "go down on your knees to him!
 Kiss his feet! Entreat him not to come in! Oh, let him have mercy on
 me! Mercy! mercy!"
 
 For the instant, it appeared doubtful whether it were not the Judge's
 resolute purpose to set Hepzibah aside, and step across the threshold
--**--**--
 disturb him wretchedly to see me so agitated as I am.  There, go, dear
 child, and I will try to look after the shop."
 
 Phoebe went accordingly, but perplexed herself, meanwhile, with queries
 as to the purport of the scene which she had just witnessed, and also
 whether judges, clergymen, and other characters of that eminent stamp
 and respectability, could really, in any single instance, be otherwise
 than just and upright men.   A doubt of this nature has a most
 disturbing influence, and, if shown to be a fact, comes with fearful
 and startling effect on minds of the trim, orderly, and limit-loving
 class, in which we find our little country-girl.  Dispositions more
 boldly speculative may derive a stern enjoyment from the discovery,
 since there must be evil in the world, that a high man is as likely to
 grasp his share of it as a low one.  A wider scope of view, and a
 deeper insight, may see rank, dignity, and station, all proved
 illusory, so far as regards their claim to human reverence, and yet not
 feel as if the universe were thereby tumbled headlong into chaos.  But
 Phoebe, in order to keep the universe in its old place, was fain to
 smother, in some degree, her own intuitions as to Judge Pyncheon's
 character.  And as for her cousin's testimony in disparagement of it,
 she concluded that Hepzibah's judgment was embittered by one of those
 family feuds which render hatred the more deadly by the dead and
 corrupted love that they intermingle with its native poison.
 
 
 
 
                            IX Clifford and Phoebe
 
 
 TRULY was there something high, generous, and noble in the native
 composition of our poor old Hepzibah! Or else,--and it was quite as
 probably the case,--she had been enriched by poverty, developed by
 sorrow, elevated by the strong and solitary affection of her life, and
--**--**--
 Discerning that Clifford was not gladdened by her efforts, Hepzibah
 searched about the house for the means of more exhilarating pastime.
 At one time, her eyes chanced to rest on Alice Pyncheon's harpsichord.
 It was a moment of great peril; for,--despite the traditionary awe that
 had gathered over this instrument of music, and the dirges which
 spiritual fingers were said to play on it,--the devoted sister had
 solemn thoughts of thrumming on its chords for Clifford's benefit, and
 accompanying the performance with her voice.  Poor Clifford! Poor
 Hepzibah! Poor harpsichord! All three would have been miserable
 together.  By some good agency,--possibly, by the unrecognized
 interposition of the long-buried Alice herself,--the threatening
 calamity was averted.
 
 But the worst of all--the hardest stroke of fate for Hepzibah to
 endure, and perhaps for Clifford, too was his invincible distaste for
 her appearance.  Her features, never the most agreeable, and now harsh
 with age and grief, and resentment against the world for his sake; her
 dress, and especially her turban; the queer and quaint manners, which
 had unconsciously grown upon her in solitude,--such being the poor
 gentlewoman's outward characteristics, it is no great marvel, although
 the mournfullest of pities, that the instinctive lover of the Beautiful
 was fain to turn away his eyes.  There was no help for it.  It would be
 the latest impulse to die within him.  In his last extremity, the
 expiring breath stealing faintly through Clifford's lips, he would
 doubtless press Hepzibah's hand, in fervent recognition of all her
 lavished love, and close his eyes,--but not so much to die, as to be
 constrained to look no longer on her face! Poor Hepzibah! She took
 counsel with herself what might be done, and thought of putting ribbons
 on her turban; but, by the instant rush of several guardian angels, was
--**--**--
 what master had taught her, as of asking the same questions about a
 bird, in whose small strain of music we recognize the voice of the
 Creator as distinctly as in the loudest accents of his thunder. So long
 as Phoebe sang, she might stray at her own will about the house.
 Clifford was content, whether the sweet, airy homeliness of her tones
 came down from the upper chambers, or along the passageway from the
 shop, or was sprinkled through the foliage of the pear-tree, inward
 from the garden, with the twinkling sunbeams. He would sit quietly,
 with a gentle pleasure gleaming over his face, brighter now, and now a
 little dimmer, as the song happened to float near him, or was more
 remotely heard. It pleased him best, however, when she sat on a low
 footstool at his knee.
 
 It is perhaps remarkable, considering her temperament, that Phoebe
 oftener chose a strain of pathos than of gayety.  But the young and
 happy are not ill pleased to temper their life with a transparent
 shadow.  The deepest pathos of Phoebe's voice and song, moreover, came
 sifted through the golden texture of a cheery spirit, and was somehow
 so interfused with the quality thence acquired, that one's heart felt
 all the lighter for having wept at it.  Broad mirth, in the sacred
 presence of dark misfortune, would have jarred harshly and irreverently
 with the solemn symphony that rolled its undertone through Hepzibah's
 and her brother's life.  Therefore, it was well that Phoebe so often
 chose sad themes, and not amiss that they ceased to be so sad while she
 was singing them.
 
 Becoming habituated to her companionship, Clifford readily showed how
 capable of imbibing pleasant tints and gleams of cheerful light from
 all quarters his nature must originally have been.  He grew youthful
--**--**--
 things, even were it for a better system, desire nothing so much as to
 be led back.  They shiver in their loneliness, be it on a mountain-top
 or in a dungeon.  Now, Phoebe's presence made a home about her,--that
 very sphere which the outcast, the prisoner, the potentate,--the wretch
 beneath mankind, the wretch aside from it, or the wretch above
 it,--instinctively pines after,--a home! She was real! Holding her
 hand, you felt something; a tender something; a substance, and a warm
 one:  and so long as you should feel its grasp, soft as it was, you
 might be certain that your place was good in the whole sympathetic
 chain of human nature.  The world was no longer a delusion.
 
 By looking a little further in this direction, we might suggest an
 explanation of an often-suggested mystery.  Why are poets so apt to
 choose their mates, not for any similarity of poetic endowment, but for
 qualities which might make the happiness of the rudest handicraftsman
 as well as that of the ideal craftsman of the spirit?  Because,
 probably, at his highest elevation, the poet needs no human
 intercourse; but he finds it dreary to descend, and be a stranger.
 
 There was something very beautiful in the relation that grew up between
 this pair, so closely and constantly linked together, yet with such a
 waste of gloomy and mysterious years from his birthday to hers.  On
 Clifford's part it was the feeling of a man naturally endowed with the
 liveliest sensibility to feminine influence, but who had never quaffed
 the cup of passionate love, and knew that it was now too late.  He knew
 it, with the instinctive delicacy that had survived his intellectual
 decay.  Thus, his sentiment for Phoebe, without being paternal, was not
 less chaste than if she had been his daughter.  He was a man, it is
--**--**--
 through it, that a more delicate intelligence than her own had caught a
 lambent flame from what she read.  One glow of this kind, however, was
 often the precursor of gloom for many hours afterward; because, when
 the glow left him, he seemed conscious of a missing sense and power,
 and groped about for them, as if a blind man should go seeking his lost
 eyesight.
 
 It pleased him more, and was better for his inward welfare, that Phoebe
 should talk, and make passing occurrences vivid to his mind by her
 accompanying description and remarks.  The life of the garden offered
 topics enough for such discourse as suited Clifford best.  He never
 failed to inquire what flowers had bloomed since yesterday.  His
 feeling for flowers was very exquisite, and seemed not so much a taste
 as an emotion; he was fond of sitting with one in his hand, intently
 observing it, and looking from its petals into Phoebe's face, as if the
 garden flower were the sister of the household maiden.  Not merely was
 there a delight in the flower's perfume, or pleasure in its beautiful
 form, and the delicacy or brightness of its hue; but Clifford's
 enjoyment was accompanied with a perception of life, character, and
 individuality, that made him love these blossoms of the garden, as if
 they were endowed with sentiment and intelligence.  This affection and
 sympathy for flowers is almost exclusively a woman's trait.  Men, if
 endowed with it by nature, soon lose, forget, and learn to despise it,
 in their contact with coarser things than flowers.  Clifford, too, had
 long forgotten it; but found it again now, as he slowly revived from
 the chill torpor of his life.
 
 It is wonderful how many pleasant incidents continually came to pass in
 that secluded garden-spot when once Phoebe had set herself to look for
--**--**--
 have vindicated the indefatigable zeal with which she scratched, and
 her unscrupulousness in digging up the choicest flower or vegetable,
 for the sake of the fat earthworm at its root.  Her nervous cluck, when
 the chicken happened to be hidden in the long grass or under the
 squash-leaves; her gentle croak of satisfaction, while sure of it
 beneath her wing; her note of ill-concealed fear and obstreperous
 defiance, when she saw her arch-enemy, a neighbor's cat, on the top of
 the high fence,--one or other of these sounds was to be heard at almost
 every moment of the day.  By degrees, the observer came to feel nearly
 as much interest in this chicken of illustrious race as the mother-hen
 did.
 
 Phoebe, after getting well acquainted with the old hen, was sometimes
 permitted to take the chicken in her hand, which was quite capable of
 grasping its cubic inch or two of body.  While she curiously examined
 its hereditary marks,--the peculiar speckle of its plumage, the funny
 tuft on its head, and a knob on each of its legs,--the little biped, as
 she insisted, kept giving her a sagacious wink.  The daguerreotypist
 once whispered her that these marks betokened the oddities of the
 Pyncheon family, and that the chicken itself was a symbol of the life
 of the old house, embodying its interpretation, likewise, although an
 unintelligible one, as such clews generally are.  It was a feathered
 riddle; a mystery hatched out of an egg, and just as mysterious as if
 the egg had been addle!
 
 The second of Chanticleer's two wives, ever since Phoebe's arrival, had
 been in a state of heavy despondency, caused, as it afterwards
 appeared, by her inability to lay an egg.  One day, however, by her
 self-important gait, the sideways turn of her head, and the cock of her
--**--**--
 who had studied the world at street-corners, and other posts equally
 well adapted for just observation, was as ready to give out his wisdom
 as a town-pump to give water.
 
 "Miss Hepzibah, ma'am," said he once, after they had all been cheerful
 together, "I really enjoy these quiet little meetings of a Sabbath
 afternoon.  They are very much like what I expect to have after I
 retire to my farm!"
 
 "Uncle Venner" observed Clifford in a drowsy, inward tone, "is always
 talking about his farm.  But I have a better scheme for him, by and by.
 We shall see!"
 
 "Ah, Mr. Clifford Pyncheon!" said the man of patches, "you may scheme
 for me as much as you please; but I'm not going to give up this one
 scheme of my own, even if I never bring it really to pass.  It does
 seem to me that men make a wonderful mistake in trying to heap up
 property upon property.  If I had done so, I should feel as if
 Providence was not bound to take care of me; and, at all events, the
 city wouldn't be! I'm one of those people who think that infinity is
 big enough for us all--and eternity long enough."
 
 "Why, so they are, Uncle Venner," remarked Phoebe after a pause; for
 she had been trying to fathom the profundity and appositeness of this
 concluding apothegm.  "But for this short life of ours, one would like
 a house and a moderate garden-spot of one's own."
 
 "It appears to me," said the daguerreotypist, smiling, "that Uncle
 Venner has the principles of Fourier at the bottom of his wisdom; only
 they have not quite so much distinctness in his mind as in that of the
 systematizing Frenchman."
 
 "Come, Phoebe," said Hepzibah, "it is time to bring the currants."
--**--**--
 give him a more vivid sense of active, bustling, and sunshiny existence
 than he had attained in almost any other way.  Nevertheless, its charm
 lay chiefly in the past; for the scissor-grinder's wheel had hissed in
 his childish ears.
 
 He sometimes made doleful complaint that there were no stage-coaches
 nowadays.  And he asked in an injured tone what had become of all those
 old square-topped chaises, with wings sticking out on either side, that
 used to be drawn by a plough-horse, and driven by a farmer's wife and
 daughter, peddling whortle-berries and blackberries about the town.
 Their disappearance made him doubt, he said, whether the berries had
 not left off growing in the broad pastures and along the shady country
 lanes.
 
 But anything that appealed to the sense of beauty, in however humble a
 way, did not require to be recommended by these old associations.  This
 was observable when one of those Italian boys (who are rather a modern
 feature of our streets) came along with his barrel-organ, and stopped
 under the wide and cool shadows of the elm.  With his quick
 professional eye he took note of the two faces watching him from the
 arched window, and, opening his instrument, began to scatter its
 melodies abroad.  He had a monkey on his shoulder, dressed in a
 Highland plaid; and, to complete the sum of splendid attractions
 wherewith he presented himself to the public, there was a company of
 little figures, whose sphere and habitation was in the mahogany case of
 his organ, and whose principle of life was the music which the Italian
 made it his business to grind out.  In all their variety of
 occupation,--the cobbler, the blacksmith, the soldier, the lady with
 her fan, the toper with his bottle, the milk-maid sitting by her
 cow--this fortunate little society might truly be said to enjoy a
--**--**--
 feels it to be fool's play, when he can distinguish the tedious
 commonplace of each man's visage, with the perspiration and weary
 self-importance on it, and the very cut of his pantaloons, and the
 stiffness or laxity of his shirt-collar, and the dust on the back of
 his black coat.  In order to become majestic, it should be viewed from
 some vantage point, as it rolls its slow and long array through the
 centre of a wide plain, or the stateliest public square of a city; for
 then, by its remoteness, it melts all the petty personalities, of which
 it is made up, into one broad mass of existence,--one great life,--one
 collected body of mankind, with a vast, homogeneous spirit animating
 it.  But, on the other hand, if an impressible person, standing alone
 over the brink of one of these processions, should behold it, not in
 its atoms, but in its aggregate,--as a mighty river of life, massive in
 its tide, and black with mystery, and, out of its depths, calling to
 the kindred depth within him,--then the contiguity would add to the
 effect.  It might so fascinate him that he would hardly be restrained
 from plunging into the surging stream of human sympathies.
 
 So it proved with Clifford.  He shuddered; he grew pale; he threw an
 appealing look at Hepzibah and Phoebe, who were with him at the window.
 They comprehended nothing of his emotions, and supposed him merely
 disturbed by the unaccustomed tumult.  At last, with tremulous limbs,
 he started up, set his foot on the window-sill, and in an instant more
 would have been in the unguarded balcony.  As it was, the whole
 procession might have seen him, a wild, haggard figure, his gray locks
 floating in the wind that waved their banners; a lonely being,
--**--**--
 pegs, or been laid away in trunks, so long that the dampness and mouldy
 smell of the past was on them,--made themselves ready, in their faded
 bettermost, to go to church.  They descended the staircase
 together,--gaunt, sallow Hepzibah, and pale, emaciated, age-stricken
 Clifford! They pulled open the front door, and stepped across the
 threshold, and felt, both of them, as if they were standing in the
 presence of the whole world, and with mankind's great and terrible eye
 on them alone.  The eye of their Father seemed to be withdrawn, and
 gave them no encouragement.  The warm sunny air of the street made them
 shiver.   Their hearts quaked within them at the idea of taking one
 step farther.
 
 "It cannot be, Hepzibah!--it is too late," said Clifford with deep
 sadness.  "We are ghosts! We have no right among human beings,--no
 right anywhere but in this old house, which has a curse on it, and
 which, therefore, we are doomed to haunt! And, besides," he continued,
 with a fastidious sensibility, inalienably characteristic of the man,
 "it would not be fit nor beautiful to go! It is an ugly thought that I
 should be frightful to my fellow-beings, and that children would cling
 to their mothers' gowns at sight of me!"
 
 They shrank back into the dusky passage-way, and closed the door.  But,
 going up the staircase again, they found the whole interior of the
 house tenfold more dismal, and the air closer and heavier, for the
 glimpse and breath of freedom which they had just snatched.  They could
 not flee; their jailer had but left the door ajar in mockery, and stood
 behind it to watch them stealing out.  At the threshold, they felt his
 pitiless gripe upon them.  For, what other dungeon is so dark as one's
 own heart! What jailer so inexorable as one's self!
--**--**--
 mind differently situated was no monotony to Clifford.  Possibly, he
 was in a state of second growth and recovery, and was constantly
 assimilating nutriment for his spirit and intellect from sights,
 sounds, and events which passed as a perfect void to persons more
 practised with the world.  As all is activity and vicissitude to the
 new mind of a child, so might it be, likewise, to a mind that had
 undergone a kind of new creation, after its long-suspended life.
 
 Be the cause what it might, Clifford commonly retired to rest,
 thoroughly exhausted, while the sunbeams were still melting through his
 window-curtains, or were thrown with late lustre on the chamber wall.
 And while he thus slept early, as other children do, and dreamed of
 childhood, Phoebe was free to follow her own tastes for the remainder
 of the day and evening.
 
 This was a freedom essential to the health even of a character so
 little susceptible of morbid influences as that of Phoebe.  The old
 house, as we have already said, had both the dry-rot and the damp-rot
 in its walls; it was not good to breathe no other atmosphere than that.
 Hepzibah, though she had her valuable and redeeming traits, had grown
 to be a kind of lunatic by imprisoning herself so long in one place,
 with no other company than a single series of ideas, and but one
 affection, and one bitter sense of wrong.  Clifford, the reader may
 perhaps imagine, was too inert to operate morally on his
 fellow-creatures, however intimate and exclusive their relations with
 him.  But the sympathy or magnetism among human beings is more subtile
 and universal than we think; it exists, indeed, among different classes
 of organized life, and vibrates from one to another.  A flower, for
 instance, as Phoebe herself observed, always began to droop sooner in
--**--**--
 packet-ship, he had visited Europe, and found means, before his return,
 to see Italy, and part of France and Germany.  At a later period he had
 spent some months in a community of Fourierists.  Still more recently
 he had been a public lecturer on Mesmerism, for which science (as he
 assured Phoebe, and, indeed, satisfactorily proved, by putting
 Chanticleer, who happened to be scratching near by, to sleep) he had
 very remarkable endowments.
 
 His present phase, as a daguerreotypist, was of no more importance in
 his own view, nor likely to be more permanent, than any of the
 preceding ones.  It had been taken up with the careless alacrity of an
 adventurer, who had his bread to earn.  It would be thrown aside as
 carelessly, whenever he should choose to earn his bread by some other
 equally digressive means.  But what was most remarkable, and, perhaps,
 showed a more than common poise in the young man, was the fact that,
 amid all these personal vicissitudes, he had never lost his identity.
 Homeless as he had been,--continually changing his whereabout, and,
 therefore, responsible neither to public opinion nor to
 individuals,--putting off one exterior, and snatching up another, to be
 soon shifted for a third,--he had never violated the innermost man, but
 had carried his conscience along with him.  It was impossible to know
 Holgrave without recognizing this to be the fact.   Hepzibah had seen
 it.  Phoebe soon saw it likewise, and gave him the sort of confidence
 which such a certainty inspires.  She was startled, however, and
 sometimes repelled,--not by any doubt of his integrity to whatever law
 he acknowledged, but by a sense that his law differed from her own.  He
 made her uneasy, and seemed to unsettle everything around her, by his
 lack of reverence for what was fixed, unless, at a moment's warning, it
--**--**--
 necessarily mixed up with the babble of the multitude, so that both one
 and the other were apt to lose any sense that might have been properly
 their own.  He considered himself a thinker, and was certainly of a
 thoughtful turn, but, with his own path to discover, had perhaps hardly
 yet reached the point where an educated man begins to think.  The true
 value of his character lay in that deep consciousness of inward
 strength, which made all his past vicissitudes seem merely like a
 change of garments; in that enthusiasm, so quiet that he scarcely knew
 of its existence, but which gave a warmth to everything that he laid
 his hand on; in that personal ambition, hidden--from his own as well as
 other eyes--among his more generous impulses, but in which lurked a
 certain efficacy, that might solidify him from a theorist into the
 champion of some practicable cause.  Altogether in his culture and want
 of culture,--in his crude, wild, and misty philosophy, and the
 practical experience that counteracted some of its tendencies; in his
 magnanimous zeal for man's welfare, and his recklessness of whatever
 the ages had established in man's behalf; in his faith, and in his
 infidelity; in what he had, and in what he lacked,--the artist might
 fitly enough stand forth as the representative of many compeers in his
 native land.
 
 His career it would be difficult to prefigure.  There appeared to be
 qualities in Holgrave, such as, in a country where everything is free
 to the hand that can grasp it, could hardly fail to put some of the
 world's prizes within his reach.  But these matters are delightfully
 uncertain.  At almost every step in life, we meet with young men of
 just about Holgrave's age, for whom we anticipate wonderful things, but
--**--**--
 years, or thereabouts, as a hint to the people to examine into and
 reform the institutions which they symbolize."
 
 "How you hate everything old!" said Phoebe in dismay.  "It makes me
 dizzy to think of such a shifting world!"
 
 "I certainly love nothing mouldy," answered Holgrave.  "Now, this old
 Pyncheon House! Is it a wholesome place to live in, with its black
 shingles, and the green moss that shows how damp they are?--its dark,
 low-studded rooms--its grime and sordidness, which are the
 crystallization on its walls of the human breath, that has been drawn
 and exhaled here in discontent and anguish? The house ought to be
 purified with fire,--purified till only its ashes remain!"
 
 "Then why do you live in it?" asked Phoebe, a little piqued.
 
 "Oh, I am pursuing my studies here; not in books, however," replied
 Holgrave.  "The house, in my view, is expressive of that odious and
 abominable Past, with all its bad influences, against which I have just
 been declaiming.  I dwell in it for a while, that I may know the better
 how to hate it.  By the bye, did you ever hear the story of Maule, the
 wizard, and what happened between him and your immeasurably
 great-grandfather?"
 
 "Yes, indeed!" said Phoebe; "I heard it long ago, from my father, and
 two or three times from my cousin Hepzibah, in the month that I have
 been here.  She seems to think that all the calamities of the Pyncheons
 began from that quarrel with the wizard, as you call him.  And you, Mr.
 Holgrave look as if you thought so too!  How singular that you should
 believe what is so very absurd, when you reject many things that are a
 great deal worthier of credit!"
 
 "I do believe it," said the artist seriously; "not as a superstition,
--**--**--
 
 As this latter point was one which the daguerreotypist could not decide
 for himself, he forthwith produced his roll of manuscript, and, while
 the late sunbeams gilded the seven gables, began to read.
 
 
 
 
                           XIII Alice Pyncheon
 
 
 THERE was a message brought, one day, from the worshipful Gervayse
 Pyncheon to young Matthew Maule, the carpenter, desiring his immediate
 presence at the House of the Seven Gables.
 
 "And what does your master want with me?" said the carpenter to Mr.
 Pyncheon's black servant.  "Does the house need any repair?  Well it
 may, by this time; and no blame to my father who built it, neither! I
 was reading the old Colonel's tombstone, no longer ago than last
 Sabbath; and, reckoning from that date, the house has stood
 seven-and-thirty years.  No wonder if there should be a job to do on
 the roof."
 
 "Don't know what massa wants," answered Scipio.  "The house is a berry
 good house, and old Colonel Pyncheon think so too, I reckon;--else why
 the old man haunt it so, and frighten a poor nigga, As he does?"
 
 "Well, well, friend Scipio; let your master know that I'm coming," said
 the carpenter with a laugh.  "For a fair, workmanlike job, he'll find
 me his man.  And so the house is haunted, is it? It will take a tighter
 workman than I am to keep the spirits out of the Seven Gables.  Even if
 the Colonel would be quiet," he added, muttering to himself, "my old
 grandfather, the wizard, will be pretty sure to stick to the Pyncheons
 as long as their walls hold together."
 
 "What's that you mutter to yourself, Matthew Maule?" asked Scipio.
 "And what for do you look so black at me?"
 
 "No matter, darky," said the carpenter.  "Do you think nobody is to
 look black but yourself? Go tell your master I'm coming; and if you
--**--**--
 crevices of the rocks, were supposed to be incapable of retaining the
 occupants who had been so hastily thrust into them.  Old Matthew Maule,
 especially, was known to have as little hesitation or difficulty in
 rising out of his grave as an ordinary man in getting out of bed, and
 was as often seen at midnight as living people at noonday.  This
 pestilent wizard (in whom his just punishment seemed to have wrought no
 manner of amendment) had an inveterate habit of haunting a certain
 mansion, styled the House of the Seven Gables, against the owner of
 which he pretended to hold an unsettled claim for ground-rent.  The
 ghost, it appears,--with the pertinacity which was one of his
 distinguishing characteristics while alive,--insisted that he was the
 rightful proprietor of the site upon which the house stood.  His terms
 were, that either the aforesaid ground-rent, from the day when the
 cellar began to be dug, should be paid down, or the mansion itself
 given up; else he, the ghostly creditor, would have his finger in all
 the affairs of the Pyncheons, and make everything go wrong with them,
 though it should be a thousand years after his death.  It was a wild
 story, perhaps, but seemed not altogether so incredible to those who
 could remember what an inflexibly obstinate old fellow this wizard
 Maule had been.
 
 Now, the wizard's grandson, the young Matthew Maule of our story, was
 popularly supposed to have inherited some of his ancestor's
 questionable traits.  It is wonderful how many absurdities were
 promulgated in reference to the young man.  He was fabled, for example,
 to have a strange power of getting into people's dreams, and regulating
 matters there according to his own fancy, pretty much like the
 stage-manager of a theatre.  There was a great deal of talk among the
--**--**--
 master's presence. The room in which this gentleman sat was a parlor of
 moderate size, looking out upon the garden of the house, and having its
 windows partly shadowed by the foliage of fruit-trees. It was Mr.
 Pyncheon's peculiar apartment, and was provided with furniture, in an
 elegant and costly style, principally from Paris; the floor (which was
 unusual at that day) being covered with a carpet, so skilfully and
 richly wrought that it seemed to glow as with living flowers. In one
 corner stood a marble woman, to whom her own beauty was the sole and
 sufficient garment. Some pictures--that looked old, and had a mellow
 tinge diffused through all their artful splendor--hung on the walls.
 Near the fireplace was a large and very beautiful cabinet of ebony,
 inlaid with ivory; a piece of antique furniture, which Mr. Pyncheon had
 bought in Venice, and which he used as the treasure-place for medals,
 ancient coins, and whatever small and valuable curiosities he had
 picked up on his travels. Through all this variety of decoration,
 however, the room showed its original characteristics; its low stud,
 its cross-beam, its chimney-piece, with the old-fashioned Dutch tiles;
 so that it was the emblem of a mind industriously stored with foreign
 ideas, and elaborated into artificial refinement, but neither larger,
 nor, in its proper self, more elegant than before.
 
 There were two objects that appeared rather out of place in this very
 handsomely furnished room.  One was a large map, or surveyor's plan, of
 a tract of land, which looked as if it had been drawn a good many years
 ago, and was now dingy with smoke, and soiled, here and there, with the
 touch of fingers.  The other was a portrait of a stern old man, in a
 Puritan garb, painted roughly, but with a bold effect, and a remarkably
--**--**--
 cold ear to these propositions. At last, however, with a strange kind
 of laugh, he inquired whether Mr. Pyncheon would make over to him the
 old wizard's homestead-ground, together with the House of the Seven
 Gables, now standing on it, in requital of the documentary evidence so
 urgently required.
 
 The wild, chimney-corner legend (which, without copying all its
 extravagances, my narrative essentially follows) here gives an account
 of some very strange behavior on the part of Colonel Pyncheon's
 portrait.  This picture, it must be understood, was supposed to be so
 intimately connected with the fate of the house, and so magically built
 into its walls, that, if once it should be removed, that very instant
 the whole edifice would come thundering down in a heap of dusty ruin.
 All through the foregoing conversation between Mr. Pyncheon and the
 carpenter, the portrait had been frowning, clenching its fist, and
 giving many such proofs of excessive discomposure, but without
 attracting the notice of either of the two colloquists.  And finally,
 at Matthew Maule's audacious suggestion of a transfer of the
 seven-gabled structure, the ghostly portrait is averred to have lost
 all patience, and to have shown itself on the point of descending
 bodily from its frame.  But such incredible incidents are merely to be
 mentioned aside.
 
 "Give up this house!" exclaimed Mr. Pyncheon, in amazement at the
 proposal.  "Were I to do so, my grandfather would not rest quiet in his
 grave!"
 
 "He never has, if all stories are true," remarked the carpenter
 composedly.  "But that matter concerns his grandson more than it does
 Matthew Maule.  I have no other terms to propose."
 
 Impossible as he at first thought it to comply with Maule's conditions,
 still, on a second glance, Mr. Pyncheon was of opinion that they might
 at least be made matter of discussion.  He himself had no personal
--**--**--
 rank, this fair girl deemed herself conscious of a power--combined of
 beauty, high, unsullied purity, and the preservative force of
 womanhood--that could make her sphere impenetrable, unless betrayed by
 treachery within.  She instinctively knew, it may be, that some
 sinister or evil potency was now striving to pass her barriers; nor
 would she decline the contest.  So Alice put woman's might against
 man's might; a match not often equal on the part of woman.
 
 Her father meanwhile had turned away, and seemed absorbed in the
 contemplation of a landscape by Claude, where a shadowy and
 sun-streaked vista penetrated so remotely into an ancient wood, that it
 would have been no wonder if his fancy had lost itself in the picture's
 bewildering depths.  But, in truth, the picture was no more to him at
 that moment than the blank wall against which it hung.  His mind was
 haunted with the many and strange tales which he had heard, attributing
 mysterious if not supernatural endowments to these Maules, as well the
 grandson here present as his two immediate ancestors.  Mr. Pyncheon's
 long residence abroad, and intercourse with men of wit and
 fashion,--courtiers, worldings, and free-thinkers,--had done much
 towards obliterating the grim Puritan superstitions, which no man of
 New England birth at that early period could entirely escape.  But, on
 the other hand, had not a whole community believed Maule's grandfather
 to be a wizard? Had not the crime been proved? Had not the wizard died
 for it? Had he not bequeathed a legacy of hatred against the Pyncheons
 to this only grandson, who, as it appeared, was now about to exercise a
 subtle influence over the daughter of his enemy's house?  Might not
 this influence be the same that was called witchcraft?
 
 Turning half around, he caught a glimpse of Maule's figure in the
--**--**--
 
 "There she is!" said the carpenter.  "Speak to her!"
 
 "Alice! My daughter!" exclaimed Mr. Pyncheon.  "My own Alice!"
 
 She did not stir.
 
 "Louder!" said Maule, smiling.
 
 "Alice! Awake!" cried her father.  "It troubles me to see you thus!
 Awake!"
 
 He spoke loudly, with terror in his voice, and close to that delicate
 ear which had always been so sensitive to every discord.  But the sound
 evidently reached her not.  It is indescribable what a sense of remote,
 dim, unattainable distance betwixt himself and Alice was impressed on
 the father by this impossibility of reaching her with his voice.
 
 "Best touch her!" said Matthew Maule "Shake the girl, and roughly, too!
 My hands are hardened with too much use of axe, saw, and plane,--else I
 might help you!"
 
 Mr. Pyncheon took her hand, and pressed it with the earnestness of
 startled emotion.  He kissed her, with so great a heart-throb in the
 kiss, that he thought she must needs feel it.  Then, in a gust of anger
 at her insensibility, he shook her maiden form with a violence which,
 the next moment, it affrighted him to remember.  He withdrew his
 encircling arms, and Alice--whose figure, though flexible, had been
 wholly impassive--relapsed into the same attitude as before these
 attempts to arouse her.  Maule having shifted his position, her face
 was turned towards him slightly, but with what seemed to be a reference
 of her very slumber to his guidance.
 
 Then it was a strange sight to behold how the man of conventionalities
 shook the powder out of his periwig; how the reserved and stately
 gentleman forgot his dignity; how the gold-embroidered waistcoat
 flickered and glistened in the firelight with the convulsion of rage,
 terror, and sorrow in the human heart that was beating under it.
 
 "Villain!" cried Mr. Pyncheon, shaking his clenched fist at Maule.
--**--**--
 "It will never be allowed," said he.  "The custody of this secret, that
 would so enrich his heirs, makes part of your grandfather's
 retribution.  He must choke with it until it is no longer of any value.
 And keep you the House of the Seven Gables! It is too dear bought an
 inheritance, and too heavy with the curse upon it, to be shifted yet
 awhile from the Colonel's posterity."
 
 Mr. Pyncheon tried to speak, but--what with fear and passion--could
 make only a gurgling murmur in his throat.  The carpenter smiled.
 
 "Aha, worshipful sir!--so you have old Maule's blood to drink!" said he
 jeeringly.
 
 "Fiend in man's shape! why dost thou keep dominion over my child?"
 cried Mr. Pyncheon, when his choked utterance could make way.  "Give me
 back my daughter.  Then go thy ways; and may we never meet again!"
 
 "Your daughter!" said Matthew Maule.  "Why, she is fairly mine!
 Nevertheless, not to be too hard with fair Mistress Alice, I will leave
 her in your keeping; but I do not warrant you that she shall never have
 occasion to remember Maule, the carpenter."
 
 He waved his hands with an upward motion; and, after a few repetitions
 of similar gestures, the beautiful Alice Pyncheon awoke from her
 strange trance.  She awoke without the slightest recollection of her
 visionary experience; but as one losing herself in a momentary reverie,
 and returning to the consciousness of actual life, in almost as brief
 an interval as the down-sinking flame of the hearth should quiver again
 up the chimney.  On recognizing Matthew Maule, she assumed an air of
 somewhat cold but gentle dignity, the rather, as there was a certain
 peculiar smile on the carpenter's visage that stirred the native pride
 of the fair Alice.   So ended, for that time, the quest for the lost
--**--**--
 beside the harpsichord, and filled the house with music!  Music in
 which a strain of the heavenly choristers was echoed! Oh; joy! For
 Alice had borne her last humiliation! Oh, greater joy! For Alice was
 penitent of her one earthly sin, and proud no more!
 
 The Pyncheons made a great funeral for Alice.  The kith and kin were
 there, and the whole respectability of the town besides.  But, last in
 the procession, came Matthew Maule, gnashing his teeth, as if he would
 have bitten his own heart in twain,--the darkest and wofullest man that
 ever walked behind a corpse! He meant to humble Alice, not to kill her;
 but he had taken a woman's delicate soul into his rude gripe, to play
 with--and she was dead!
 
 
 
 
                             XIV Phoebe's Good-Bye
 
 
 HOLGRAVE, plunging into his tale with the energy and absorption natural
 to a young author, had given a good deal of action to the parts capable
 of being developed and exemplified in that manner.  He now observed
 that a certain remarkable drowsiness (wholly unlike that with which the
 reader possibly feels himself affected) had been flung over the senses
 of his auditress.  It was the effect, unquestionably, of the mystic
 gesticulations by which he had sought to bring bodily before Phoebe's
 perception the figure of the mesmerizing carpenter.  With the lids
 drooping over her eyes,--now lifted for an instant, and drawn down
 again as with leaden weights,--she leaned slightly towards him, and
 seemed almost to regulate her breath by his.  Holgrave gazed at her, as
 he rolled up his manuscript, and recognized an incipient stage of that
 curious psychological condition which, as he had himself told Phoebe,
 he possessed more than an ordinary faculty of producing.  A veil was
 beginning to be muffled about her, in which she could behold only him,
--**--**--
 stirred them.  Through the foliage that roofed the little summer-house
 the moonlight flickered to and fro, and fell silvery white on the dark
 floor, the table, and the circular bench, with a continual shift and
 play, according as the chinks and wayward crevices among the twigs
 admitted or shut out the glimmer.
 
 So sweetly cool was the atmosphere, after all the feverish day, that
 the summer eve might be fancied as sprinkling dews and liquid
 moonlight, with a dash of icy temper in them, out of a silver vase.
 Here and there, a few drops of this freshness were scattered on a human
 heart, and gave it youth again, and sympathy with the eternal youth of
 nature.  The artist chanced to be one on whom the reviving influence
 fell.  It made him feel--what he sometimes almost forgot, thrust so
 early as he had been into the rude struggle of man with man--how
 youthful he still was.
 
 "It seems to me," he observed, "that I never watched the coming of so
 beautiful an eve, and never felt anything so very much like happiness
 as at this moment.  After all, what a good world we live in! How good,
 and beautiful! How young it is, too, with nothing really rotten or
 age-worn in it! This old house, for example, which sometimes has
 positively oppressed my breath with its smell of decaying timber! And
 this garden, where the black mould always clings to my spade, as if I
 were a sexton delving in a graveyard! Could I keep the feeling that now
 possesses me, the garden would every day be virgin soil, with the
 earth's first freshness in the flavor of its beans and squashes; and
 the house!--it would be like a bower in Eden, blossoming with the
 earliest roses that God ever made.  Moonlight, and the sentiment in
--**--**--
 what little flexibility she has.  They both exist by you."
 
 "I should be very sorry to think so," answered Phoebe gravely.  "But it
 is true that my small abilities were precisely what they needed; and I
 have a real interest in their welfare,--an odd kind of motherly
 sentiment,--which I wish you would not laugh at!  And let me tell you
 frankly, Mr. Holgrave, I am sometimes puzzled to know whether you wish
 them well or ill."
 
 "Undoubtedly," said the daguerreotypist, "I do feel an interest in this
 antiquated, poverty-stricken old maiden lady, and this degraded and
 shattered gentleman,--this abortive lover of the beautiful.  A kindly
 interest, too, helpless old children that they are! But you have no
 conception what a different kind of heart mine is from your own.  It is
 not my impulse, as regards these two individuals, either to help or
 hinder; but to look on, to analyze, to explain matters to myself, and
 to comprehend the drama which, for almost two hundred years, has been
 dragging its slow length over the ground where you and I now tread.  If
 permitted to witness the close, I doubt not to derive a moral
 satisfaction from it, go matters how they may.  There is a conviction
 within me that the end draws nigh.  But, though Providence sent you
 hither to help, and sends me only as a privileged and meet spectator, I
 pledge myself to lend these unfortunate beings whatever aid I can!"
 
 "I wish you would speak more plainly," cried Phoebe, perplexed and
 displeased; "and, above all, that you would feel more like a Christian
 and a human being! How is it possible to see people in distress without
 desiring, more than anything else, to help and comfort them? You talk
 as if this old house were a theatre; and you seem to look at Hepzibah's
--**--**--
 "Very soon, Uncle Venner," replied Phoebe.
 
 "And let it be all the sooner, Phoebe, for the sake of those poor souls
 yonder," continued her companion.  "They can never do without you,
 now,--never, Phoebe; never--no more than if one of God's angels had
 been living with them, and making their dismal house pleasant and
 comfortable! Don't it seem to you they'd be in a sad case, if, some
 pleasant summer morning like this, the angel should spread his wings,
 and fly to the place he came from? Well, just so they feel, now that
 you're going home by the railroad!  They can't bear it, Miss Phoebe; so
 be sure to come back!"
 
 "I am no angel, Uncle Venner," said Phoebe, smiling, as she offered him
 her hand at the street-corner.  "But, I suppose, people never feel so
 much like angels as when they are doing what little good they may.  So
 I shall certainly come back!"
 
 Thus parted the old man and the rosy girl; and Phoebe took the wings of
 the morning, and was soon flitting almost as rapidly away as if endowed
 with the aerial locomotion of the angels to whom Uncle Venner had so
 graciously compared her.
 
 
 
 
                          XV The Scowl and Smile
 
 
 SEVERAL days passed over the Seven Gables, heavily and drearily enough.
 In fact (not to attribute the whole gloom of sky and earth to the one
 inauspicious circumstance of Phoebe's departure), an easterly storm had
 set in, and indefatigably apply itself to the task of making the black
 roof and walls of the old house look more cheerless than ever before.
 Yet was the outside not half so cheerless as the interior.  Poor
 Clifford was cut off, at once, from all his scanty resources of
 enjoyment.  Phoebe was not there; nor did the sunshine fall upon the
--**--**--
 secluded.  Why insulate him thus from all sympathy and kindness?
 Clifford, alas! has had too much of solitude.  Now let him try
 society,--the society, that is to say, of kindred and old friends.  Let
 me, for instance, but see Clifford, and I will answer for the good
 effect of the interview."
 
 "You cannot see him," answered Hepzibah.  "Clifford has kept his bed
 since yesterday."
 
 "What! How! Is he ill?" exclaimed Judge Pyncheon, starting with what
 seemed to be angry alarm; for the very frown of the old Puritan
 darkened through the room as he spoke.  "Nay, then, I must and will see
 him! What if he should die?"
 
 "He is in no danger of death," said Hepzibah,--and added, with
 bitterness that she could repress no longer, "none; unless he shall be
 persecuted to death, now, by the same man who long ago attempted it!"
 
 "Cousin Hepzibah," said the Judge, with an impressive earnestness of
 manner, which grew even to tearful pathos as he proceeded, "is it
 possible that you do not perceive how unjust, how unkind, how
 unchristian, is this constant, this long-continued bitterness against
 me, for a part which I was constrained by duty and conscience, by the
 force of law, and at my own peril, to act? What did I do, in detriment
 to Clifford, which it was possible to leave undone?  How could you, his
 sister,--if, for your never-ending sorrow, as it has been for mine, you
 had known what I did,--have, shown greater tenderness? And do you
 think, cousin, that it has cost me no pang?--that it has left no
 anguish in my bosom, from that day to this, amidst all the prosperity
 with which Heaven has blessed me?--or that I do not now rejoice, when
 it is deemed consistent with the dues of public justice and the welfare
--**--**--
 assumed sternness, the sense of power, and immitigable resolve; and
 this with so natural and imperceptible a change, that it seemed as if
 the iron man had stood there from the first, and the meek man not at
 all.  The effect was as when the light, vapory clouds, with their soft
 coloring, suddenly vanish from the stony brow of a precipitous
 mountain, and leave there the frown which you at once feel to be
 eternal.  Hepzibah almost adopted the insane belief that it was her old
 Puritan ancestor, and not the modern Judge, on whom she had just been
 wreaking the bitterness of her heart.  Never did a man show stronger
 proof of the lineage attributed to him than Judge Pyncheon, at this
 crisis, by his unmistakable resemblance to the picture in the inner
 room.
 
 "Cousin Hepzibah," said he very calmly, "it is time to have done with
 this."
 
 "With all my heart!" answered she.  "Then, why do you persecute us any
 longer? Leave poor Clifford and me in peace.  Neither of us desires
 anything better!"
 
 "It is my purpose to see Clifford before I leave this house," continued
 the Judge.  "Do not act like a madwoman, Hepzibah! I am his only
 friend, and an all-powerful one.  Has it never occurred to you,--are
 you so blind as not to have seen,--that, without not merely my consent,
 but my efforts, my representations, the exertion of my whole influence,
 political, official, personal, Clifford would never have been what you
 call free? Did you think his release a triumph over me? Not so, my good
 cousin; not so, by any means!  The furthest possible from that! No; but
 it was the accomplishment of a purpose long entertained on my part.  I
 set him free!"
 
 "You!" answered Hepzibah.  "I never will believe it! He owed his
--**--**--
 thoroughly convinced that there was truth in what he said.  Clifford,
 at this moment, if he chooses,--and choose he must!--can inform me
 where to find the schedule, the documents, the evidences, in whatever
 shape they exist, of the vast amount of Uncle Jaffrey's missing
 property.  He has the secret.  His boast was no idle word.  It had a
 directness, an emphasis, a particularity, that showed a backbone of
 solid meaning within the mystery of his expression."
 
 "But what could have been Clifford's object," asked Hepzibah, "in
 concealing it so long?"
 
 "It was one of the bad impulses of our fallen nature," replied the
 Judge, turning up his eyes.  "He looked upon me as his enemy.  He
 considered me as the cause of his overwhelming disgrace, his imminent
 peril of death, his irretrievable ruin.  There was no great
 probability, therefore, of his volunteering information, out of his
 dungeon, that should elevate me still higher on the ladder of
 prosperity.  But the moment has now come when he must give up his
 secret."
 
 "And what if he should refuse?" inquired Hepzibah.  "Or,--as I
 steadfastly believe,--what if he has no knowledge of this wealth?"
 
 "My dear cousin," said Judge Pyncheon, with a quietude which he had the
 power of making more formidable than any violence, "since your
 brother's return, I have taken the precaution (a highly proper one in
 the near kinsman and natural guardian of an individual so situated) to
 have his deportment and habits constantly and carefully overlooked.
 Your neighbors have been eye-witnesses to whatever has passed in the
 garden.  The butcher, the baker, the fish-monger, some of the customers
 of your shop, and many a prying old woman, have told me several of the
 secrets of your interior.  A still larger circle--I myself, among the
 rest--can testify to his extravagances at the arched window.  Thousands
--**--**--
 a tailor's seamstress was sitting at her work.   Hepzibah flung herself
 upon that unknown woman's companionship, even thus far off.  Then she
 was attracted by a chaise rapidly passing, and watched its moist and
 glistening top, and its splashing wheels, until it had turned the
 corner, and refused to carry any further her idly trifling, because
 appalled and overburdened, mind.  When the vehicle had disappeared, she
 allowed herself still another loitering moment; for the patched figure
 of good Uncle Venner was now visible, coming slowly from the head of
 the street downward, with a rheumatic limp, because the east wind had
 got into his joints.  Hepzibah wished that he would pass yet more
 slowly, and befriend her shivering solitude a little longer.  Anything
 that would take her out of the grievous present, and interpose human
 beings betwixt herself and what was nearest to her,--whatever would
 defer for an instant the inevitable errand on which she was bound,--all
 such impediments were welcome.  Next to the lightest heart, the
 heaviest is apt to be most playful.
 
 Hepzibah had little hardihood for her own proper pain, and far less for
 what she must inflict on Clifford.  Of so slight a nature, and so
 shattered by his previous calamities, it could not well be short of
 utter ruin to bring him face to face with the hard, relentless man who
 had been his evil destiny through life.  Even had there been no bitter
 recollections, nor any hostile interest now at stake between them, the
 mere natural repugnance of the more sensitive system to the massive,
 weighty, and unimpressible one, must, in itself, have been disastrous
 to the former.  It would be like flinging a porcelain vase, with
 already a crack in it, against a granite column.  Never before had
 Hepzibah so adequately estimated the powerful character of her cousin
--**--**--
 was to inflict on Clifford,--her reluctance to which was the true cause
 of her loitering at the window, her search for the artist, and even her
 abortive prayer,--dreading, also, to hear the stern voice of Judge
 Pyncheon from below stairs, chiding her delay,--she crept slowly, a
 pale, grief-stricken figure, a dismal shape of woman, with almost
 torpid limbs, slowly to her brother's door, and knocked!
 
 There was no reply.
 
 And how should there have been? Her hand, tremulous with the shrinking
 purpose which directed it, had smitten so feebly against the door that
 the sound could hardly have gone inward.  She knocked again.  Still no
 response! Nor was it to be wondered at.  She had struck with the entire
 force of her heart's vibration, communicating, by some subtile
 magnetism, her own terror to the summons.  Clifford would turn his face
 to the pillow, and cover his head beneath the bedclothes, like a
 startled child at midnight.  She knocked a third time, three regular
 strokes, gentle, but perfectly distinct, and with meaning in them; for,
 modulate it with what cautious art we will, the hand cannot help
 playing some tune of what we feel upon the senseless wood.
 
 Clifford returned no answer.
 
 "Clifford! Dear brother!"  said Hepzibah.  "Shall I come in?"
 
 A silence.
 
 Two or three times, and more, Hepzibah repeated his name, without
 result; till, thinking her brother's sleep unwontedly profound, she
 undid the door, and entering, found the chamber vacant.  How could he
 have come forth, and when, without her knowledge?  Was it possible
 that, in spite of the stormy day, and worn out with the irksomeness
 within doors he had betaken himself to his customary haunt in the
 garden, and was now shivering under the cheerless shelter of the
 summer-house? She hastily threw up a window, thrust forth her turbaned
--**--**--
 
 The horror of this last conception was too much for Hepzibah.  Even
 Jaffrey Pyncheon must help her now She hastened down the staircase,
 shrieking as she went.
 
 "Clifford is gone!" she cried.  "I cannot find my brother.  Help,
 Jaffrey Pyncheon! Some harm will happen to him!"
 
 She threw open the parlor-door.  But, what with the shade of branches
 across the windows, and the smoke-blackened ceiling, and the dark
 oak-panelling of the walls, there was hardly so much daylight in the
 room that Hepzibah's imperfect sight could accurately distinguish the
 Judge's figure.  She was certain, however, that she saw him sitting in
 the ancestral arm-chair, near the centre of the floor, with his face
 somewhat averted, and looking towards a window.  So firm and quiet is
 the nervous system of such men as Judge Pyncheon, that he had perhaps
 stirred not more than once since her departure, but, in the hard
 composure of his temperament, retained the position into which accident
 had thrown him.
 
 "I tell you, Jaffrey," cried Hepzibah impatiently, as she turned from
 the parlor-door to search other rooms, "my brother is not in his
 chamber! You must help me seek him!"
 
 But Judge Pyncheon was not the man to let himself be startled from an
 easy-chair with haste ill-befitting either the dignity of his character
 or his broad personal basis, by the alarm of an hysteric woman.  Yet,
 considering his own interest in the matter, he might have bestirred
 himself with a little more alacrity.
 
 "Do you hear me, Jaffrey Pyncheon?" screamed Hepzibah, as she again
 approached the parlor-door, after an ineffectual search elsewhere.
 "Clifford is gone."
 
 At this instant, on the threshold of the parlor, emerging from within,
 appeared Clifford himself! His face was preternaturally pale; so deadly
 white, indeed, that, through all the glimmering indistinctness of the
--**--**--
 plunge into it while the warmest tide of life is bubbling through his
 veins.  What, then, must it have been to Hepzibah and Clifford,--so
 time-stricken as they were, yet so like children in their
 inexperience,--as they left the doorstep, and passed from beneath the
 wide shelter of the Pyncheon Elm! They were wandering all abroad, on
 precisely such a pilgrimage as a child often meditates, to the world's
 end, with perhaps a sixpence and a biscuit in his pocket.  In
 Hepzibah's mind, there was the wretched consciousness of being adrift.
 She had lost the faculty of self-guidance; but, in view of the
 difficulties around her, felt it hardly worth an effort to regain it,
 and was, moreover, incapable of making one.
 
 As they proceeded on their strange expedition, she now and then cast a
 look sidelong at Clifford, and could not but observe that he was
 possessed and swayed by a powerful excitement.  It was this, indeed,
 that gave him the control which he had at once, and so irresistibly,
 established over his movements.  It not a little resembled the
 exhilaration of wine.  Or, it might more fancifully be compared to a
 joyous piece of music, played with wild vivacity, but upon a disordered
 instrument.  As the cracked jarring note might always be heard, and as
 it jarred loudest amidst the loftiest exultation of the melody, so was
 there a continual quake through Clifford, causing him most to quiver
 while he wore a triumphant smile, and seemed almost under a necessity
 to skip in his gait.
 
 They met few people abroad, even on passing from the retired
 neighborhood of the House of the Seven Gables into what was ordinarily
 the more thronged and busier portion of the town.  Glistening
 sidewalks, with little pools of rain, here and there, along their
--**--**--
 prospect, and thence across the harbour, stands a spacious
 edifice of brick.  From the loftiest point of its roof, during
 precisely three and a half hours of each forenoon, floats or
 droops, in breeze or calm, the banner of the republic; but with
 the thirteen stripes turned vertically, instead of horizontally,
 and thus indicating that a civil, and not a military, post of
 Uncle Sam's government is here established.  Its front is
 ornamented with a portico of half-a-dozen wooden pillars,
 supporting a balcony, beneath which a flight of wide granite
 steps descends towards the street.  Over the entrance hovers an
 enormous specimen of the American eagle, with outspread wings, a
 shield before her breast, and, if I recollect aright, a bunch of
 intermingled thunderbolts and barbed arrows in each claw.  With
 the customary infirmity of temper that characterizes this
 unhappy fowl, she appears by the fierceness of her beak and eye,
 and the general truculency of her attitude, to threaten mischief
 to the inoffensive community; and especially to warn all
 citizens careful of their safety against intruding on the
 premises which she overshadows with her wings.  Nevertheless,
 vixenly as she looks, many people are seeking at this very
 moment to shelter themselves under the wing of the federal
 eagle; imagining, I presume, that her bosom has all the softness
 and snugness of an eiderdown pillow.  But she has no great
 tenderness even in her best of moods, and, sooner or
 later--oftener soon than late--is apt to fling off her nestlings
 with a scratch of her claw, a dab of her beak, or a rankling
 wound from her barbed arrows.
 
 The pavement round about the above-described edifice--which we
 may as well name at once as the Custom-House of the port--has
 grass enough growing in its chinks to show that it has not, of
--**--**--
 a worthier successor wears his dignity and pockets his
 emoluments.
 
 This old town of Salem--my native place, though I have dwelt
 much away from it both in boyhood and maturer years--possesses,
 or did possess, a hold on my affection, the force of which I
 have never realized during my seasons of actual residence here.
 Indeed, so far as its physical aspect is concerned, with its
 flat, unvaried surface, covered chiefly with wooden houses, few
 or none of which pretend to architectural beauty--its
 irregularity, which is neither picturesque nor quaint, but only
 tame--its long and lazy street, lounging wearisomely through the
 whole extent of the peninsula, with Gallows Hill and New Guinea
 at one end, and a view of the alms-house at the other--such
 being the features of my native town, it would be quite as
 reasonable to form a sentimental attachment to a disarranged
 checker-board.  And yet, though invariably happiest elsewhere,
 there is within me a feeling for Old Salem, which, in lack of a
 better phrase, I must be content to call affection.  The
 sentiment is probably assignable to the deep and aged roots
 which my family has stuck into the soil.  It is now nearly two
 centuries and a quarter since the original Briton, the earliest
 emigrant of my name, made his appearance in the wild and
 forest-bordered settlement which has since become a city.  And
 here his descendants have been born and died, and have mingled
 their earthly substance with the soil, until no small portion of
 it must necessarily be akin to the mortal frame wherewith, for a
 little while, I walk the streets.  In part, therefore, the
 attachment which I speak of is the mere sensuous sympathy of
 dust for dust.  Few of my countrymen can know what it is; nor, as
 frequent transplantation is perhaps better for the stock, need
--**--**--
 the hereditary place before the mast, confronting the salt spray
 and the gale which had blustered against his sire and grandsire.
 The boy, also in due time, passed from the forecastle to the
 cabin, spent a tempestuous manhood, and returned from his
 world-wanderings, to grow old, and die, and mingle his dust with
 the natal earth.  This long connexion of a family with one spot,
 as its place of birth and burial, creates a kindred between the
 human being and the locality, quite independent of any charm in
 the scenery or moral circumstances that surround him.  It is not
 love but instinct.  The new inhabitant--who came himself from a
 foreign land, or whose father or grandfather came--has little
 claim to be called a Salemite; he has no conception of the
 oyster-like tenacity with which an old settler, over whom his
 third century is creeping, clings to the spot where his
 successive generations have been embedded.  It is no matter that
 the place is joyless for him; that he is weary of the old wooden
 houses, the mud and dust, the dead level of site and sentiment,
 the chill east wind, and the chillest of social
 atmospheres;--all these, and whatever faults besides he may see
 or imagine, are nothing to the purpose.  The spell survives, and
 just as powerfully as if the natal spot were an earthly
 paradise.  So has it been in my case.  I felt it almost as a
 destiny to make Salem my home; so that the mould of features and
 cast of character which had all along been familiar here--ever,
 as one representative of the race lay down in the grave, another
 assuming, as it were, his sentry-march along the main
 street--might still in my little day be seen and recognised in
 the old town.  Nevertheless, this very sentiment is an evidence
--**--**--
 blast, had finally drifted into this quiet nook, where, with
 little to disturb them, except the periodical terrors of a
 Presidential election, they one and all acquired a new lease of
 existence.  Though by no means less liable than their fellow-men
 to age and infirmity, they had evidently some talisman or other
 that kept death at bay.  Two or three of their number, as I was
 assured, being gouty and rheumatic, or perhaps bed-ridden, never
 dreamed of making their appearance at the Custom-House during a
 large part of the year; but, after a torpid winter, would creep
 out into the warm sunshine of May or June, go lazily about what
 they termed duty, and, at their own leisure and convenience,
 betake themselves to bed again.  I must plead guilty to the
 charge of abbreviating the official breath of more than one of
 these venerable servants of the republic.  They were allowed, on
 my representation, to rest from their arduous labours, and soon
 afterwards--as if their sole principle of life had been zeal for
 their country's service--as I verily believe it was--withdrew to
 a better world.  It is a pious consolation to me that, through my
 interference, a sufficient space was allowed them for repentance
 of the evil and corrupt practices into which, as a matter of
 course, every Custom-House officer must be supposed to fall.
 Neither the front nor the back entrance of the Custom-House
 opens on the road to Paradise.
 
 The greater part of my officers were Whigs.  It was well for
 their venerable brotherhood that the new Surveyor was not a
 politician, and though a faithful Democrat in principle, neither
 received nor held his office with any reference to political
 services.  Had it been otherwise--had an active politician been
 put into this influential post, to assume the easy task of
--**--**--
 little squad of officials, but, I am bold to say, of the
 respectable body of tide-waiters all over the United States--was
 a certain permanent Inspector.  He might truly be termed a
 legitimate son of the revenue system, dyed in the wool, or
 rather born in the purple; since his sire, a Revolutionary
 colonel, and formerly collector of the port, had created an
 office for him, and appointed him to fill it, at a period of the
 early ages which few living men can now remember.  This
 Inspector, when I first knew him, was a man of fourscore years,
 or thereabouts, and certainly one of the most wonderful
 specimens of winter-green that you would be likely to discover
 in a lifetime's search.  With his florid cheek, his compact
 figure smartly arrayed in a bright-buttoned blue coat, his brisk
 and vigorous step, and his hale and hearty aspect, altogether he
 seemed--not young, indeed--but a kind of new contrivance of
 Mother Nature in the shape of man, whom age and infirmity had no
 business to touch.  His voice and laugh, which perpetually
 re-echoed through the Custom-House, had nothing of the tremulous
 quaver and cackle of an old man's utterance; they came strutting
 out of his lungs, like the crow of a cock, or the blast of a
 clarion.  Looking at him merely as an animal--and there was very
 little else to look at--he was a most satisfactory object, from
 the thorough healthfulness and wholesomeness of his system, and
 his capacity, at that extreme age, to enjoy all, or nearly all,
 the delights which he had ever aimed at or conceived of.  The
 careless security of his life in the Custom-House, on a regular
 income, and with but slight and infrequent apprehensions of
 removal, had no doubt contributed to make time pass lightly over
--**--**--
 observe how the ghosts of bygone meals were continually rising
 up before him--not in anger or retribution, but as if grateful
 for his former appreciation, and seeking to reduplicate an
 endless series of enjoyment, at once shadowy and sensual: a
 tenderloin of beef, a hind-quarter of veal, a spare-rib of
 pork, a particular chicken, or a remarkably praiseworthy turkey,
 which had perhaps adorned his board in the days of the elder
 Adams, would be remembered; while all the subsequent experience
 of our race, and all the events that brightened or darkened his
 individual career, had gone over him with as little permanent
 effect as the passing breeze.  The chief tragic event of the old
 man's life, so far as I could judge, was his mishap with a
 certain goose, which lived and died some twenty or forty years
 ago: a goose of most promising figure, but which, at table,
 proved so inveterately tough, that the carving-knife would make
 no impression on its carcase, and it could only be divided with
 an axe and handsaw.
 
 But it is time to quit this sketch; on which, however, I should
 be glad to dwell at considerably more length, because of all men
 whom I have ever known, this individual was fittest to be a
 Custom-House officer.  Most persons, owing to causes which I may
 not have space to hint at, suffer moral detriment from this
 peculiar mode of life.  The old Inspector was incapable of it;
 and, were he to continue in office to the end of time, would be
 just as good as he was then, and sit down to dinner with just as
 good an appetite.
 
 There is one likeness, without which my gallery of Custom-House
 portraits would be strangely incomplete, but which my
 comparatively few opportunities for observation enable me to
--**--**--
 graceful attributes are usually the most evanescent; nor does
 nature adorn the human ruin with blossoms of new beauty, that
 have their roots and proper nutriment only in the chinks and
 crevices of decay, as she sows wall-flowers over the ruined
 fortress of Ticonderoga.  Still, even in respect of grace and
 beauty, there were points well worth noting.  A ray of humour,
 now and then, would make its way through the veil of dim
 obstruction, and glimmer pleasantly upon our faces.  A trait of
 native elegance, seldom seen in the masculine character after
 childhood or early youth, was shown in the General's fondness
 for the sight and fragrance of flowers.  An old soldier might be
 supposed to prize only the bloody laurel on his brow; but here
 was one who seemed to have a young girl's appreciation of the
 floral tribe.
 
 There, beside the fireplace, the brave old General used to sit;
 while the Surveyor--though seldom, when it could be avoided,
 taking upon himself the difficult task of engaging him in
 conversation--was fond of standing at a distance, and watching
 his quiet and almost slumberous countenance.  He seemed away from
 us, although we saw him but a few yards off; remote, though we
 passed close beside his chair; unattainable, though we might
 have stretched forth our hands and touched his own.  It might be
 that he lived a more real life within his thoughts than amid the
 unappropriate environment of the Collector's office.  The
 evolutions of the parade; the tumult of the battle; the flourish
 of old heroic music, heard thirty years before--such scenes and
 sounds, perhaps, were all alive before his intellectual sense.
 Meanwhile, the merchants and ship-masters, the spruce clerks and
 uncouth sailors, entered and departed; the bustle of his
 commercial and Custom-House life kept up its little murmur round
--**--**--
 stupidity--which, to his order of mind, must have seemed little
 short of crime--would he forth-with, by the merest touch of his
 finger, make the incomprehensible as clear as daylight.  The
 merchants valued him not less than we, his esoteric friends.  His
 integrity was perfect; it was a law of nature with him, rather
 than a choice or a principle; nor can it be otherwise than the
 main condition of an intellect so remarkably clear and accurate
 as his to be honest and regular in the administration of
 affairs.  A stain on his conscience, as to anything that came
 within the range of his vocation, would trouble such a man very
 much in the same way, though to a far greater degree, than an
 error in the balance of an account, or an ink-blot on the fair
 page of a book of record.  Here, in a word--and it is a rare
 instance in my life--I had met with a person thoroughly adapted
 to the situation which he held.
 
 Such were some of the people with whom I now found myself
 connected.  I took it in good part, at the hands of Providence,
 that I was thrown into a position so little akin to my past
 habits; and set myself seriously to gather from it whatever
 profit was to be had.  After my fellowship of toil and
 impracticable schemes with the dreamy brethren of Brook Farm;
 after living for three years within the subtle influence of an
 intellect like Emerson's; after those wild, free days on the
 Assabeth, indulging fantastic speculations, beside our fire of
 fallen boughs, with Ellery Channing; after talking with Thoreau
 about pine-trees and Indian relics in his hermitage at Walden;
 after growing fastidious by sympathy with the classic refinement
 of Hillard's culture; after becoming imbued with poetic
--**--**--
 connection, viewed me in no other light, and probably knew me in
 no other character.  None of them, I presume, had ever read a
 page of my inditing, or would have cared a fig the more for me
 if they had read them all; nor would it have mended the matter,
 in the least, had those same unprofitable pages been written
 with a pen like that of Burns or of Chaucer, each of whom was a
 Custom-House officer in his day, as well as I. It is a good
 lesson--though it may often be a hard one--for a man who has
 dreamed of literary fame, and of making for himself a rank among
 the world's dignitaries by such means, to step aside out of the
 narrow circle in which his claims are recognized and to find how
 utterly devoid of significance, beyond that circle, is all that
 he achieves, and all he aims at.  I know not that I especially
 needed the lesson, either in the way of warning or rebuke; but
 at any rate, I learned it thoroughly: nor, it gives me pleasure
 to reflect, did the truth, as it came home to my perception,
 ever cost me a pang, or require to be thrown off in a sigh.  In
 the way of literary talk, it is true, the Naval Officer--an
 excellent fellow, who came into the office with me, and went out
 only a little later--would often engage me in a discussion about
 one or the other of his favourite topics, Napoleon or
 Shakespeare.  The Collector's junior clerk, too a young gentleman
 who, it was whispered occasionally covered a sheet of Uncle
 Sam's letter paper with what (at the distance of a few yards)
 looked very much like poetry--used now and then to speak to me
 of books, as matters with which I might possibly be conversant.
--**--**--
 must have contained many references to forgotten or remembered
 men, and to antique customs, which would have affected me with
 the same pleasure as when I used to pick up Indian arrow-heads
 in the field near the Old Manse.
 
 But, one idle and rainy day, it was my fortune to make a
 discovery of some little interest.  Poking and burrowing into the
 heaped-up rubbish in the corner, unfolding one and another
 document, and reading the names of vessels that had long ago
 foundered at sea or rotted at the wharves, and those of
 merchants never heard of now on 'Change, nor very readily
 decipherable on their mossy tombstones; glancing at such matters
 with the saddened, weary, half-reluctant interest which we
 bestow on the corpse of dead activity--and exerting my fancy,
 sluggish with little use, to raise up from these dry bones an
 image of the old town's brighter aspect, when India was a new
 region, and only Salem knew the way thither--I chanced to lay my
 hand on a small package, carefully done up in a piece of ancient
 yellow parchment.  This envelope had the air of an official
 record of some period long past, when clerks engrossed their
 stiff and formal chirography on more substantial materials than
 at present.  There was something about it that quickened an
 instinctive curiosity, and made me undo the faded red tape that
 tied up the package, with the sense that a treasure would here
 be brought to light.  Unbending the rigid folds of the parchment
 cover, I found it to be a commission, under the hand and seal of
 Governor Shirley, in favour of one Jonathan Pue, as Surveyor of
 His Majesty's Customs for the Port of Salem, in the Province of
 Massachusetts Bay.  I remembered to have read (probably in Felt's
--**--**--
 and which, as it were, streamed forth from the mystic symbol,
 subtly communicating itself to my sensibilities, but evading the
 analysis of my mind.
 
 When thus perplexed--and cogitating, among other hypotheses,
 whether the letter might not have been one of those decorations
 which the white men used to contrive in order to take the eyes
 of Indians--I happened to place it on my breast.  It seemed to
 me--the reader may smile, but must not doubt my word--it seemed
 to me, then, that I experienced a sensation not altogether
 physical, yet almost so, as of burning heat, and as if the
 letter were not of red cloth, but red-hot iron.  I shuddered,
 and involuntarily let it fall upon the floor.
 
 In the absorbing contemplation of the scarlet letter, I had
 hitherto neglected to examine a small roll of dingy paper,
 around which it had been twisted.  This I now opened, and had the
 satisfaction to find recorded by the old Surveyor's pen, a
 reasonably complete explanation of the whole affair.  There were
 several foolscap sheets, containing many particulars respecting
 the life and conversation of one Hester Prynne, who appeared to
 have been rather a noteworthy personage in the view of our
 ancestors.  She had flourished during the period between the
 early days of Massachusetts and the close of the seventeenth
 century.  Aged persons, alive in the time of Mr. Surveyor Pue,
 and from whose oral testimony he had made up his narrative,
 remembered her, in their youth, as a very old, but not decrepit
 woman, of a stately and solemn aspect.  It had been her habit,
 from an almost immemorial date, to go about the country as a
 kind of voluntary nurse, and doing whatever miscellaneous good
 she might; taking upon herself, likewise, to give advice in all
 matters, especially those of the heart, by which means--as a
--**--**--
 the cold spirituality of the moon-beams, and communicates, as it
 were, a heart and sensibilities of human tenderness to the forms
 which fancy summons up.  It converts them from snow-images into
 men and women.  Glancing at the looking-glass, we behold--deep
 within its haunted verge--the smouldering glow of the
 half-extinguished anthracite, the white moon-beams on the floor,
 and a repetition of all the gleam and shadow of the picture,
 with one remove further from the actual, and nearer to the
 imaginative.  Then, at such an hour, and with this scene before
 him, if a man, sitting all alone, cannot dream strange things,
 and make them look like truth, he need never try to write
 romances.
 
 But, for myself, during the whole of my Custom-House experience,
 moonlight and sunshine, and the glow of firelight, were just
 alike in my regard; and neither of them was of one whit more
 avail than the twinkle of a tallow-candle.  An entire class of
 susceptibilities, and a gift connected with them--of no great
 richness or value, but the best I had--was gone from me.
 
 It is my belief, however, that had I attempted a different order
 of composition, my faculties would not have been found so
 pointless and inefficacious.  I might, for instance, have
 contented myself with writing out the narratives of a veteran
 shipmaster, one of the Inspectors, whom I should be most
 ungrateful not to mention, since scarcely a day passed that he
 did not stir me to laughter and admiration by his marvelous
 gifts as a story-teller.  Could I have preserved the picturesque
 force of his style, and the humourous colouring which nature
 taught him how to throw over his descriptions, the result, I
 honestly believe, would have been something new in literature.
 Or I might readily have found a more serious task.  It was a
--**--**--
 discouragement, and making light of impossibilities, haunts him
 while he lives, and, I fancy, like the convulsive throes of the
 cholera, torments him for a brief space after death--is, that
 finally, and in no long time, by some happy coincidence of
 circumstances, he shall be restored to office.  This faith, more
 than anything else, steals the pith and availability out of
 whatever enterprise he may dream of undertaking.  Why should he
 toil and moil, and be at so much trouble to pick himself up out
 of the mud, when, in a little while hence, the strong arm of his
 Uncle will raise and support him?  Why should he work for his
 living here, or go to dig gold in California, when he is so soon
 to be made happy, at monthly intervals, with a little pile of
 glittering coin out of his Uncle's pocket?  It is sadly curious
 to observe how slight a taste of office suffices to infect a
 poor fellow with this singular disease.  Uncle Sam's
 gold--meaning no disrespect to the worthy old gentleman--has, in
 this respect, a quality of enchantment like that of the devil's
 wages.  Whoever touches it should look well to himself, or he may
 find the bargain to go hard against him, involving, if not his
 soul, yet many of its better attributes; its sturdy force, its
 courage and constancy, its truth, its self-reliance, and all
 that gives the emphasis to manly character.
 
 Here was a fine prospect in the distance.  Not that the Surveyor
 brought the lesson home to himself, or admitted that he could be
 so utterly undone, either by continuance in office or ejectment.
 Yet my reflections were not the most comfortable.  I began to
 grow melancholy and restless; continually prying into my mind,
 to discover which of its poor properties were gone, and what
--**--**--
 Meanwhile, the press had taken up my affair, and kept me for a
 week or two careering through the public prints, in my
 decapitated state, like Irving's Headless Horseman, ghastly and
 grim, and longing to be buried, as a political dead man ought.
 So much for my figurative self.  The real human being all this
 time, with his head safely on his shoulders, had brought himself
 to the comfortable conclusion that everything was for the best;
 and making an investment in ink, paper, and steel pens, had
 opened his long-disused writing desk, and was again a literary
 man.
 
 Now it was that the lucubrations of my ancient predecessor, Mr.
 Surveyor Pue, came into play.  Rusty through long idleness, some
 little space was requisite before my intellectual machinery
 could be brought to work upon the tale with an effect in any
 degree satisfactory.  Even yet, though my thoughts were
 ultimately much absorbed in the task, it wears, to my eye, a
 stern and sombre aspect: too much ungladdened by genial
 sunshine; too little relieved by the tender and familiar
 influences which soften almost every scene of nature and real
 life, and undoubtedly should soften every picture of them.  This
 uncaptivating effect is perhaps due to the period of hardly
 accomplished revolution, and still seething turmoil, in which
 the story shaped itself.  It is no indication, however, of a lack
 of cheerfulness in the writer's mind: for he was happier while
 straying through the gloom of these sunless fantasies than at
 any time since he had quitted the Old Manse.  Some of the briefer
 articles, which contribute to make up the volume, have likewise
 been written since my involuntary withdrawal from the toils and
 honours of public life, and the remainder are gleaned from
 annuals and magazines, of such antique date, that they have gone
--**--**--
 
 The founders of a new colony, whatever Utopia of human virtue
 and happiness they might originally project, have invariably
 recognised it among their earliest practical necessities to
 allot a portion of the virgin soil as a cemetery, and another
 portion as the site of a prison.  In accordance with this rule it
 may safely be assumed that the forefathers of Boston had built
 the first prison-house somewhere in the Vicinity of Cornhill,
 almost as seasonably as they marked out the first burial-ground,
 on Isaac Johnson's lot, and round about his grave, which
 subsequently became the nucleus of all the congregated
 sepulchres in the old churchyard of King's Chapel.  Certain it is
 that, some fifteen or twenty years after the settlement of the
 town, the wooden jail was already marked with weather-stains and
 other indications of age, which gave a yet darker aspect to its
 beetle-browed and gloomy front.  The rust on the ponderous
 iron-work of its oaken door looked more antique than anything
 else in the New World.  Like all that pertains to crime, it
 seemed never to have known a youthful era.  Before this ugly
 edifice, and between it and the wheel-track of the street, was a
 grass-plot, much overgrown with burdock, pig-weed, apple-pern,
 and such unsightly vegetation, which evidently found something
 congenial in the soil that had so early borne the black flower
 of civilised society, a prison.  But on one side of the portal,
 and rooted almost at the threshold, was a wild rose-bush,
 covered, in this month of June, with its delicate gems, which
 might be imagined to offer their fragrance and fragile beauty to
 the prisoner as he went in, and to the condemned criminal as he
 came forth to his doom, in token that the deep heart of Nature
 could pity and be kind to him.
--**--**--
 
 "The magistrates are God-fearing gentlemen, but merciful
 overmuch--that is a truth," added a third autumnal matron.  "At
 the very least, they should have put the brand of a hot iron on
 Hester Prynne's forehead.  Madame Hester would have winced at
 that, I warrant me.  But she--the naughty baggage--little will
 she care what they put upon the bodice of her gown!  Why, look
 you, she may cover it with a brooch, or such like heathenish
 adornment, and so walk the streets as brave as ever!"
 
 "Ah, but," interposed, more softly, a young wife, holding a
 child by the hand, "let her cover the mark as she will, the pang
 of it will be always in her heart."
 
 "What do we talk of marks and brands, whether on the bodice of
 her gown or the flesh of her forehead?" cried another female,
 the ugliest as well as the most pitiless of these
 self-constituted judges.  "This woman has brought shame upon us
 all, and ought to die; is there not law for it?  Truly there is,
 both in the Scripture and the statute-book.  Then let the
 magistrates, who have made it of no effect, thank themselves if
 their own wives and daughters go astray."
 
 "Mercy on us, goodwife!" exclaimed a man in the crowd, "is there
 no virtue in woman, save what springs from a wholesome fear of
 the gallows?  That is the hardest word yet!  Hush now, gossips for
 the lock is turning in the prison-door, and here comes Mistress
 Prynne herself."
 
 The door of the jail being flung open from within there
 appeared, in the first place, like a black shadow emerging into
 sunshine, the grim and gristly presence of the town-beadle, with
 a sword by his side, and his staff of office in his hand.  This
 personage prefigured and represented in his aspect the whole
--**--**--
 out into the sunshine!  Come along, Madame Hester, and show your
 scarlet letter in the market-place!"
 
 A lane was forthwith opened through the crowd of spectators.
 Preceded by the beadle, and attended by an irregular procession
 of stern-browed men and unkindly visaged women, Hester Prynne
 set forth towards the place appointed for her punishment.  A
 crowd of eager and curious schoolboys, understanding little of
 the matter in hand, except that it gave them a half-holiday, ran
 before her progress, turning their heads continually to stare
 into her face and at the winking baby in her arms, and at the
 ignominious letter on her breast.  It was no great distance, in
 those days, from the prison door to the market-place.  Measured
 by the prisoner's experience, however, it might be reckoned a
 journey of some length; for haughty as her demeanour was, she
 perchance underwent an agony from every footstep of those that
 thronged to see her, as if her heart had been flung into the
 street for them all to spurn and trample upon.  In our nature,
 however, there is a provision, alike marvellous and merciful,
 that the sufferer should never know the intensity of what he
 endures by its present torture, but chiefly by the pang that
 rankles after it.  With almost a serene deportment, therefore,
 Hester Prynne passed through this portion of her ordeal, and
 came to a sort of scaffold, at the western extremity of the
 market-place.  It stood nearly beneath the eaves of Boston's
 earliest church, and appeared to be a fixture there.
 
 In fact, this scaffold constituted a portion of a penal machine,
 which now, for two or three generations past, has been merely
 historical and traditionary among us, but was held, in the old
 time, to be as effectual an agent, in the promotion of good
--**--**--
 nature, she had fortified herself to encounter the stings and
 venomous stabs of public contumely, wreaking itself in every
 variety of insult; but there was a quality so much more terrible
 in the solemn mood of the popular mind, that she longed rather
 to behold all those rigid countenances contorted with scornful
 merriment, and herself the object.  Had a roar of laughter burst
 from the multitude--each man, each woman, each little
 shrill-voiced child, contributing their individual parts--Hester
 Prynne might have repaid them all with a bitter and disdainful
 smile.  But, under the leaden infliction which it was her doom to
 endure, she felt, at moments, as if she must needs shriek out
 with the full power of her lungs, and cast herself from the
 scaffold down upon the ground, or else go mad at once.
 
 Yet there were intervals when the whole scene, in which she was
 the most conspicuous object, seemed to vanish from her eyes, or,
 at least, glimmered indistinctly before them, like a mass of
 imperfectly shaped and spectral images.  Her mind, and especially
 her memory, was preternaturally active, and kept bringing up
 other scenes than this roughly hewn street of a little town, on
 the edge of the western wilderness: other faces than were
 lowering upon her from beneath the brims of those
 steeple-crowned hats.  Reminiscences, the most trifling and
 immaterial, passages of infancy and school-days, sports,
 childish quarrels, and the little domestic traits of her maiden
 years, came swarming back upon her, intermingled with
 recollections of whatever was gravest in her subsequent life;
 one picture precisely as vivid as another; as if all were of
 similar importance, or all alike a play.  Possibly, it was an
 instinctive device of her spirit to relieve itself by the
 exhibition of these phantasmagoric forms, from the cruel weight
--**--**--
 sufficiently evident to Hester Prynne that one of this man's
 shoulders rose higher than the other.  Again, at the first
 instant of perceiving that thin visage, and the slight deformity
 of the figure, she pressed her infant to her bosom with so
 convulsive a force that the poor babe uttered another cry of
 pain.  But the mother did not seem to hear it.
 
 At his arrival in the market-place, and some time before she saw
 him, the stranger had bent his eyes on Hester Prynne.  It was
 carelessly at first, like a man chiefly accustomed to look
 inward, and to whom external matters are of little value and
 import, unless they bear relation to something within his mind.
 Very soon, however, his look became keen and penetrative.  A
 writhing horror twisted itself across his features, like a snake
 gliding swiftly over them, and making one little pause, with all
 its wreathed intervolutions in open sight.  His face darkened
 with some powerful emotion, which, nevertheless, he so
 instantaneously controlled by an effort of his will, that, save
 at a single moment, its expression might have passed for
 calmness.  After a brief space, the convulsion grew almost
 imperceptible, and finally subsided into the depths of his
 nature.  When he found the eyes of Hester Prynne fastened on his
 own, and saw that she appeared to recognize him, he slowly and
 calmly raised his finger, made a gesture with it in the air, and
 laid it on his lips.
 
 Then touching the shoulder of a townsman who stood near to him,
 he addressed him in a formal and courteous manner:
 
 "I pray you, good Sir," said he, "who is this woman?--and
 wherefore is she here set up to public shame?"
 
 "You must needs be a stranger in this region, friend," answered
 the townsman, looking curiously at the questioner and his savage
--**--**--
 the forms of authority were felt to possess the sacredness of
 Divine institutions.  They were, doubtless, good men, just and
 sage.  But, out of the whole human family, it would not have been
 easy to select the same number of wise and virtuous persons, who
 should be less capable of sitting in judgment on an erring
 woman's heart, and disentangling its mesh of good and evil, than
 the sages of rigid aspect towards whom Hester Prynne now turned
 her face.  She seemed conscious, indeed, that whatever sympathy
 she might expect lay in the larger and warmer heart of the
 multitude; for, as she lifted her eyes towards the balcony, the
 unhappy woman grew pale, and trembled.
 
 The voice which had called her attention was that of the
 reverend and famous John Wilson, the eldest clergyman of Boston,
 a great scholar, like most of his contemporaries in the
 profession, and withal a man of kind and genial spirit.  This
 last attribute, however, had been less carefully developed than
 his intellectual gifts, and was, in truth, rather a matter of
 shame than self-congratulation with him.  There he stood, with a
 border of grizzled locks beneath his skull-cap, while his grey
 eyes, accustomed to the shaded light of his study, were winking,
 like those of Hester's infant, in the unadulterated sunshine.  He
 looked like the darkly engraved portraits which we see prefixed
 to old volumes of sermons, and had no more right than one of
 those portraits would have to step forth, as he now did, and
 meddle with a question of human guilt, passion, and anguish.
 
 "Hester Prynne," said the clergyman, "I have striven with my
 young brother here, under whose preaching of the Word you have
 been privileged to sit"--here Mr. Wilson laid his hand on the
 shoulder of a pale young man beside him--"I have sought, I say,
--**--**--
 The directness of this appeal drew the eyes of the whole crowd
 upon the Reverend Mr. Dimmesdale--young clergyman, who had come
 from one of the great English universities, bringing all the
 learning of the age into our wild forest land.  His eloquence and
 religious fervour had already given the earnest of high eminence
 in his profession.  He was a person of very striking aspect, with
 a white, lofty, and impending brow; large, brown, melancholy
 eyes, and a mouth which, unless when he forcibly compressed it,
 was apt to be tremulous, expressing both nervous sensibility and
 a vast power of self restraint.  Notwithstanding his high native
 gifts and scholar-like attainments, there was an air about this
 young minister--an apprehensive, a startled, a half-frightened
 look--as of a being who felt himself quite astray, and at a loss
 in the pathway of human existence, and could only be at ease in
 some seclusion of his own.  Therefore, so far as his duties would
 permit, he trod in the shadowy by-paths, and thus kept himself
 simple and childlike, coming forth, when occasion was, with a
 freshness, and fragrance, and dewy purity of thought, which, as
 many people said, affected them like the speech of an angel.
 
 Such was the young man whom the Reverend Mr. Wilson and the
 Governor had introduced so openly to the public notice, bidding
 him speak, in the hearing of all men, to that mystery of a
 woman's soul, so sacred even in its pollution.  The trying nature
 of his position drove the blood from his cheek, and made his
 lips tremulous.
 
 "Speak to the woman, my brother," said Mr. Wilson.  "It is of
 moment to her soul, and, therefore, as the worshipful Governor
 says, momentous to thine own, in whose charge hers is.  Exhort
 her to confess the truth!"
--**--**--
 breast."
 
 "Never," replied Hester Prynne, looking, not at Mr. Wilson, but
 into the deep and troubled eyes of the younger clergyman.  "It is
 too deeply branded.  Ye cannot take it off.  And would that I
 might endure his agony as well as mine!"
 
 "Speak, woman!" said another voice, coldly and sternly,
 proceeding from the crowd about the scaffold, "Speak; and give
 your child a father!"
 
 "I will not speak!" answered Hester, turning pale as death, but
 responding to this voice, which she too surely recognised.  "And
 my child must seek a heavenly father; she shall never know an
 earthly one!"
 
 "She will not speak!" murmured Mr. Dimmesdale, who, leaning over
 the balcony, with his hand upon his heart, had awaited the
 result of his appeal.  He now drew back with a long respiration.
 "Wondrous strength and generosity of a woman's heart!  She will
 not speak!"
 
 Discerning the impracticable state of the poor culprit's mind,
 the elder clergyman, who had carefully prepared himself for the
 occasion, addressed to the multitude a discourse on sin, in all
 its branches, but with continual reference to the ignominious
 letter.  So forcibly did he dwell upon this symbol, for the hour
 or more during which his periods were rolling over the people's
 heads, that it assumed new terrors in their imagination, and
 seemed to derive its scarlet hue from the flames of the infernal
 pit.  Hester Prynne, meanwhile, kept her place upon the pedestal
 of shame, with glazed eyes, and an air of weary indifference.
 She had borne that morning all that nature could endure; and as
 her temperament was not of the order that escapes from too
 intense suffering by a swoon, her spirit could only shelter
 itself beneath a stony crust of insensibility, while the
 faculties of animal life remained entire.  In this state, the
--**--**--
 The stranger had entered the room with the characteristic
 quietude of the profession to which he announced himself as
 belonging.  Nor did his demeanour change when the withdrawal of
 the prison keeper left him face to face with the woman, whose
 absorbed notice of him, in the crowd, had intimated so close a
 relation between himself and her.  His first care was given to
 the child, whose cries, indeed, as she lay writhing on the
 trundle-bed, made it of peremptory necessity to postpone all
 other business to the task of soothing her.  He examined the
 infant carefully, and then proceeded to unclasp a leathern case,
 which he took from beneath his dress.  It appeared to contain
 medical preparations, one of which he mingled with a cup of
 water.
 
 "My old studies in alchemy," observed he, "and my sojourn, for
 above a year past, among a people well versed in the kindly
 properties of simples, have made a better physician of me than
 many that claim the medical degree.  Here, woman!  The child is
 yours--she is none of mine--neither will she recognise my voice
 or aspect as a father's.  Administer this draught, therefore,
 with thine own hand."
 
 Hester repelled the offered medicine, at the same time gazing
 with strongly marked apprehension into his face.  "Wouldst thou
 avenge thyself on the innocent babe?" whispered she.
 
 "Foolish woman!" responded the physician, half coldly, half
 soothingly.  "What should ail me to harm this misbegotten and
 miserable babe?  The medicine is potent for good, and were it my
 child--yea, mine own, as well as thine!  I could do no better for
 it."
 
 As she still hesitated, being, in fact, in no reasonable state
 of mind, he took the infant in his arms, and himself
 administered the draught.  It soon proved its efficacy, and
 redeemed the leech's pledge.  The moans of the little patient
--**--**--
 wrong, when I betrayed thy budding youth into a false and
 unnatural relation with my decay.  Therefore, as a man who has
 not thought and philosophised in vain, I seek no vengeance, plot
 no evil against thee.  Between thee and me, the scale hangs
 fairly balanced.  But, Hester, the man lives who has wronged us
 both!  Who is he?"
 
 "Ask me not!" replied Hester Prynne, looking firmly into his
 face.  "That thou shalt never know!"
 
 "Never, sayest thou?" rejoined he, with a smile of dark and
 self-relying intelligence.  "Never know him!  Believe me, Hester,
 there are few things whether in the outward world, or, to a
 certain depth, in the invisible sphere of thought--few things
 hidden from the man who devotes himself earnestly and
 unreservedly to the solution of a mystery.  Thou mayest cover up
 thy secret from the prying multitude.  Thou mayest conceal it,
 too, from the ministers and magistrates, even as thou didst this
 day, when they sought to wrench the name out of thy heart, and
 give thee a partner on thy pedestal.  But, as for me, I come to
 the inquest with other senses than they possess.  I shall seek
 this man, as I have sought truth in books: as I have sought gold
 in alchemy.  There is a sympathy that will make me conscious of
 him.  I shall see him tremble.  I shall feel myself shudder,
 suddenly and unawares.  Sooner or later, he must needs be mine."
 
 The eyes of the wrinkled scholar glowed so intensely upon her,
 that Hester Prynne clasped her hand over her heart, dreading
 lest he should read the secret there at once.
 
 "Thou wilt not reveal his name?   Not the less he is mine,"
 resumed he, with a look of confidence, as if destiny were at one
 with him.  "He bears no letter of infamy wrought into his
--**--**--
 thine!"
 
 
 
 V.  HESTER AT HER NEEDLE
 
 Hester Prynne's term of confinement was now at an end.  Her
 prison-door was thrown open, and she came forth into the
 sunshine, which, falling on all alike, seemed, to her sick and
 morbid heart, as if meant for no other purpose than to reveal
 the scarlet letter on her breast.  Perhaps there was a more real
 torture in her first unattended footsteps from the threshold of
 the prison than even in the procession and spectacle that have
 been described, where she was made the common infamy, at which
 all mankind was summoned to point its finger.  Then, she was
 supported by an unnatural tension of the nerves, and by all the
 combative energy of her character, which enabled her to convert
 the scene into a kind of lurid triumph.  It was, moreover, a
 separate and insulated event, to occur but once in her lifetime,
 and to meet which, therefore, reckless of economy, she might
 call up the vital strength that would have sufficed for many
 quiet years.  The very law that condemned her--a giant of stern
 features but with vigour to support, as well as to annihilate,
 in his iron arm--had held her up through the terrible ordeal of
 her ignominy.  But now, with this unattended walk from her prison
 door, began the daily custom; and she must either sustain and
 carry it forward by the ordinary resources of her nature, or
 sink beneath it.  She could no longer borrow from the future to
 help her through the present grief.  Tomorrow would bring its own
 trial with it; so would the next day, and so would the next:
 each its own trial, and yet the very same that was now so
 unutterably grievous to be borne.  The days of the far-off future
 would toil onward, still with the same burden for her to take
--**--**--
 magistrates, who still kept an inquisitorial watch over her,
 Hester established herself, with her infant child.  A mystic
 shadow of suspicion immediately attached itself to the spot.
 Children, too young to comprehend wherefore this woman should be
 shut out from the sphere of human charities, would creep nigh
 enough to behold her plying her needle at the cottage-window, or
 standing in the doorway, or labouring in her little garden, or
 coming forth along the pathway that led townward, and,
 discerning the scarlet letter on her breast, would scamper off
 with a strange contagious fear.
 
 Lonely as was Hester's situation, and without a friend on earth
 who dared to show himself, she, however, incurred no risk of
 want.  She possessed an art that sufficed, even in a land that
 afforded comparatively little scope for its exercise, to supply
 food for her thriving infant and herself.  It was the art, then,
 as now, almost the only one within a woman's grasp--of
 needle-work.  She bore on her breast, in the curiously
 embroidered letter, a specimen of her delicate and imaginative
 skill, of which the dames of a court might gladly have availed
 themselves, to add the richer and more spiritual adornment of
 human ingenuity to their fabrics of silk and gold.  Here, indeed,
 in the sable simplicity that generally characterised the
 Puritanic modes of dress, there might be an infrequent call for
 the finer productions of her handiwork.  Yet the taste of the
 age, demanding whatever was elaborate in compositions of this
 kind, did not fail to extend its influence over our stern
 progenitors, who had cast behind them so many fashions which it
 might seem harder to dispense with.
 
 Public ceremonies, such as ordinations, the installation of
 magistrates, and all that could give majesty to the forms in
 which a new government manifested itself to the people, were, as
--**--**--
 expressed, that she was banished, and as much alone as if she
 inhabited another sphere, or communicated with the common nature
 by other organs and senses than the rest of human kind.  She
 stood apart from mortal interests, yet close beside them, like a
 ghost that revisits the familiar fireside, and can no longer
 make itself seen or felt; no more smile with the household joy,
 nor mourn with the kindred sorrow; or, should it succeed in
 manifesting its forbidden sympathy, awakening only terror and
 horrible repugnance.  These emotions, in fact, and its bitterest
 scorn besides, seemed to be the sole portion that she retained
 in the universal heart.  It was not an age of delicacy; and her
 position, although she understood it well, and was in little
 danger of forgetting it, was often brought before her vivid
 self-perception, like a new anguish, by the rudest touch upon
 the tenderest spot.  The poor, as we have already said, whom she
 sought out to be the objects of her bounty, often reviled the
 hand that was stretched forth to succour them.  Dames of elevated
 rank, likewise, whose doors she entered in the way of her
 occupation, were accustomed to distil drops of bitterness into
 her heart; sometimes through that alchemy of quiet malice, by
 which women can concoct a subtle poison from ordinary trifles;
 and sometimes, also, by a coarser expression, that fell upon the
 sufferer's defenceless breast like a rough blow upon an
 ulcerated wound.  Hester had schooled herself long and well; and
 she never responded to these attacks, save by a flush of crimson
 that rose irrepressibly over her pale cheek, and again subsided
 into the depths of her bosom.  She was patient--a martyr, indeed
 but she forebore to pray for enemies, lest, in spite of her
 forgiving aspirations, the words of the blessing should
--**--**--
 the beholder as if it were the very garb that precisely became
 it best.  But little Pearl was not clad in rustic weeds.  Her
 mother, with a morbid purpose that may be better understood
 hereafter, had bought the richest tissues that could be
 procured, and allowed her imaginative faculty its full play in
 the arrangement and decoration of the dresses which the child
 wore before the public eye.  So magnificent was the small figure
 when thus arrayed, and such was the splendour of Pearl's own
 proper beauty, shining through the gorgeous robes which might
 have extinguished a paler loveliness, that there was an absolute
 circle of radiance around her on the darksome cottage floor.  And
 yet a russet gown, torn and soiled with the child's rude play,
 made a picture of her just as perfect.  Pearl's aspect was imbued
 with a spell of infinite variety; in this one child there were
 many children, comprehending the full scope between the
 wild-flower prettiness of a peasant-baby, and the pomp, in
 little, of an infant princess.  Throughout all, however, there
 was a trait of passion, a certain depth of hue, which she never
 lost; and if in any of her changes, she had grown fainter or
 paler, she would have ceased to be herself--it would have been
 no longer Pearl!
 
 This outward mutability indicated, and did not more than fairly
 express, the various properties of her inner life.  Her nature
 appeared to possess depth, too, as well as variety; but--or else
 Hester's fears deceived her--it lacked reference and adaptation
 to the world into which she was born.  The child could not be
 made amenable to rules.  In giving her existence a great law had
 been broken; and the result was a being whose elements were
 perhaps beautiful and brilliant, but all in disorder, or with an
--**--**--
 charge.  But the task was beyond her skill.  After testing both
 smiles and frowns, and proving that neither mode of treatment
 possessed any calculable influence, Hester was ultimately
 compelled to stand aside and permit the child to be swayed by
 her own impulses.  Physical compulsion or restraint was
 effectual, of course, while it lasted.  As to any other kind of
 discipline, whether addressed to her mind or heart, little Pearl
 might or might not be within its reach, in accordance with the
 caprice that ruled the moment.  Her mother, while Pearl was yet
 an infant, grew acquainted with a certain peculiar look, that
 warned her when it would be labour thrown away to insist,
 persuade or plead.
 
 It was a look so intelligent, yet inexplicable, perverse,
 sometimes so malicious, but generally accompanied by a wild flow
 of spirits, that Hester could not help questioning at such
 moments whether Pearl was a human child.  She seemed rather an
 airy sprite, which, after playing its fantastic sports for a
 little while upon the cottage floor, would flit away with a
 mocking smile.  Whenever that look appeared in her wild, bright,
 deeply black eyes, it invested her with a strange remoteness and
 intangibility: it was as if she were hovering in the air, and
 might vanish, like a glimmering light that comes we know not
 whence and goes we know not whither.  Beholding it, Hester was
 constrained to rush towards the child--to pursue the little elf
 in the flight which she invariably began--to snatch her to her
 bosom with a close pressure and earnest kisses--not so much from
 overflowing love as to assure herself that Pearl was flesh and
 blood, and not utterly delusive.  But Pearl's laugh, when she was
 caught, though full of merriment and music, made her mother more
 doubtful than before.
--**--**--
 itself to a thousand objects, as a torch kindles a flame
 wherever it may be applied.  The unlikeliest materials--a stick,
 a bunch of rags, a flower--were the puppets of Pearl's
 witchcraft, and, without undergoing any outward change, became
 spiritually adapted to whatever drama occupied the stage of her
 inner world.  Her one baby-voice served a multitude of imaginary
 personages, old and young, to talk withal.  The pine-trees, aged,
 black, and solemn, and flinging groans and other melancholy
 utterances on the breeze, needed little transformation to figure
 as Puritan elders; the ugliest weeds of the garden were their
 children, whom Pearl smote down and uprooted most unmercifully.
 It was wonderful, the vast variety of forms into which she threw
 her intellect, with no continuity, indeed, but darting up and
 dancing, always in a state of preternatural activity--soon
 sinking down, as if exhausted by so rapid and feverish a tide of
 life--and succeeded by other shapes of a similar wild energy.  It
 was like nothing so much as the phantasmagoric play of the
 northern lights.  In the mere exercise of the fancy, however, and
 the sportiveness of a growing mind, there might be a little more
 than was observable in other children of bright faculties;
 except as Pearl, in the dearth of human playmates, was thrown
 more upon the visionary throng which she created.  The
 singularity lay in the hostile feelings with which the child
 regarded all these offsprings of her own heart and mind.  She
 never created a friend, but seemed always to be sowing broadcast
 the dragon's teeth, whence sprung a harvest of armed enemies,
 against whom she rushed to battle.  It was inexpressibly
 sad--then what depth of sorrow to a mother, who felt in her own
 heart the cause--to observe, in one so young, this constant
 recognition of an adverse world, and so fierce a training of the
--**--**--
 spirit possessed the child, and had just then peeped forth in
 mockery.  Many a time afterwards had Hester been tortured, though
 less vividly, by the same illusion.
 
 In the afternoon of a certain summer's day, after Pearl grew big
 enough to run about, she amused herself with gathering handfuls
 of wild flowers, and flinging them, one by one, at her mother's
 bosom; dancing up and down like a little elf whenever she hit
 the scarlet letter.  Hester's first motion had been to cover her
 bosom with her clasped hands.  But whether from pride or
 resignation, or a feeling that her penance might best be wrought
 out by this unutterable pain, she resisted the impulse, and sat
 erect, pale as death, looking sadly into little Pearl's wild
 eyes.  Still came the battery of flowers, almost invariably
 hitting the mark, and covering the mother's breast with hurts
 for which she could find no balm in this world, nor knew how to
 seek it in another.  At last, her shot being all expended, the
 child stood still and gazed at Hester, with that little laughing
 image of a fiend peeping out--or, whether it peeped or no, her
 mother so imagined it--from the unsearchable abyss of her black
 eyes.
 
 "Child, what art thou?" cried the mother.
 
 "Oh, I am your little Pearl!" answered the child.
 
 But while she said it, Pearl laughed, and began to dance up and
 down with the humoursome gesticulation of a little imp, whose
 next freak might be to fly up the chimney.
 
 "Art thou my child, in very truth?" asked Hester.
 
 Nor did she put the question altogether idly, but, for the
 moment, with a portion of genuine earnestness; for, such was
 Pearl's wonderful intelligence, that her mother half doubted
 whether she were not acquainted with the secret spell of her
--**--**--
 
 Another and far more important reason than the delivery of a
 pair of embroidered gloves, impelled Hester, at this time, to
 seek an interview with a personage of so much power and activity
 in the affairs of the settlement.  It had reached her ears that
 there was a design on the part of some of the leading
 inhabitants, cherishing the more rigid order of principles in
 religion and government, to deprive her of her child.  On the
 supposition that Pearl, as already hinted, was of demon origin,
 these good people not unreasonably argued that a Christian
 interest in the mother's soul required them to remove such a
 stumbling-block from her path.  If the child, on the other hand,
 were really capable of moral and religious growth, and possessed
 the elements of ultimate salvation, then, surely, it would enjoy
 all the fairer prospect of these advantages by being transferred
 to wiser and better guardianship than Hester Prynne's.  Among
 those who promoted the design, Governor Bellingham was said to
 be one of the most busy.  It may appear singular, and, indeed,
 not a little ludicrous, that an affair of this kind, which in
 later days would have been referred to no higher jurisdiction
 than that of the select men of the town, should then have been a
 question publicly discussed, and on which statesmen of eminence
 took sides.  At that epoch of pristine simplicity, however,
 matters of even slighter public interest, and of far less
 intrinsic weight than the welfare of Hester and her child, were
 strangely mixed up with the deliberations of legislators and
 acts of state.  The period was hardly, if at all, earlier than
 that of our story, when a dispute concerning the right of
 property in a pig not only caused a fierce and bitter contest in
--**--**--
 "No, my little Pearl!" said her mother; "thou must gather thine
 own sunshine.  I have none to give thee!"
 
 They approached the door, which was of an arched form, and
 flanked on each side by a narrow tower or projection of the
 edifice, in both of which were lattice-windows, the wooden
 shutters to close over them at need.  Lifting the iron hammer
 that hung at the portal, Hester Prynne gave a summons, which was
 answered by one of the Governor's bond servant--a free-born
 Englishman, but now a seven years' slave.  During that term he
 was to be the property of his master, and as much a commodity of
 bargain and sale as an ox, or a joint-stool.  The serf wore the
 customary garb of serving-men at that period, and long before,
 in the old hereditary halls of England.
 
 "Is the worshipful Governor Bellingham within?" inquired Hester.
 
 "Yea, forsooth," replied the bond-servant, staring with
 wide-open eyes at the scarlet letter, which, being a new-comer
 in the country, he had never before seen.  "Yea, his honourable
 worship is within.  But he hath a godly minister or two with him,
 and likewise a leech.  Ye may not see his worship now."
 
 "Nevertheless, I will enter," answered Hester Prynne; and the
 bond-servant, perhaps judging from the decision of her air, and
 the glittering symbol in her bosom, that she was a great lady in
 the land, offered no opposition.
 
 So the mother and little Pearl were admitted into the hall of
 entrance.  With many variations, suggested by the nature of his
 building materials, diversity of climate, and a different mode
 of social life, Governor Bellingham had planned his new
 habitation after the residences of gentlemen of fair estate in
 his native land.  Here, then, was a wide and reasonably lofty
 hall, extending through the whole depth of the house, and
--**--**--
 
 Pearl, seeing the rose-bushes, began to cry for a red rose, and
 would not be pacified.
 
 "Hush, child--hush!" said her mother, earnestly.  "Do not cry,
 dear little Pearl!  I hear voices in the garden.  The Governor is
 coming, and gentlemen along with him."
 
 In fact, adown the vista of the garden avenue, a number of
 persons were seen approaching towards the house.  Pearl, in utter
 scorn of her mother's attempt to quiet her, gave an eldritch
 scream, and then became silent, not from any notion of
 obedience, but because the quick and mobile curiosity of her
 disposition was excited by the appearance of those new
 personages.
 
 
 
 VIII.  THE ELF-CHILD AND THE MINISTER
 
 Governor Bellingham, in a loose gown and easy cap--such as
 elderly gentlemen loved to endue themselves with, in their
 domestic privacy--walked foremost, and appeared to be showing
 off his estate, and expatiating on his projected improvements.
 The wide circumference of an elaborate ruff, beneath his grey
 beard, in the antiquated fashion of King James's reign, caused
 his head to look not a little like that of John the Baptist in a
 charger.  The impression made by his aspect, so rigid and severe,
 and frost-bitten with more than autumnal age, was hardly in
 keeping with the appliances of worldly enjoyment wherewith he
 had evidently done his utmost to surround himself.  But it is an
 error to suppose that our great forefathers--though accustomed
 to speak and think of human existence as a state merely of trial
 and warfare, and though unfeignedly prepared to sacrifice goods
 and life at the behest of duty--made it a matter of conscience
 to reject such means of comfort, or even luxury, as lay fairly
 within their grasp.  This creed was never taught, for instance,
 by the venerable pastor, John Wilson, whose beard, white as a
--**--**--
 behold here the unhappy woman, Hester Prynne, her mother!"
 
 "Sayest thou so?" cried the Governor.  "Nay, we might have
 judged that such a child's mother must needs be a scarlet woman,
 and a worthy type of her of Babylon!  But she comes at a good
 time, and we will look into this matter forthwith."
 
 Governor Bellingham stepped through the window into the hall,
 followed by his three guests.
 
 "Hester Prynne," said he, fixing his naturally stern regard on
 the wearer of the scarlet letter, "there hath been much question
 concerning thee of late.  The point hath been weightily
 discussed, whether we, that are of authority and influence, do
 well discharge our consciences by trusting an immortal soul,
 such as there is in yonder child, to the guidance of one who
 hath stumbled and fallen amid the pitfalls of this world.  Speak
 thou, the child's own mother!  Were it not, thinkest thou, for
 thy little one's temporal and eternal welfare that she be taken
 out of thy charge, and clad soberly, and disciplined strictly,
 and instructed in the truths of heaven and earth?  What canst
 thou do for the child in this kind?"
 
 "I can teach my little Pearl what I have learned from this!"
 answered Hester Prynne, laying her finger on the red token.
 
 "Woman, it is thy badge of shame!" replied the stern magistrate.
 "It is because of the stain which that letter indicates that we
 would transfer thy child to other hands."
 
 "Nevertheless," said the mother, calmly, though growing more
 pale, "this badge hath taught me--it daily teaches me--it is
 teaching me at this moment--lessons whereof my child may be the
 wiser and better, albeit they can profit nothing to myself."
 
 "We will judge warily," said Bellingham, "and look well what we
 are about to do.  Good Master Wilson, I pray you, examine this
--**--**--
 "God gave me the child!" cried she.  "He gave her in requital of
 all things else which ye had taken from me.  She is my
 happiness--she is my torture, none the less!  Pearl keeps me here
 in life!  Pearl punishes me, too!  See ye not, she is the scarlet
 letter, only capable of being loved, and so endowed with a
 millionfold the power of retribution for my sin?  Ye shall not
 take her!  I will die first!"
 
 "My poor woman," said the not unkind old minister, "the child
 shall be well cared for--far better than thou canst do for it."
 
 "God gave her into my keeping!" repeated Hester Prynne, raising
 her voice almost to a shriek.  "I will not give her up!"  And here
 by a sudden impulse, she turned to the young clergyman, Mr.
 Dimmesdale, at whom, up to this moment, she had seemed hardly so
 much as once to direct her eyes.  "Speak thou for me!" cried she.
 "Thou wast my pastor, and hadst charge of my soul, and knowest
 me better than these men can.  I will not lose the child!  Speak
 for me!  Thou knowest--for thou hast sympathies which these men
 lack--thou knowest what is in my heart, and what are a mother's
 rights, and how much the stronger they are when that mother has
 but her child and the scarlet letter!  Look thou to it!  I will
 not lose the child!  Look to it!"
 
 At this wild and singular appeal, which indicated that Hester
 Prynne's situation had provoked her to little less than madness,
 the young minister at once came forward, pale, and holding his
 hand over his heart, as was his custom whenever his peculiarly
 nervous temperament was thrown into agitation.  He looked now
 more careworn and emaciated than as we described him at the
--**--**--
 and flighty little elf stole softly towards him, and taking his
 hand in the grasp of both her own, laid her cheek against it; a
 caress so tender, and withal so unobtrusive, that her mother,
 who was looking on, asked herself--"Is that my Pearl?" Yet she
 knew that there was love in the child's heart, although it
 mostly revealed itself in passion, and hardly twice in her
 lifetime had been softened by such gentleness as now.  The
 minister--for, save the long-sought regards of woman, nothing is
 sweeter than these marks of childish preference, accorded
 spontaneously by a spiritual instinct, and therefore seeming to
 imply in us something truly worthy to be loved--the minister
 looked round, laid his hand on the child's head, hesitated an
 instant, and then kissed her brow.  Little Pearl's unwonted mood
 of sentiment lasted no longer; she laughed, and went capering
 down the hall so airily, that old Mr. Wilson raised a question
 whether even her tiptoes touched the floor.
 
 "The little baggage hath witchcraft in her, I profess," said he
 to Mr. Dimmesdale.  "She needs no old woman's broomstick to fly
 withal!"
 
 "A strange child!" remarked old Roger Chillingworth.  "It is
 easy to see the mother's part in her.  Would it be beyond a
 philosopher's research, think ye, gentlemen, to analyse that
 child's nature, and, from it make a mould, to give a shrewd
 guess at the father?"
 
 "Nay; it would be sinful, in such a question, to follow the clue
 of profane philosophy," said Mr. Wilson.  "Better to fast and
 pray upon it; and still better, it may be, to leave the mystery
 as we find it, unless Providence reveal it of its own accord.
 Thereby, every good Christian man hath a title to show a
 father's kindness towards the poor, deserted babe."
 
 The affair being so satisfactorily concluded, Hester Prynne,
--**--**--
 to find embodied the warmth and cheerfulness of home, set up as
 a type of sin before the people.  Her matronly fame was trodden
 under all men's feet.  Infamy was babbling around her in the
 public market-place.  For her kindred, should the tidings ever
 reach them, and for the companions of her unspotted life, there
 remained nothing but the contagion of her dishonour; which would
 not fail to be distributed in strict accordance and proportion
 with the intimacy and sacredness of their previous relationship.
 Then why--since the choice was with himself--should the
 individual, whose connexion with the fallen woman had been the
 most intimate and sacred of them all, come forward to vindicate
 his claim to an inheritance so little desirable?  He resolved not
 to be pilloried beside her on her pedestal of shame.  Unknown to
 all but Hester Prynne, and possessing the lock and key of her
 silence, he chose to withdraw his name from the roll of mankind,
 and, as regarded his former ties and interest, to vanish out of
 life as completely as if he indeed lay at the bottom of the
 ocean, whither rumour had long ago consigned him.  This purpose
 once effected, new interests would immediately spring up, and
 likewise a new purpose; dark, it is true, if not guilty, but of
 force enough to engage the full strength of his faculties.
 
 In pursuance of this resolve, he took up his residence in the
 Puritan town as Roger Chillingworth, without other introduction
 than the learning and intelligence of which he possessed more
 than a common measure.  As his studies, at a previous period of
 his life, had made him extensively acquainted with the medical
 science of the day, it was as a physician that he presented
 himself and as such was cordially received.  Skilful men, of the
--**--**--
 over his heart?  Was he weary of his labours?  Did he wish to die?
 These questions were solemnly propounded to Mr. Dimmesdale by
 the elder ministers of Boston, and the deacons of his church,
 who, to use their own phrase, "dealt with him," on the sin of
 rejecting the aid which Providence so manifestly held out.  He
 listened in silence, and finally promised to confer with the
 physician.
 
 "Were it God's will," said the Reverend Mr. Dimmesdale, when, in
 fulfilment of this pledge, he requested old Roger
 Chillingworth's professional advice, "I could be well content
 that my labours, and my sorrows, and my sins, and my pains,
 should shortly end with me, and what is earthly of them be
 buried in my grave, and the spiritual go with me to my eternal
 state, rather than that you should put your skill to the proof
 in my behalf."
 
 "Ah," replied Roger Chillingworth, with that quietness, which,
 whether imposed or natural, marked all his deportment, "it is
 thus that a young clergyman is apt to speak.  Youthful men, not
 having taken a deep root, give up their hold of life so easily!
 And saintly men, who walk with God on earth, would fain be away,
 to walk with him on the golden pavements of the New Jerusalem."
 
 "Nay," rejoined the young minister, putting his hand to his
 heart, with a flush of pain flitting over his brow, "were I
 worthier to walk there, I could be better content to toil here."
 
 "Good men ever interpret themselves too meanly," said the
 physician.
 
 In this manner, the mysterious old Roger Chillingworth became
 the medical adviser of the Reverend Mr. Dimmesdale.  As not only
 the disease interested the physician, but he was strongly moved
 to look into the character and qualities of the patient, these
--**--**--
 we have intimated, very reasonably imagined that the hand of
 Providence had done all this for the purpose--besought in so
 many public and domestic and secret prayers--of restoring the
 young minister to health.  But, it must now be said, another
 portion of the community had latterly begun to take its own view
 of the relation betwixt Mr. Dimmesdale and the mysterious old
 physician.  When an uninstructed multitude attempts to see with
 its eyes, it is exceedingly apt to be deceived.  When, however,
 it forms its judgment, as it usually does, on the intuitions of
 its great and warm heart, the conclusions thus attained are
 often so profound and so unerring as to possess the character of
 truth supernaturally revealed.  The people, in the case of which
 we speak, could justify its prejudice against Roger
 Chillingworth by no fact or argument worthy of serious
 refutation.  There was an aged handicraftsman, it is true, who
 had been a citizen of London at the period of Sir Thomas
 Overbury's murder, now some thirty years agone; he testified to
 having seen the physician, under some other name, which the
 narrator of the story had now forgotten, in company with Dr.
 Forman, the famous old conjurer, who was implicated in the
 affair of Overbury.  Two or three individuals hinted that the man
 of skill, during his Indian captivity, had enlarged his medical
 attainments by joining in the incantations of the savage
 priests, who were universally acknowledged to be powerful
 enchanters, often performing seemingly miraculous cures by their
 skill in the black art.  A large number--and many of these were
 persons of such sober sense and practical observation that their
 opinions would have been valuable in other matters--affirmed
 that Roger Chillingworth's aspect had undergone a remarkable
 change while he had dwelt in town, and especially since his
--**--**--
 on that day, to see the dark problem of this life made plain.  A
 knowledge of men's hearts will be needful to the completest
 solution of that problem.  And, I conceive moreover, that the
 hearts holding such miserable secrets as you speak of, will
 yield them up, at that last day, not with reluctance, but with a
 joy unutterable."
 
 "Then why not reveal it here?" asked Roger Chillingworth,
 glancing quietly aside at the minister.  "Why should not the
 guilty ones sooner avail themselves of this unutterable solace?"
 
 "They mostly do," said the clergyman, griping hard at his
 breast, as if afflicted with an importunate throb of pain.
 "Many, many a poor soul hath given its confidence to me, not
 only on the death-bed, but while strong in life, and fair in
 reputation.  And ever, after such an outpouring, oh, what a
 relief have I witnessed in those sinful brethren! even as in one
 who at last draws free air, after a long stifling with his own
 polluted breath.  How can it be otherwise?  Why should a wretched
 man--guilty, we will say, of murder--prefer to keep the dead
 corpse buried in his own heart, rather than fling it forth at
 once, and let the universe take care of it!"
 
 "Yet some men bury their secrets thus," observed the calm
 physician.
 
 "True; there are such men," answered Mr. Dimmesdale.  "But not
 to suggest more obvious reasons, it may be that they are kept
 silent by the very constitution of their nature.  Or--can we not
 suppose it?--guilty as they may be, retaining, nevertheless, a
 zeal for God's glory and man's welfare, they shrink from
 displaying themselves black and filthy in the view of men;
 because, thenceforward, no good can be achieved by them; no evil
 of the past be redeemed by better service.  So, to their own
--**--**--
 sick but that an instructed and watchful physician might well
 hope to cure you.  But I know not what to say, the disease is
 what I seem to know, yet know it not."
 
 "You speak in riddles, learned sir," said the pale minister,
 glancing aside out of the window.
 
 "Then, to speak more plainly," continued the physician, "and I
 crave pardon, sir, should it seem to require pardon, for this
 needful plainness of my speech.  Let me ask as your friend, as
 one having charge, under Providence, of your life and physical
 well being, hath all the operations of this disorder been fairly
 laid open and recounted to me?"
 
 "How can you question it?" asked the minister.  "Surely it were
 child's play to call in a physician and then hide the sore!"
 
 "You would tell me, then, that I know all?" said Roger
 Chillingworth, deliberately, and fixing an eye, bright with
 intense and concentrated intelligence, on the minister's face.
 "Be it so!  But again!  He to whom only the outward and physical
 evil is laid open, knoweth, oftentimes, but half the evil which
 he is called upon to cure.  A bodily disease, which we look upon
 as whole and entire within itself, may, after all, be but a
 symptom of some ailment in the spiritual part.  Your pardon once
 again, good sir, if my speech give the shadow of offence.  You,
 sir, of all men whom I have known, are he whose body is the
 closest conjoined, and imbued, and identified, so to speak, with
 the spirit whereof it is the instrument."
 
 "Then I need ask no further," said the clergyman, somewhat
 hastily rising from his chair.  "You deal not, I take it, in
 medicine for the soul!"
 
 "Thus, a sickness," continued Roger Chillingworth, going on, in
 an unaltered tone, without heeding the interruption, but
--**--**--
 more remarkable, inasmuch as he was one of those persons whose
 sleep ordinarily is as light as fitful, and as easily scared
 away, as a small bird hopping on a twig.  To such an unwonted
 remoteness, however, had his spirit now withdrawn into itself
 that he stirred not in his chair when old Roger Chillingworth,
 without any extraordinary precaution, came into the room.  The
 physician advanced directly in front of his patient, laid his
 hand upon his bosom, and thrust aside the vestment, that
 hitherto had always covered it even from the professional eye.
 
 Then, indeed, Mr. Dimmesdale shuddered, and slightly stirred.
 
 After a brief pause, the physician turned away.
 
 But with what a wild look of wonder, joy, and horror!  With what
 a ghastly rapture, as it were, too mighty to be expressed only
 by the eye and features, and therefore bursting forth through
 the whole ugliness of his figure, and making itself even
 riotously manifest by the extravagant gestures with which he
 threw up his arms towards the ceiling, and stamped his foot upon
 the floor!  Had a man seen old Roger Chillingworth, at that
 moment of his ecstasy, he would have had no need to ask how
 Satan comports himself when a precious human soul is lost to
 heaven, and won into his kingdom.
 
 But what distinguished the physician's ecstasy from Satan's was
 the trait of wonder in it!
 
 
 
 XI.  THE INTERIOR OF A HEART
 
 After the incident last described, the intercourse between the
 clergyman and the physician, though externally the same, was
 really of another character than it had previously been.  The
 intellect of Roger Chillingworth had now a sufficiently plain
 path before it.  It was not, indeed, precisely that which he had
 laid out for himself to tread.  Calm, gentle, passionless, as he
 appeared, there was yet, we fear, a quiet depth of malice,
--**--**--
 Dimmesdale's frame so feeble, while they were themselves so
 rugged in their infirmity, believed that he would go heavenward
 before them, and enjoined it upon their children that their old
 bones should be buried close to their young pastor's holy grave.
 And all this time, perchance, when poor Mr. Dimmesdale was
 thinking of his grave, he questioned with himself whether the
 grass would ever grow on it, because an accursed thing must
 there be buried!
 
 It is inconceivable, the agony with which this public veneration
 tortured him.  It was his genuine impulse to adore the truth, and
 to reckon all things shadow-like, and utterly devoid of weight
 or value, that had not its divine essence as the life within
 their life.  Then what was he?--a substance?--or the dimmest of
 all shadows?  He longed to speak out from his own pulpit at the
 full height of his voice, and tell the people what he was.  "I,
 whom you behold in these black garments of the priesthood--I,
 who ascend the sacred desk, and turn my pale face heavenward,
 taking upon myself to hold communion in your behalf with the
 Most High Omniscience--I, in whose daily life you discern the
 sanctity of Enoch--I, whose footsteps, as you suppose, leave a
 gleam along my earthly track, whereby the Pilgrims that shall
 come after me may be guided to the regions of the blest--I, who
 have laid the hand of baptism upon your children--I, who have
 breathed the parting prayer over your dying friends, to whom the
 Amen sounded faintly from a world which they had quitted--I,
 your pastor, whom you so reverence and trust, am utterly a
 pollution and a lie!"
 
 More than once, Mr. Dimmesdale had gone into the pulpit, with a
 purpose never to come down its steps until he should have spoken
--**--**--
 
 None of these visions ever quite deluded him.  At any moment, by
 an effort of his will, he could discern substances through their
 misty lack of substance, and convince himself that they were not
 solid in their nature, like yonder table of carved oak, or that
 big, square, leather-bound and brazen-clasped volume of
 divinity.  But, for all that, they were, in one sense, the truest
 and most substantial things which the poor minister now dealt
 with.  It is the unspeakable misery of a life so false as his,
 that it steals the pith and substance out of whatever realities
 there are around us, and which were meant by Heaven to be the
 spirit's joy and nutriment.  To the untrue man, the whole
 universe is false--it is impalpable--it shrinks to nothing
 within his grasp.  And he himself in so far as he shows himself
 in a false light, becomes a shadow, or, indeed, ceases to exist.
 The only truth that continued to give Mr. Dimmesdale a real
 existence on this earth was the anguish in his inmost soul, and
 the undissembled expression of it in his aspect.  Had he once
 found power to smile, and wear a face of gaiety, there would
 have been no such man!
 
 On one of those ugly nights, which we have faintly hinted at,
 but forborne to picture forth, the minister started from his
 chair.  A new thought had struck him.  There might be a moment's
 peace in it.  Attiring himself with as much care as if it had
 been for public worship, and precisely in the same manner, he
 stole softly down the staircase, undid the door, and issued
 forth.
 
 
 
 XII.  THE MINISTER'S VIGIL
 
 Walking in the shadow of a dream, as it were, and perhaps
 actually under the influence of a species of somnambulism, Mr.
--**--**--
 long way off was approaching up the street.  It threw a gleam of
 recognition, on here a post, and there a garden fence, and here
 a latticed window-pane, and there a pump, with its full trough
 of water, and here again an arched door of oak, with an iron
 knocker, and a rough log for the door-step.  The Reverend Mr.
 Dimmesdale noted all these minute particulars, even while firmly
 convinced that the doom of his existence was stealing onward, in
 the footsteps which he now heard; and that the gleam of the
 lantern would fall upon him in a few moments more, and reveal
 his long-hidden secret.  As the light drew nearer, he beheld,
 within its illuminated circle, his brother clergyman--or, to
 speak more accurately, his professional father, as well as
 highly valued friend--the Reverend Mr. Wilson, who, as Mr.
 Dimmesdale now conjectured, had been praying at the bedside of
 some dying man.  And so he had.  The good old minister came
 freshly from the death-chamber of Governor Winthrop, who had
 passed from earth to heaven within that very hour.  And now
 surrounded, like the saint-like personage of olden times, with a
 radiant halo, that glorified him amid this gloomy night of
 sin--as if the departed Governor had left him an inheritance of
 his glory, or as if he had caught upon himself the distant shine
 of the celestial city, while looking thitherward to see the
 triumphant pilgrim pass within its gates--now, in short, good
 Father Wilson was moving homeward, aiding his footsteps with a
 lighted lantern!  The glimmer of this luminary suggested the
 above conceits to Mr. Dimmesdale, who smiled--nay, almost
 laughed at them--and then wondered if he was going mad.
 
 As the Reverend Mr. Wilson passed beside the scaffold, closely
 muffling his Geneva cloak about him with one arm, and holding
--**--**--
 about the glorified saints.  Hither, likewise, would come the
 elders and deacons of Mr. Dimmesdale's church, and the young
 virgins who so idolized their minister, and had made a shrine
 for him in their white bosoms, which now, by-the-bye, in their
 hurry and confusion, they would scantly have given themselves
 time to cover with their kerchiefs.  All people, in a word, would
 come stumbling over their thresholds, and turning up their
 amazed and horror-stricken visages around the scaffold.  Whom
 would they discern there, with the red eastern light upon his
 brow?  Whom, but the Reverend Arthur Dimmesdale, half-frozen to
 death, overwhelmed with shame, and standing where Hester Prynne
 had stood!
 
 Carried away by the grotesque horror of this picture, the
 minister, unawares, and to his own infinite alarm, burst into a
 great peal of laughter.  It was immediately responded to by a
 light, airy, childish laugh, in which, with a thrill of the
 heart--but he knew not whether of exquisite pain, or pleasure as
 acute--he recognised the tones of little Pearl.
 
 "Pearl!  Little Pearl!" cried he, after a moment's pause; then,
 suppressing his voice--"Hester!  Hester Prynne!  Are you there?"
 
 "Yes; it is Hester Prynne!" she replied, in a tone of surprise;
 and the minister heard her footsteps approaching from the
 side-walk, along which she had been passing.  "It is I, and my
 little Pearl."
 
 "Whence come you, Hester?" asked the minister.  "What sent you
 hither?"
 
 "I have been watching at a death-bed," answered Hester Prynne
 "at Governor Winthrop's death-bed, and have taken his measure
 for a robe, and am now going homeward to my dwelling."
 
 "Come up hither, Hester, thou and little Pearl," said the
 Reverend Mr. Dimmesdale.  "Ye have both been here before, but I
 was not with you.  Come up hither once again, and we will stand
--**--**--
 Providence to write a people's doom upon.  The belief was a
 favourite one with our forefathers, as betokening that their
 infant commonwealth was under a celestial guardianship of
 peculiar intimacy and strictness.  But what shall we say, when an
 individual discovers a revelation addressed to himself alone, on
 the same vast sheet of record.  In such a case, it could only be
 the symptom of a highly disordered mental state, when a man,
 rendered morbidly self-contemplative by long, intense, and
 secret pain, had extended his egotism over the whole expanse of
 nature, until the firmament itself should appear no more than a
 fitting page for his soul's history and fate.
 
 We impute it, therefore, solely to the disease in his own eye
 and heart that the minister, looking upward to the zenith,
 beheld there the appearance of an immense letter--the letter
 A--marked out in lines of dull red light.  Not but the meteor may
 have shown itself at that point, burning duskily through a veil
 of cloud, but with no such shape as his guilty imagination gave
 it, or, at least, with so little definiteness, that another's
 guilt might have seen another symbol in it.
 
 There was a singular circumstance that characterised Mr.
 Dimmesdale's psychological state at this moment.  All the time
 that he gazed upward to the zenith, he was, nevertheless,
 perfectly aware that little Pearl was pointing her finger towards
 old Roger Chillingworth, who stood at no great distance from the
 scaffold.  The minister appeared to see him, with the same glance
 that discerned the miraculous letter.  To his feature as to all
 other objects, the meteoric light imparted a new expression; or
 it might well be that the physician was not careful then, as at
 all other times, to hide the malevolence with which he looked
--**--**--
 Pearl mumbled something into his ear that sounded, indeed, like
 human language, but was only such gibberish as children may be
 heard amusing themselves with by the hour together.  At all
 events, if it involved any secret information in regard to old
 Roger Chillingworth, it was in a tongue unknown to the erudite
 clergyman, and did but increase the bewilderment of his mind.
 The elvish child then laughed aloud.
 
 "Dost thou mock me now?" said the minister.
 
 "Thou wast not bold!--thou wast not true!" answered the child.
 "Thou wouldst not promise to take my hand, and mother's hand,
 to-morrow noon-tide!"
 
 "Worthy sir," answered the physician, who had now advanced to
 the foot of the platform--"pious Master Dimmesdale! can this be
 you?  Well, well, indeed!  We men of study, whose heads are in our
 books, have need to be straitly looked after!  We dream in our
 waking moments, and walk in our sleep.  Come, good sir, and my
 dear friend, I pray you let me lead you home!"
 
 "How knewest thou that I was here?" asked the minister,
 fearfully.
 
 "Verily, and in good faith," answered Roger Chillingworth, "I
 knew nothing of the matter.  I had spent the better part of the
 night at the bedside of the worshipful Governor Winthrop, doing
 what my poor skill might to give him ease.  He, going home to a
 better world, I, likewise, was on my way homeward, when this
 light shone out.  Come with me, I beseech you, Reverend sir, else
 you will be poorly able to do Sabbath duty to-morrow.  Aha! see
 now how they trouble the brain--these books!--these books!  You
 should study less, good sir, and take a little pastime, or these
 night whimsies will grow upon you."
 
 "I will go home with you," said Mr. Dimmesdale.
 
 With a chill despondency, like one awakening, all nerveless,
--**--**--
 all other ties, it brought along with it its obligations.
 
 Hester Prynne did not now occupy precisely the same position in
 which we beheld her during the earlier periods of her ignominy.
 Years had come and gone.  Pearl was now seven years old.  Her
 mother, with the scarlet letter on her breast, glittering in its
 fantastic embroidery, had long been a familiar object to the
 townspeople.  As is apt to be the case when a person stands out
 in any prominence before the community, and, at the same time,
 interferes neither with public nor individual interests and
 convenience, a species of general regard had ultimately grown up
 in reference to Hester Prynne.  It is to the credit of human
 nature that, except where its selfishness is brought into play,
 it loves more readily than it hates.  Hatred, by a gradual and
 quiet process, will even be transformed to love, unless the
 change be impeded by a continually new irritation of the
 original feeling of hostility.  In this matter of Hester Prynne
 there was neither irritation nor irksomeness.  She never battled
 with the public, but submitted uncomplainingly to its worst
 usage; she made no claim upon it in requital for what she
 suffered; she did not weigh upon its sympathies.  Then, also, the
 blameless purity of her life during all these years in which she
 had been set apart to infamy was reckoned largely in her favour.
 With nothing now to lose, in the sight of mankind, and with no
 hope, and seemingly no wish, of gaining anything, it could only
 be a genuine regard for virtue that had brought back the poor
 wanderer to its paths.
 
 It was perceived, too, that while Hester never put forward even
 the humblest title to share in the world's privileges--further
 than to breathe the common air and earn daily bread for little
--**--**--
 more benign countenance than she cared to be favoured with, or,
 perchance, than she deserved.
 
 The rulers, and the wise and learned men of the community, were
 longer in acknowledging the influence of Hester's good qualities
 than the people.  The prejudices which they shared in common with
 the latter were fortified in themselves by an iron frame-work of
 reasoning, that made it a far tougher labour to expel them.  Day
 by day, nevertheless, their sour and rigid wrinkles were
 relaxing into something which, in the due course of years, might
 grow to be an expression of almost benevolence.  Thus it was with
 the men of rank, on whom their eminent position imposed the
 guardianship of the public morals.  Individuals in private life,
 meanwhile, had quite forgiven Hester Prynne for her frailty;
 nay, more, they had begun to look upon the scarlet letter as the
 token, not of that one sin for which she had borne so long and
 dreary a penance, but of her many good deeds since.  "Do you see
 that woman with the embroidered badge?" they would say to
 strangers.  "It is our Hester--the town's own Hester--who is so
 kind to the poor, so helpful to the sick, so comfortable to the
 afflicted!"  Then, it is true, the propensity of human nature to
 tell the very worst of itself, when embodied in the person of
 another, would constrain them to whisper the black scandal of
 bygone years.  It was none the less a fact, however, that in the
 eyes of the very men who spoke thus, the scarlet letter had the
 effect of the cross on a nun's bosom.  It imparted to the wearer
 a kind of sacredness, which enabled her to walk securely amid
 all peril.  Had she fallen among thieves, it would have kept her
--**--**--
 
 Much of the marble coldness of Hester's impression was to be
 attributed to the circumstance that her life had turned, in a
 great measure, from passion and feeling to thought.  Standing
 alone in the world--alone, as to any dependence on society, and
 with little Pearl to be guided and protected--alone, and
 hopeless of retrieving her position, even had she not scorned to
 consider it desirable--she cast away the fragment of a broken
 chain.  The world's law was no law for her mind.  It was an age in
 which the human intellect, newly emancipated, had taken a more
 active and a wider range than for many centuries before.  Men of
 the sword had overthrown nobles and kings.  Men bolder than these
 had overthrown and rearranged--not actually, but within the
 sphere of theory, which was their most real abode--the whole
 system of ancient prejudice, wherewith was linked much of
 ancient principle.  Hester Prynne imbibed this spirit.  She
 assumed a freedom of speculation, then common enough on the
 other side of the Atlantic, but which our forefathers, had they
 known it, would have held to be a deadlier crime than that
 stigmatised by the scarlet letter.  In her lonesome cottage, by
 the seashore, thoughts visited her such as dared to enter no
 other dwelling in New England; shadowy guests, that would have
 been as perilous as demons to their entertainer, could they have
 been seen so much as knocking at her door.
 
 It is remarkable that persons who speculate the most boldly
 often conform with the most perfect quietude to the external
 regulations of society.  The thought suffices them, without
 investing itself in the flesh and blood of action.  So it seemed
 to be with Hester.  Yet, had little Pearl never come to her from
 the spiritual world, it might have been far otherwise.  Then she
--**--**--
 badge," calmly replied Hester.  "Were I worthy to be quit of it,
 it would fall away of its own nature, or be transformed into
 something that should speak a different purport."
 
 "Nay, then, wear it, if it suit you better," rejoined he, "A
 woman must needs follow her own fancy touching the adornment of
 her person.  The letter is gaily embroidered, and shows right
 bravely on your bosom!"
 
 All this while Hester had been looking steadily at the old man,
 and was shocked, as well as wonder-smitten, to discern what a
 change had been wrought upon him within the past seven years.  It
 was not so much that he had grown older; for though the traces
 of advancing life were visible he bore his age well, and seemed
 to retain a wiry vigour and alertness.  But the former aspect of
 an intellectual and studious man, calm and quiet, which was what
 she best remembered in him, had altogether vanished, and been
 succeeded by an eager, searching, almost fierce, yet carefully
 guarded look.  It seemed to be his wish and purpose to mask this
 expression with a smile, but the latter played him false, and
 flickered over his visage so derisively that the spectator could
 see his blackness all the better for it.  Ever and anon, too,
 there came a glare of red light out of his eyes, as if the old
 man's soul were on fire and kept on smouldering duskily within
 his breast, until by some casual puff of passion it was blown
 into a momentary flame.  This he repressed as speedily as
 possible, and strove to look as if nothing of the kind had
 happened.
 
 In a word, old Roger Chillingworth was a striking evidence of
 man's faculty of transforming himself into a devil, if he will
--**--**--
 though you might deem me cold, nevertheless a man thoughtful for
 others, craving little for himself--kind, true, just and of
 constant, if not warm affections?  Was I not all this?"
 
 "All this, and more," said Hester.
 
 "And what am I now?" demanded he, looking into her face, and
 permitting the whole evil within him to be written on his
 features.  "I have already told thee what I am--a fiend!  Who made
 me so?"
 
 "It was myself," cried Hester, shuddering.  "It was I, not less
 than he.  Why hast thou not avenged thyself on me?"
 
 "I have left thee to the scarlet letter," replied Roger
 Chillingworth.  "If that has not avenged me, I can do no more!"
 
 He laid his finger on it with a smile.
 
 "It has avenged thee," answered Hester Prynne.
 
 "I judged no less," said the physician.  "And now what wouldst
 thou with me touching this man?"
 
 "I must reveal the secret," answered Hester, firmly.  "He must
 discern thee in thy true character.  What may be the result I
 know not.  But this long debt of confidence, due from me to him,
 whose bane and ruin I have been, shall at length be paid.  So far
 as concerns the overthrow or preservation of his fair fame and
 his earthly state, and perchance his life, he is in my hands.
 Nor do I--whom the scarlet letter has disciplined to truth,
 though it be the truth of red-hot iron entering into the
 soul--nor do I perceive such advantage in his living any longer
 a life of ghastly emptiness, that I shall stoop to implore thy
 mercy.  Do with him as thou wilt!  There is no good for him, no
 good for me, no good for thee.  There is no good for little
 Pearl.  There is no path to guide us out of this dismal maze."
--**--**--
 "Pearl!  Little Pearl!  Where are you?"
 
 Pearl, whose activity of spirit never flagged, had been at no
 loss for amusement while her mother talked with the old gatherer
 of herbs.  At first, as already told, she had flirted fancifully
 with her own image in a pool of water, beckoning the phantom
 forth, and--as it declined to venture--seeking a passage for
 herself into its sphere of impalpable earth and unattainable
 sky.  Soon finding, however, that either she or the image was
 unreal, she turned elsewhere for better pastime.  She made little
 boats out of birch-bark, and freighted them with snailshells,
 and sent out more ventures on the mighty deep than any merchant
 in New England; but the larger part of them foundered near the
 shore.  She seized a live horse-shoe by the tail, and made prize
 of several five-fingers, and laid out a jelly-fish to melt in
 the warm sun.  Then she took up the white foam that streaked the
 line of the advancing tide, and threw it upon the breeze,
 scampering after it with winged footsteps to catch the great
 snowflakes ere they fell.  Perceiving a flock of beach-birds that
 fed and fluttered along the shore, the naughty child picked up
 her apron full of pebbles, and, creeping from rock to rock after
 these small sea-fowl, displayed remarkable dexterity in pelting
 them.  One little gray bird, with a white breast, Pearl was
 almost sure had been hit by a pebble, and fluttered away with a
 broken wing.  But then the elf-child sighed, and gave up her
 sport, because it grieved her to have done harm to a little
 being that was as wild as the sea-breeze, or as wild as Pearl
 herself.
 
 Her final employment was to gather seaweed of various kinds, and
 make herself a scarf or mantle, and a head-dress, and thus
--**--**--
 "What does the letter mean, mother?  and why dost thou wear it?
 and why does the minister keep his hand over his heart?"
 
 "What shall I say?" thought Hester to herself.  "No!  if this be
 the price of the child's sympathy, I cannot pay it."
 
 Then she spoke aloud--
 
 "Silly Pearl," said she, "what questions are these?  There are
 many things in this world that a child must not ask about.  What
 know I of the minister's heart?  And as for the scarlet letter, I
 wear it for the sake of its gold thread."
 
 In all the seven bygone years, Hester Prynne had never before
 been false to the symbol on her bosom.  It may be that it was the
 talisman of a stern and severe, but yet a guardian spirit, who
 now forsook her; as recognising that, in spite of his strict
 watch over her heart, some new evil had crept into it, or some
 old one had never been expelled.  As for little Pearl, the
 earnestness soon passed out of her face.
 
 But the child did not see fit to let the matter drop.  Two or
 three times, as her mother and she went homeward, and as often
 at supper-time, and while Hester was putting her to bed, and
 once after she seemed to be fairly asleep, Pearl looked up, with
 mischief gleaming in her black eyes.
 
 "Mother," said she, "what does the scarlet letter mean?"
 
 And the next morning, the first indication the child gave of
 being awake was by popping up her head from the pillow, and
 making that other enquiry, which she had so unaccountably
 connected with her investigations about the scarlet letter--
 
 "Mother!--Mother!--Why does the minister keep his hand over his
 heart?"
 
 "Hold thy tongue, naughty child!" answered her mother, with an
 asperity that she had never permitted to herself before.  "Do not
--**--**--
 in the afternoon of the morrow.  Betimes, therefore, the next
 day, Hester took little Pearl--who was necessarily the companion
 of all her mother's expeditions, however inconvenient her
 presence--and set forth.
 
 The road, after the two wayfarers had crossed from the Peninsula
 to the mainland, was no other than a foot-path.  It straggled
 onward into the mystery of the primeval forest.  This hemmed it
 in so narrowly, and stood so black and dense on either side, and
 disclosed such imperfect glimpses of the sky above, that, to
 Hester's mind, it imaged not amiss the moral wilderness in which
 she had so long been wandering.  The day was chill and sombre.
 Overhead was a gray expanse of cloud, slightly stirred, however,
 by a breeze; so that a gleam of flickering sunshine might now
 and then be seen at its solitary play along the path.  This
 flitting cheerfulness was always at the further extremity of
 some long vista through the forest.  The sportive
 sunlight--feebly sportive, at best, in the predominant
 pensiveness of the day and scene--withdrew itself as they came
 nigh, and left the spots where it had danced the drearier,
 because they had hoped to find them bright.
 
 "Mother," said little Pearl, "the sunshine does not love you.
 It runs away and hides itself, because it is afraid of something
 on your bosom.  Now, see!  There it is, playing a good way off.
 Stand you here, and let me run and catch it.  I am but a child.
 It will not flee from me--for I wear nothing on my bosom yet!"
 
 "Nor ever will, my child, I hope," said Hester.
 
 "And why not, mother?" asked Pearl, stopping short, just at the
 beginning of her race.  "Will not it come of its own accord when
 I am a woman grown?"
 
 "Run away, child," answered her mother, "and catch the sunshine.
--**--**--
 thyself to play, and leave me to speak with him that comes
 yonder."
 
 "Is it the Black Man?" asked Pearl.
 
 "Wilt thou go and play, child?" repeated her mother, "But do not
 stray far into the wood.  And take heed that thou come at my
 first call."
 
 "Yes, mother," answered Pearl, "But if it be the Black Man, wilt
 thou not let me stay a moment, and look at him, with his big
 book under his arm?"
 
 "Go, silly child!" said her mother impatiently.  "It is no Black
 Man!  Thou canst see him now, through the trees.  It is the
 minister!"
 
 "And so it is!" said the child.  "And, mother, he has his hand
 over his heart!  Is it because, when the minister wrote his name
 in the book, the Black Man set his mark in that place?  But why
 does he not wear it outside his bosom, as thou dost, mother?"
 
 "Go now, child, and thou shalt tease me as thou wilt another
 time," cried Hester Prynne.  "But do not stray far.  Keep where
 thou canst hear the babble of the brook."
 
 The child went singing away, following up the current of the
 brook, and striving to mingle a more lightsome cadence with its
 melancholy voice.  But the little stream would not be comforted,
 and still kept telling its unintelligible secret of some very
 mournful mystery that had happened--or making a prophetic
 lamentation about something that was yet to happen--within the
 verge of the dismal forest.  So Pearl, who had enough of shadow
 in her own little life, chose to break off all acquaintance with
 this repining brook.  She set herself, therefore, to gathering
 violets and wood-anemones, and some scarlet columbines that she
 found growing in the crevice of a high rock.
 
 When her elf-child had departed, Hester Prynne made a step or
--**--**--
 of spiritual torment.  Hester, I am most miserable!"
 
 "The people reverence thee," said Hester.  "And surely thou
 workest good among them!  Doth this bring thee no comfort?"
 
 "More misery, Hester!--Only the more misery!" answered the
 clergyman with a bitter smile.  "As concerns the good which I may
 appear to do, I have no faith in it.  It must needs be a
 delusion.  What can a ruined soul like mine effect towards the
 redemption of other souls?--or a polluted soul towards their
 purification?  And as for the people's reverence, would that it
 were turned to scorn and hatred!  Canst thou deem it, Hester, a
 consolation that I must stand up in my pulpit, and meet so many
 eyes turned upward to my face, as if the light of heaven were
 beaming from it!--must see my flock hungry for the truth, and
 listening to my words as if a tongue of Pentecost were
 speaking!--and then look inward, and discern the black reality
 of what they idolise?  I have laughed, in bitterness and agony of
 heart, at the contrast between what I seem and what I am!  And
 Satan laughs at it!"
 
 "You wrong yourself in this," said Hester gently.  "You have
 deeply and sorely repented.  Your sin is left behind you in the
 days long past.  Your present life is not less holy, in very
 truth, than it seems in people's eyes.  Is there no reality in
 the penitence thus sealed and witnessed by good works?  And
 wherefore should it not bring you peace?"
 
 "No, Hester--no!" replied the clergyman.  "There is no substance
 in it!  It is cold and dead, and can do nothing for me!  Of
 penance, I have had enough!  Of penitence, there has been none!
 Else, I should long ago have thrown off these garments of mock
 holiness, and have shown myself to mankind as they will see me
--**--**--
 
 "I might have known it," murmured he--"I did know it!  Was not
 the secret told me, in the natural recoil of my heart at the
 first sight of him, and as often as I have seen him since?  Why
 did I not understand?  Oh, Hester Prynne, thou little, little
 knowest all the horror of this thing!  And the shame!--the
 indelicacy!--the horrible ugliness of this exposure of a sick
 and guilty heart to the very eye that would gloat over it!
 Woman, woman, thou art accountable for this!--I cannot forgive
 thee!"
 
 "Thou shalt forgive me!" cried Hester, flinging herself on the
 fallen leaves beside him.  "Let God punish!  Thou shalt forgive!"
 
 With sudden and desperate tenderness she threw her arms around
 him, and pressed his head against her bosom, little caring
 though his cheek rested on the scarlet letter.  He would have
 released himself, but strove in vain to do so.  Hester would not
 set him free, lest he should look her sternly in the face.  All
 the world had frowned on her--for seven long years had it
 frowned upon this lonely woman--and still she bore it all, nor
 ever once turned away her firm, sad eyes.  Heaven, likewise, had
 frowned upon her, and she had not died.  But the frown of this
 pale, weak, sinful, and sorrow-stricken man was what Hester
 could not bear, and live!
 
 "Wilt thou yet forgive me?" she repeated, over and over again.
 "Wilt thou not frown?  Wilt thou forgive?"
 
 "I do forgive you, Hester," replied the minister at length, with
 a deep utterance, out of an abyss of sadness, but no anger.  "I
 freely forgive you now.  May God forgive us both.  We are not,
 Hester, the worst sinners in the world.  There is one worse than
 even the polluted priest!  That old man's revenge has been
--**--**--
 moment true!
 
 He started at a thought that suddenly occurred to him.
 
 "Hester!" cried he, "here is a new horror!  Roger Chillingworth
 knows your purpose to reveal his true character.  Will he
 continue, then, to keep our secret?  What will now be the course
 of his revenge?"
 
 "There is a strange secrecy in his nature," replied Hester,
 thoughtfully; "and it has grown upon him by the hidden practices
 of his revenge.  I deem it not likely that he will betray the
 secret.  He will doubtless seek other means of satiating his dark
 passion."
 
 "And I!--how am I to live longer, breathing the same air with
 this deadly enemy?" exclaimed Arthur Dimmesdale, shrinking
 within himself, and pressing his hand nervously against his
 heart--a gesture that had grown involuntary with him.  "Think for
 me, Hester!  Thou art strong.  Resolve for me!"
 
 "Thou must dwell no longer with this man," said Hester, slowly
 and firmly.  "Thy heart must be no longer under his evil eye!"
 
 "It were far worse than death!" replied the minister.  "But how
 to avoid it?  What choice remains to me?  Shall I lie down again
 on these withered leaves, where I cast myself when thou didst
 tell me what he was?  Must I sink down there, and die at once?"
 
 "Alas!  what a ruin has befallen thee!" said Hester, with the
 tears gushing into her eyes.  "Wilt thou die for very weakness?
 There is no other cause!"
 
 "The judgment of God is on me," answered the conscience-stricken
 priest.  "It is too mighty for me to struggle with!"
 
 "Heaven would show mercy," rejoined Hester, "hadst thou but the
 strength to take advantage of it."
 
 "Be thou strong for me!" answered he.  "Advise me what to do."
 
 "Is the world, then, so narrow?" exclaimed Hester Prynne, fixing
 her deep eyes on the minister's, and instinctively exercising a
--**--**--
 
 
 XVIII.  A FLOOD OF SUNSHINE
 
 Arthur Dimmesdale gazed into Hester's face with a look in which
 hope and joy shone out, indeed, but with fear betwixt them, and
 a kind of horror at her boldness, who had spoken what he vaguely
 hinted at, but dared not speak.
 
 But Hester Prynne, with a mind of native courage and activity,
 and for so long a period not merely estranged, but outlawed from
 society, had habituated herself to such latitude of speculation
 as was altogether foreign to the clergyman.  She had wandered,
 without rule or guidance, in a moral wilderness, as vast, as
 intricate, and shadowy as the untamed forest, amid the gloom of
 which they were now holding a colloquy that was to decide their
 fate.  Her intellect and heart had their home, as it were, in
 desert places, where she roamed as freely as the wild Indian in
 his woods.  For years past she had looked from this estranged
 point of view at human institutions, and whatever priests or
 legislators had established; criticising all with hardly more
 reverence than the Indian would feel for the clerical band, the
 judicial robe, the pillory, the gallows, the fireside, or the
 church.  The tendency of her fate and fortunes had been to set
 her free.  The scarlet letter was her passport into regions where
 other women dared not tread.  Shame, Despair, Solitude!  These had
 been her teachers--stern and wild ones--and they had made her
 strong, but taught her much amiss.
 
 The minister, on the other hand, had never gone through an
 experience calculated to lead him beyond the scope of generally
 received laws; although, in a single instance, he had so
 fearfully transgressed one of the most sacred of them.  But this
 had been a sin of passion, not of principle, nor even purpose.
--**--**--
 my better angel!  I seem to have flung myself--sick, sin-stained,
 and sorrow-blackened--down upon these forest leaves, and to have
 risen up all made anew, and with new powers to glorify Him that
 hath been merciful!  This is already the better life!  Why did we
 not find it sooner?"
 
 "Let us not look back," answered Hester Prynne.  "The past is
 gone!  Wherefore should we linger upon it now?  See!  With this
 symbol I undo it all, and make it as if it had never been!"
 
 So speaking, she undid the clasp that fastened the scarlet
 letter, and, taking it from her bosom, threw it to a distance
 among the withered leaves.  The mystic token alighted on the
 hither verge of the stream.  With a hand's-breadth further
 flight, it would have fallen into the water, and have given the
 little brook another woe to carry onward, besides the
 unintelligible tale which it still kept murmuring about.  But
 there lay the embroidered letter, glittering like a lost jewel,
 which some ill-fated wanderer might pick up, and thenceforth be
 haunted by strange phantoms of guilt, sinkings of the heart, and
 unaccountable misfortune.
 
 The stigma gone, Hester heaved a long, deep sigh, in which the
 burden of shame and anguish departed from her spirit.  O
 exquisite relief!  She had not known the weight until she felt
 the freedom!  By another impulse, she took off the formal cap
 that confined her hair, and down it fell upon her shoulders,
 dark and rich, with at once a shadow and a light in its
 abundance, and imparting the charm of softness to her features.
 There played around her mouth, and beamed out of her eyes, a
 radiant and tender smile, that seemed gushing from the very
 heart of womanhood.  A crimson flush was glowing on her cheek,
--**--**--
 the character of flame!  And Pearl was the oneness of their
 being.  Be the foregone evil what it might, how could they doubt
 that their earthly lives and future destinies were conjoined
 when they beheld at once the material union, and the spiritual
 idea, in whom they met, and were to dwell immortally together;
 thoughts like these--and perhaps other thoughts, which they did
 not acknowledge or define--threw an awe about the child as she
 came onward.
 
 "Let her see nothing strange--no passion or eagerness--in thy
 way of accosting her," whispered Hester.  "Our Pearl is a fitful
 and fantastic little elf sometimes.  Especially she is generally
 intolerant of emotion, when she does not fully comprehend the
 why and wherefore.  But the child hath strong affections!  She
 loves me, and will love thee!"
 
 "Thou canst not think," said the minister, glancing aside at
 Hester Prynne, "how my heart dreads this interview, and yearns
 for it!  But, in truth, as I already told thee, children are not
 readily won to be familiar with me.  They will not climb my knee,
 nor prattle in my ear, nor answer to my smile, but stand apart,
 and eye me strangely.  Even little babes, when I take them in my
 arms, weep bitterly.  Yet Pearl, twice in her little lifetime,
 hath been kind to me!  The first time--thou knowest it well!  The
 last was when thou ledst her with thee to the house of yonder
 stern old Governor."
 
 "And thou didst plead so bravely in her behalf and mine!"
 answered the mother.  "I remember it; and so shall little Pearl.
 Fear nothing.  She may be strange and shy at first, but will soon
 learn to love thee!"
 
 By this time Pearl had reached the margin of the brook, and
 stood on the further side, gazing silently at Hester and the
--**--**--
 Seen in the brook once more was the shadowy wrath of Pearl's
 image, crowned and girdled with flowers, but stamping its foot,
 wildly gesticulating, and, in the midst of all, still pointing
 its small forefinger at Hester's bosom.
 
 "I see what ails the child," whispered Hester to the clergyman,
 and turning pale in spite of a strong effort to conceal her
 trouble and annoyance, "Children will not abide any, the
 slightest, change in the accustomed aspect of things that are
 daily before their eyes.  Pearl misses something that she has
 always seen me wear!"
 
 "I pray you," answered the minister, "if thou hast any means of
 pacifying the child, do it forthwith!  Save it were the cankered
 wrath of an old witch like Mistress Hibbins," added he,
 attempting to smile, "I know nothing that I would not sooner
 encounter than this passion in a child.  In Pearl's young beauty,
 as in the wrinkled witch, it has a preternatural effect.  Pacify
 her if thou lovest me!"
 
 Hester turned again towards Pearl with a crimson blush upon her
 cheek, a conscious glance aside clergyman, and then a heavy
 sigh, while, even before she had time to speak, the blush
 yielded to a deadly pallor.
 
 "Pearl," said she sadly, "look down at thy feet!  There!--before
 thee!--on the hither side of the brook!"
 
 The child turned her eyes to the point indicated, and there lay
 the scarlet letter so close upon the margin of the stream that
 the gold embroidery was reflected in it.
 
 "Bring it hither!" said Hester.
 
 "Come thou and take it up!" answered Pearl.
 
 "Was ever such a child!" observed Hester aside to the minister.
 "Oh, I have much to tell thee about her!  But, in very truth, she
 is right as regards this hateful token.  I must bear its torture
--**--**--
 the gliding water.  She then remained apart, silently watching
 Hester and the clergyman; while they talked together and made
 such arrangements as were suggested by their new position and
 the purposes soon to be fulfilled.
 
 And now this fateful interview had come to a close.  The dell
 was to be left in solitude among its dark, old trees, which,
 with their multitudinous tongues, would whisper long of what had
 passed there, and no mortal be the wiser.  And the melancholy
 brook would add this other tale to the mystery with which its
 little heart was already overburdened, and whereof it still kept
 up a murmuring babble, with not a whit more cheerfulness of tone
 than for ages heretofore.
 
 
 
 XX.  THE MINISTER IN A MAZE
 
 As the minister departed, in advance of Hester Prynne and little
 Pearl, he threw a backward glance, half expecting that he should
 discover only some faintly traced features or outline of the
 mother and the child, slowly fading into the twilight of the
 woods.  So great a vicissitude in his life could not at once be
 received as real.  But there was Hester, clad in her gray robe,
 still standing beside the tree-trunk, which some blast had
 overthrown a long antiquity ago, and which time had ever since
 been covering with moss, so that these two fated ones, with
 earth's heaviest burden on them, might there sit down together,
 and find a single hour's rest and solace.  And there was Pearl,
 too, lightly dancing from the margin of the brook--now that the
 intrusive third person was gone--and taking her old place by her
 mother's side.  So the minister had not fallen asleep and
 dreamed!
 
 In order to free his mind from this indistinctness and duplicity
 of impression, which vexed it with a strange disquietude, he
--**--**--
 since he had quitted them.  There, indeed, was each former trace
 of the street, as he remembered it, and all the peculiarities of
 the houses, with the due multitude of gable-peaks, and a
 weather-cock at every point where his memory suggested one.  Not
 the less, however, came this importunately obtrusive sense of
 change.  The same was true as regarded the acquaintances whom he
 met, and all the well-known shapes of human life, about the
 little town.  They looked neither older nor younger now; the
 beards of the aged were no whiter, nor could the creeping babe
 of yesterday walk on his feet to-day; it was impossible to
 describe in what respect they differed from the individuals on
 whom he had so recently bestowed a parting glance; and yet the
 minister's deepest sense seemed to inform him of their
 mutability.  A similar impression struck him most remarkably as
 he passed under the walls of his own church.  The edifice had so
 very strange, and yet so familiar an aspect, that Mr.
 Dimmesdale's mind vibrated between two ideas; either that he had
 seen it only in a dream hitherto, or that he was merely dreaming
 about it now.
 
 This phenomenon, in the various shapes which it assumed,
 indicated no external change, but so sudden and important a
 change in the spectator of the familiar scene, that the
 intervening space of a single day had operated on his
 consciousness like the lapse of years.  The minister's own will,
 and Hester's will, and the fate that grew between them, had
 wrought this transformation.  It was the same town as heretofore,
 but the same minister returned not from the forest.  He might
 have said to the friends who greeted him--"I am not the man for
 whom you take me!  I left him yonder in the forest, withdrawn
--**--**--
 may, and ask little reason wherefore.
 
 Of these four friends of ours, three were artists, or connected with
 art; and, at this moment, they had been simultaneously struck by a
 resemblance between one of the antique statues, a well-known masterpiece
 of Grecian sculpture, and a young Italian, the fourth member of their
 party.
 
 "You must needs confess, Kenyon," said a dark-eyed young woman, whom
 her friends called Miriam, "that you never chiselled out of marble, nor
 wrought in clay, a more vivid likeness than this, cunning a bust-maker
 as you think yourself. The portraiture is perfect in character,
 sentiment, and feature. If it were a picture, the resemblance might be
 half illusive and imaginary; but here, in this Pentelic marble, it is a
 substantial fact, and may be tested by absolute touch and measurement.
 Our friend Donatello is the very Faun of Praxiteles. Is it not true,
 Hilda?"
 
 "Not quite--almost--yes, I really think so," replied Hilda, a slender,
 brown-haired, New England girl, whose perceptions of form and expression
 were wonderfully clear and delicate. "If there is any difference between
 the two faces, the reason may be, I suppose, that the Faun dwelt in
 woods and fields, and consorted with his like; whereas Donatello has
 known cities a little, and such people as ourselves. But the resemblance
 is very close, and very strange."
 
 "Not so strange," whispered Miriam mischievously; "for no Faun in
 Arcadia was ever a greater simpleton than Donatello. He has hardly a
 man's share of wit, small as that may be. It is a pity there are no
 longer any of this congenial race of rustic creatures for our friend to
 consort with!"
 
 "Hush, naughty one!" returned Hilda. "You are very ungrateful, for you
 well know he has wit enough to worship you, at all events."
 
 "Then the greater fool he!" said Miriam so bitterly that Hilda's quiet
--**--**--
 kindred,--a certain caudal appendage; which, if the Faun of Praxiteles
 must be supposed to possess it at all, is hidden by the lion's skin that
 forms his garment. The pointed and furry ears, therefore, are the sole
 indications of his wild, forest nature.
 
 Only a sculptor of the finest imagination, the most delicate taste, the
 sweetest feeling, and the rarest artistic skill--in a word, a sculptor
 and a poet too--could have first dreamed of a Faun in this guise, and
 then have succeeded in imprisoning the sportive and frisky thing in
 marble. Neither man nor animal, and yet no monster, but a being in whom
 both races meet on friendly ground. The idea grows coarse as we handle
 it, and hardens in our grasp. But, if the spectator broods long over
 the statue, he will be conscious of its spell; all the pleasantness of
 sylvan life, all the genial and happy characteristics of creatures that
 dwell in woods and fields, will seem to be mingled and kneaded into one
 substance, along with the kindred qualities in the human soul. Trees,
 grass, flowers, woodland streamlets, cattle, deer, and unsophisticated
 man. The essence of all these was compressed long ago, and still exists,
 within that discolored marble surface of the Faun of Praxiteles.
 
 And, after all, the idea may have been no dream, but rather a poet's
 reminiscence of a period when man's affinity with nature was more
 strict, and his fellowship with every living thing more intimate and
 dear.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER II
 
 
 THE FAUN
 
 
 "Donatello," playfully cried Miriam, "do not leave us in this perplexity!
 Shake aside those brown curls, my friend, and let us see whether this
 marvellous resemblance extends to the very tips of the ears. If so, we
 shall like you all the better!"
 
 "No, no, dearest signorina," answered Donatello, laughing, but with
--**--**--
 treating Donatello as if he were the merest unfledged chicken; and yet
 he can claim no such privileges in the right of his tender age, for he
 is at least--how old should you think him, Hilda?"
 
 "Twenty years, perhaps," replied Hilda, glancing at Donatello; "but,
 indeed, I cannot tell; hardly so old, on second thoughts, or possibly
 older. He has nothing to do with time, but has a look of eternal youth
 in his face."
 
 "All underwitted people have that look," said Miriam scornfully.
 
 "Donatello has certainly the gift of eternal youth, as Hilda suggests,"
 observed Kenyon, laughing; "for, judging by the date of this statue,
 which, I am more and more convinced, Praxiteles carved on purpose for
 him, he must be at least twenty-five centuries old, and he still looks
 as young as ever."
 
 "What age have you, Donatello?" asked Miriam.
 
 "Signorina, I do not know," he answered; "no great age, however; for I
 have only lived since I met you."
 
 "Now, what old man of society could have turned a silly compliment more
 smartly than that!" exclaimed Miriam. "Nature and art are just at one
 sometimes. But what a happy ignorance is this of our friend Donatello!
 Not to know his own age! It is equivalent to being immortal on earth. If
 I could only forget mine!"
 
 "It is too soon to wish that," observed the sculptor; "you are scarcely
 older than Donatello looks."
 
 "I shall be content, then," rejoined Miriam, "if I could only forget
 one day of all my life." Then she seemed to repent of this allusion, and
 hastily added, "A woman's days are so tedious that it is a boon to leave
 even one of them out of the account."
 
 The foregoing conversation had been carried on in a mood in which all
--**--**--
 exhilaration as that which had so recently taken possession of them.
 
 "Do you know," said Miriam confidentially to Hilda, "I doubt the reality
 of this likeness of Donatello to the Faun, which we have been talking so
 much about? To say the truth, it never struck me so forcibly as it did
 Kenyon and yourself, though I gave in to whatever you were pleased to
 fancy, for the sake of a moment's mirth and wonder." "I was certainly
 in earnest, and you seemed equally so," replied Hilda, glancing back
 at Donatello, as if to reassure herself of the resemblance. "But faces
 change so much, from hour to hour, that the same set of features has
 often no keeping with itself; to an eye, at least, which looks at
 expression more than outline. How sad and sombre he has grown all of a
 sudden!" "Angry too, methinks! nay, it is anger much more than sadness,"
 said Miriam. "I have seen Donatello in this mood once or twice before.
 If you consider him well, you will observe an odd mixture of
 the bulldog, or some other equally fierce brute, in our friend's
 composition; a trait of savageness hardly to be expected in such a
 gentle creature as he usually is. Donatello is a very strange young man.
 I wish he would not haunt my footsteps so continually."
 
 "You have bewitched the poor lad," said the sculptor, laughing. "You
 have a faculty of bewitching people, and it is providing you with a
 singular train of followers. I see another of them behind yonder pillar;
 and it is his presence that has aroused Donatello's wrath."
 
 They had now emerged from the gateway of the palace; and partly
 concealed by one of the pillars of the portico stood a figure such as
 may often be encountered in the streets and piazzas of Rome, and nowhere
--**--**--
 remarkable degree. He had sought her, followed her, and insisted, with
 simple perseverance, upon being admitted at least to her acquaintance; a
 boon which had been granted, when a more artful character, seeking it by
 a more subtle mode of pursuit, would probably have failed to obtain it.
 This young man, though anything but intellectually brilliant, had many
 agreeable characteristics which won him the kindly and half-contemptuous
 regard of Miriam and her two friends. It was he whom they called
 Donatello, and whose wonderful resemblance to the Faun of Praxiteles
 forms the keynote of our narrative.
 
 Such was the position in which we find Miriam some few months after her
 establishment at Rome. It must be added, however, that the world did not
 permit her to hide her antecedents without making her the subject of
 a good deal of conjecture; as was natural enough, considering the
 abundance of her personal charms, and the degree of notice that she
 attracted as an artist. There were many stories about Miriam's origin
 and previous life, some of which had a very probable air, while others
 were evidently wild and romantic fables. We cite a few, leaving the
 reader to designate them either under the probable or the romantic head.
 
 It was said, for example, that Miriam was the daughter and heiress of
 a great Jewish banker (an idea perhaps suggested by a certain rich
 Oriental character in her face), and had fled from her paternal home
 to escape a union with a cousin, the heir of another of that golden
 brotherhood; the object being to retain their vast accumulation of
 wealth within the family. Another story hinted that she was a German
 princess, whom, for reasons of state, it was proposed to give in
 marriage either to a decrepit sovereign, or a prince still in his
--**--**--
 "How dismal all this is!" said Hilda, shuddering. "I do not know why we
 came here, nor why we should stay a moment longer."
 
 "I hate it all!" cried Donatello with peculiar energy. "Dear friends,
 let us hasten back into the blessed daylight!"
 
 From the first, Donatello had shown little fancy for the expedition;
 for, like most Italians, and in especial accordance with the law of his
 own simple and physically happy nature, this young man had an infinite
 repugnance to graves and skulls, and to all that ghastliness which the
 Gothic mind loves to associate with the idea of death. He shuddered,
 and looked fearfully round, drawing nearer to Miriam, whose attractive
 influence alone had enticed him into that gloomy region.
 
 "What a child you are, poor Donatello!" she observed, with the freedom
 which she always used towards him. "You are afraid of ghosts!"
 
 "Yes, signorina; terribly afraid!" said the truthful Donatello.
 
 "I also believe in ghosts," answered Miriam, "and could tremble at them,
 in a suitable place. But these sepulchres are so old, and these skulls
 and white ashes so very dry, that methinks they have ceased to be
 haunted. The most awful idea connected with the catacombs is their
 interminable extent, and the possibility of going astray into this
 labyrinth of darkness, which broods around the little glimmer of our
 tapers."
 
 "Has any one ever been lost here?" asked Kenyon of the guide.
 
 "Surely, signor; one, no longer ago than my father's time," said the
 guide; and he added, with the air of a man who believed what he was
 telling, "but the first that went astray here was a pagan of old Rome,
 who hid himself in order to spy out and betray the blessed saints, who
 then dwelt and worshipped in these dismal places. You have heard the
--**--**--
 in this scene, telling it only on account of the trouble and strange
 entanglement which followed), they soon heard a responsive call, in a
 female voice.
 
 "It was the signorina!" cried Donatello joyfully.
 
 "Yes; it was certainly dear Miriam's voice," said Hilda. "And here she
 comes! Thank Heaven! Thank Heaven!"
 
 The figure of their friend was now discernible by her own torchlight,
 approaching out of one of the cavernous passages. Miriam came forward,
 but not with the eagerness and tremulous joy of a fearful girl, just
 rescued from a labyrinth of gloomy mystery. She made no immediate
 response to their inquiries and tumultuous congratulations; and, as they
 afterwards remembered, there was something absorbed, thoughtful, and
 self-concentrated in her deportment. She looked pale, as well she might,
 and held her torch with a nervous grasp, the tremor of which was seen
 in the irregular twinkling of the flame. This last was the chief
 perceptible sign of any recent agitation or alarm.
 
 "Dearest, dearest Miriam," exclaimed Hilda, throwing her arms about her
 friend, "where have you been straying from us? Blessed be Providence,
 which has rescued you out of that miserable darkness!"
 
 "Hush, dear Hilda!" whispered Miriam, with a strange little laugh. "Are
 you quite sure that it was Heaven's guidance which brought me back?
 If so, it was by an odd messenger, as you will confess. See; there he
 stands."
 
 Startled at Miriam's words and manner, Hilda gazed into the duskiness
 whither she pointed, and there beheld a figure standing just on the
 doubtful limit of obscurity, at the threshold of the small, illuminated
 chapel. Kenyon discerned him at the same instant, and drew nearer with
 his torch; although the guide attempted to dissuade him, averring that,
 once beyond the consecrated precincts of the chapel, the apparition
 would have power to tear him limb from limb. It struck the sculptor,
--**--**--
 on the sculptor's nerves, only that he was in the habit of observing
 similar figures, almost every day, reclining on the Spanish steps,
 and waiting for some artist to invite them within the magic realm of
 picture. Nor, even thus familiarized with the stranger's peculiarities
 of appearance, could Kenyon help wondering to see such a personage,
 shaping himself so suddenly out of the void darkness of the catacomb.
 
 "What are you?" said the sculptor, advancing his torch nearer. "And how
 long have you been wandering here?"
 
 "A thousand and five hundred years!" muttered the guide, loud enough to
 be heard by all the party. "It is the old pagan phantom that I told you
 of, who sought to betray the blessed saints!"
 
 "Yes; it is a phantom!" cried Donatello, with a shudder. "Ah, dearest
 signorina, what a fearful thing has beset you in those dark corridors!"
 
 "Nonsense, Donatello," said the sculptor. "The man is no more a phantom
 than yourself. The only marvel is, how he comes to be hiding himself in
 the catacomb. Possibly our guide might solve the riddle."
 
 The spectre himself here settled the point of his tangibility, at all
 events, and physical substance, by approaching a step nearer, and laying
 his hand on Kenyon's arm.
 
 "Inquire not what I am, nor wherefore I abide in the darkness," said he,
 in a hoarse, harsh voice, as if a great deal of damp were clustering in
 his throat. "Henceforth, I am nothing but a shadow behind her footsteps.
 She came to me when I sought her not. She has called me forth, and must
 abide the consequences of my reappearance in the world."
 
 "Holy Virgin! I wish the signorina joy of her prize," said the guide,
 half to himself. "And in any case, the catacomb is well rid of him."
--**--**--
 
 For example, with a strange air of seriousness over all her face, only
 belied by a laughing gleam in her dark eyes, she would aver that the
 spectre (who had been an artist in his mortal lifetime) had promised
 to teach her a long-lost, but invaluable secret of old Roman fresco
 painting. The knowledge of this process would place Miriam at the head
 of modern art; the sole condition being agreed upon, that she should
 return with him into his sightless gloom, after enriching a certain
 extent of stuccoed wall with the most brilliant and lovely designs. And
 what true votary of art would not purchase unrivalled excellence, even
 at so vast a sacrifice!
 
 Or, if her friends still solicited a soberer account, Miriam replied,
 that, meeting the old infidel in one of the dismal passages of the
 catacomb, she had entered into controversy with him, hoping to achieve
 the glory and satisfaction of converting him to the Christian faith. For
 the sake of so excellent a result; she had even staked her own salvation
 against his, binding herself to accompany him back into his penal gloom,
 if, within a twelvemonth's space, she should not have convinced him of
 the errors through which he had so long groped and stumbled. But, alas!
 up to the present time, the controversy had gone direfully in favor of
 the man-demon; and Miriam (as she whispered in Hilda's ear) had awful
 forebodings, that, in a few more months, she must take an eternal
 farewell of the sun!
 
 It was somewhat remarkable that all her romantic fantasies arrived at
 this self-same dreary termination,--it appeared impossible for her even
 to imagine any other than a disastrous result from her connection with
 her ill-omened attendant.
 
 This singularity might have meant nothing, however, had it not suggested
--**--**--
 You might hear just those tinkling sounds from any tiny waterfall in the
 forest, though here they gain a delicious pathos from the stately
 echoes that reverberate their natural language. So the fountain is not
 altogether glad, after all its three centuries at play!
 
 In one of the angles of the courtyard, a pillared doorway gives access
 to the staircase, with its spacious breadth of low marble steps, up
 which, in former times, have gone the princes and cardinals of the great
 Roman family who built this palace. Or they have come down, with still
 grander and loftier mien, on their way to the Vatican or the Quirinal,
 there to put off their scarlet hats in exchange for the triple crown.
 But, in fine, all these illustrious personages have gone down
 their hereditary staircase for the last time, leaving it to be the
 thoroughfare of ambassadors, English noblemen, American millionnaires,
 artists, tradesmen, washerwomen, and people of every degree,--all of
 whom find such gilded and marble-panelled saloons as their pomp and
 luxury demand, or such homely garrets as their necessity can pay for,
 within this one multifarious abode. Only, in not a single nook of the
 palace (built for splendor, and the accommodation of a vast retinue, but
 with no vision of a happy fireside or any mode of domestic enjoyment)
 does the humblest or the haughtiest occupant find comfort.
 
 Up such a staircase, on the morning after the scene at the sculpture
 gallery, sprang the light foot of Donatello. He ascended from story
 to story, passing lofty doorways, set within rich frames of sculptured
 marble, and climbing unweariedly upward, until the glories of the first
 piano and the elegance of the middle height were exchanged for a sort of
 Alpine region, cold and naked in its aspect. Steps of rough stone, rude
--**--**--
 
 The room had the customary aspect of a painter's studio; one of those
 delightful spots that hardly seem to belong to the actual world, but
 rather to be the outward type of a poet's haunted imagination, where
 there are glimpses, sketches, and half-developed hints of beings and
 objects grander and more beautiful than we can anywhere find in reality.
 The windows were closed with shutters, or deeply curtained, except one,
 which was partly open to a sunless portion of the sky, admitting only
 from high upward that partial light which, with its strongly marked
 contrast of shadow, is the first requisite towards seeing objects
 pictorially. Pencil-drawings were pinned against the wall or scattered
 on the tables. Unframed canvases turned their backs on the spectator,
 presenting only a blank to the eye, and churlishly concealing whatever
 riches of scenery or human beauty Miriam's skill had depicted on the
 other side.
 
 In the obscurest part of the room Donatello was half startled at
 perceiving duskily a woman with long dark hair, who threw up her arms
 with a wild gesture of tragic despair, and appeared to beckon him into
 the darkness along with her.
 
 "Do not be afraid, Donatello," said Miriam, smiling to see him peering
 doubtfully into the mysterious dusk. "She means you no mischief, nor
 could perpetrate any if she wished it ever so much. It is a lady of
 exceedingly pliable disposition; now a heroine of romance, and now a
 rustic maid; yet all for show; being created, indeed, on purpose to wear
 rich shawls and other garments in a becoming fashion. This is the true
 end of her being, although she pretends to assume the most varied duties
 and perform many parts in life, while really the poor puppet has nothing
 on earth to do. Upon my word, I am satirical unawares, and seem to be
--**--**--
 look over some of these sketches till I have leisure to chat with you
 a little. I hardly think I am in spirits enough to begin your portrait
 to-day."
 
 Donatello was as gentle and docile as a pet spaniel; as playful, too, in
 his general disposition, or saddening with his mistress's variable mood
 like that or any other kindly animal which has the faculty of
 bestowing its sympathies more completely than men or women can ever do.
 Accordingly, as Miriam bade him, he tried to turn his attention to a
 great pile and confusion of pen and ink sketches and pencil drawings
 which lay tossed together on a table. As it chanced, however, they gave
 the poor youth little delight.
 
 The first that he took up was a very impressive sketch, in which the
 artist had jotted down her rough ideas for a picture of Jael driving the
 nail through the temples of Sisera. It was dashed off with remarkable
 power, and showed a touch or two that were actually lifelike and
 deathlike, as if Miriam had been standing by when Jael gave the first
 stroke of her murderous hammer, or as if she herself were Jael, and felt
 irresistibly impelled to make her bloody confession in this guise.
 
 Her first conception of the stern Jewess had evidently been that of
 perfect womanhood, a lovely form, and a high, heroic face of lofty
 beauty; but, dissatisfied either with her own work or the terrible story
 itself, Miriam had added a certain wayward quirk of her pencil, which at
 once converted the heroine into a vulgar murderess. It was evident that
 a Jael like this would be sure to search Sisera's pockets as soon as the
 breath was out of his body.
 
 In another sketch she had attempted the story of Judith, which we see
--**--**--
 said Donatello rather doubtfully. "Not much, I fear," responded she,
 laughing. "And what should a boy like you--a Faun too,--know about the
 joys and sorrows, the intertwining light and shadow, of human life? I
 forgot that you were a Faun. You cannot suffer deeply; therefore you
 can but half enjoy. Here, now, is a subject which you can better
 appreciate."
 
 The sketch represented merely a rustic dance, but with such extravagance
 of fun as was delightful to behold; and here there was no drawback,
 except that strange sigh and sadness which always come when we are
 merriest.
 
 "I am going to paint the picture in oils," said the artist; "and I want
 you, Donatello, for the wildest dancer of them all. Will you sit for me,
 some day?--or, rather, dance for me?"
 
 "O, most gladly, signorina!" exclaimed Donatello. "See; it shall be like
 this."
 
 And forthwith he began to dance, and flit about the studio, like an
 incarnate sprite of jollity, pausing at last on the extremity of one
 toe, as if that were the only portion of himself whereby his frisky
 nature could come in contact with the earth. The effect in that shadowy
 chamber, whence the artist had so carefully excluded the sunshine, was
 as enlivening as if one bright ray had contrived to shimmer in and
 frolic around the walls, and finally rest just in the centre of the
 floor.
 
 "That was admirable!" said Miriam, with an approving smile. "If I can
 catch you on my canvas, it will be a glorious picture; only I am afraid
 you will dance out of it, by the very truth of the representation, just
 when I shall have given it the last touch. We will try it one of these
 days. And now, to reward you for that jolly exhibition, you shall see
--**--**--
 the image that you made there! It is yourself!"
 
 Donatello said the truth; and we forebore to speak descriptively of
 Miriam's beauty earlier in our narrative, because we foresaw this
 occasion to bring it perhaps more forcibly before the reader.
 
 We know not whether the portrait were a flattered likeness; probably
 not, regarding it merely as the delineation of a lovely face; although
 Miriam, like all self-painters, may have endowed herself with certain
 graces which Other eyes might not discern. Artists are fond of painting
 their own portraits; and, in Florence, there is a gallery of hundreds
 of them, including the most illustrious, in all of which there are
 autobiographical characteristics, so to speak,--traits, expressions,
 loftinesses, and amenities, which would have been invisible, had they
 not been painted from within. Yet their reality and truth are none
 the less. Miriam, in like manner, had doubtless conveyed some of the
 intimate results of her heart knowledge into her own portrait, and
 perhaps wished to try whether they would be perceptible to so simple and
 natural an observer as Donatello.
 
 "Does the expression please you?" she asked.
 
 "Yes," said Donatello hesitatingly; "if it would only smile so like the
 sunshine as you sometimes do. No, it is sadder than I thought at first.
 Cannot you make yourself smile a little, signorina?"
 
 "A forced smile is uglier than a frown," said Miriam, a bright, natural
 smile breaking out over her face even as she spoke.
 
 "O, catch it now!" cried Donatello, clapping his hands. "Let it shine
 upon the picture! There! it has vanished already! And you are sad again,
 very sad; and the picture gazes sadly forth at me, as if some evil had
 befallen it in the little time since I looked last."
 
 "How perplexed you seem, my friend!" answered Miriam. "I really half
--**--**--
 still; and now, glancing through the successive windows that threw in
 their narrow light upon the stairs, her view stretched across the roofs
 of the city, unimpeded even by the stateliest palaces. Only the domes of
 churches ascend into this airy region, and hold up their golden crosses
 on a level with her eye; except that, out of the very heart of Rome,
 the column of Antoninus thrusts itself upward, with St. Paul upon its
 summit, the sole human form that seems to have kept her company.
 
 Finally, the staircase came to an end; save that, on one side of the
 little entry where it terminated, a flight of a dozen steps gave access
 to the roof of the tower and the legendary shrine. On the other side was
 a door, at which Miriam knocked, but rather as a friendly announcement
 of her presence than with any doubt of hospitable welcome; for, awaiting
 no response, she lifted the latch and entered.
 
 "What a hermitage you have found for yourself, dear Hilda!" she,
 exclaimed. "You breathe sweet air, above all the evil scents of Rome;
 and even so, in your maiden elevation, you dwell above our vanities and
 passions, our moral dust and mud, with the doves and the angels for your
 nearest neighbors. I should not wonder if the Catholics were to make a
 saint of you, like your namesake of old; especially as you have almost
 avowed yourself of their religion, by undertaking to keep the lamp
 alight before the Virgin's shrine."
 
 "No, no, Miriam!" said Hilda, who had come joyfully forward to greet
 her friend. "You must not call me a Catholic. A Christian girl--even
 a daughter of the Puritans--may surely pay honor to the idea of divine
 Womanhood, without giving up the faith of her forefathers. But how kind
--**--**--
 we hope, is destined to extend its rich length through many future
 centuries. An orphan, however, without near relatives, and possessed of
 a little property, she had found it within her possibilities to come
 to Italy; that central clime, whither the eyes and the heart of every
 artist turn, as if pictures could not be made to glow in any other
 atmosphere, as if statues could not assume grace and expression, save in
 that land of whitest marble.
 
 Hilda's gentle courage had brought her safely over land and sea; her
 mild, unflagging perseverance had made a place for her in the famous
 city, even like a flower that finds a chink for itself, and a little
 earth to grow in, on whatever ancient wall its slender roots may fasten.
 Here she dwelt, in her tower, possessing a friend or two in Rome, but
 no home companion except the flock of doves, whose cote was in a ruinous
 chamber contiguous to her own. They soon became as familiar with the
 fair-haired Saxon girl as if she were a born sister of their brood; and
 her customary white robe bore such an analogy to their snowy plumage
 that the confraternity of artists called Hilda the Dove, and recognized
 her aerial apartment as the Dovecote. And while the other doves flew far
 and wide in quest of what was good for them, Hilda likewise spread
 her wings, and sought such ethereal and imaginative sustenance as God
 ordains for creatures of her kind.
 
 We know not whether the result of her Italian studies, so far as it
 could yet be seen, will be accepted as a good or desirable one. Certain
 it is, that since her arrival in the pictorial land, Hilda seemed to
 have entirely lost the impulse of original design, which brought her
--**--**--
 had achieved, the world seemed already rich enough in original designs,
 and nothing more was so desirable as to diffuse those self-same beauties
 more widely among mankind. All the youthful hopes and ambitions, the
 fanciful ideas which she had brought from home, of great pictures to be
 conceived in her feminine mind, were flung aside, and, so far as those
 most intimate with her could discern, relinquished without a sigh. All
 that she would henceforth attempt and that most reverently, not to say
 religiously was to catch and reflect some of the glory which had been
 shed upon canvas from the immortal pencils of old.
 
 So Hilda became a copyist: in the Pinacotheca of the Vatican, in the
 galleries of the Pam-fili-Doria palace, the Borghese, the Corsini, the
 Sciarra, her easel was set up before many a famous picture by Guido,
 Domenichino, Raphael, and the devout painters of earlier schools than
 these. Other artists and visitors from foreign lands beheld the slender,
 girlish figure in front of some world-known work, absorbed, unconscious
 of everything around her, seeming to live only in what she sought to do.
 They smiled, no doubt, at the audacity which led her to dream of
 copying those mighty achievements. But, if they paused to look over her
 shoulder, and had sensibility enough to understand what was before their
 eyes, they soon felt inclined to believe that the spirits of the old
 masters were hovering over Hilda, and guiding her delicate white hand.
 In truth, from whatever realm of bliss and many colored beauty those
 spirits might descend, it would have been no unworthy errand to help so
 gentle and pure a worshipper of their genius in giving the last divine
 touch to her repetitions of their works.
 
 Her copies were indeed marvellous. Accuracy was not the phrase for them;
--**--**--
 fancies of snow and moonlight; the counterpart in picture of so many
 feminine achievements in literature!
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER VII
 
 
 BEATRICE
 
 
 Miriam was glad to find the Dove in her turret-home; for being endowed
 with an infinite activity, and taking exquisite delight in the sweet
 labor of which her life was full, it was Hilda's practice to flee abroad
 betimes, and haunt the galleries till dusk. Happy were those (but they
 were very few) whom she ever chose to be the companions of her day; they
 saw the art treasures of Rome, under her guidance, as they had never
 seen them before. Not that Hilda could dissertate, or talk learnedly
 about pictures; she would probably have been puzzled by the technical
 terms of her own art. Not that she had much to say about what she most
 profoundly admired; but even her silent sympathy was so powerful that
 it drew your own along with it, endowing you with a second-sight that
 enabled you to see excellences with almost the depth and delicacy of her
 own perceptions.
 
 All the Anglo-Saxon denizens of Rome, by this time, knew Hilda by sight.
 Unconsciously, the poor child had become one of the spectacles of the
 Eternal City, and was often pointed out to strangers, sitting at her
 easel among the wild-bearded young men, the white-haired old ones, and
 the shabbily dressed, painfully plain women, who make up the throng of
 copyists. The old custodes knew her well, and watched over her as their
 own child. Sometimes a young artist, instead of going on with a copy
 of the picture before which he had placed his easel, would enrich
 his canvas with an original portrait of Hilda at her work. A lovelier
 subject could not have been selected, nor one which required nicer skill
 and insight in doing it anything like justice. She was pretty at all
--**--**--
 brighten it into joyousness. But, in fact, it was the very saddest
 picture ever painted or conceived; it involved an unfathomable depth of
 sorrow, the sense of which came to the observer by a sort of intuition.
 It was a sorrow that removed this beautiful girl out of the sphere
 of humanity, and set her in a far-off region, the remoteness of
 which--while yet her face is so close before us--makes us shiver as at a
 spectre.
 
 "Yes, Hilda," said her friend, after closely examining the picture,
 "you have done nothing else so wonderful as this. But by what unheard-of
 solicitations or secret interest have you obtained leave to copy Guido's
 Beatrice Cenci? It is an unexampled favor; and the impossibility
 of getting a genuine copy has filled the Roman picture shops with
 Beatrices, gay, grievous, or coquettish, but never a true one among
 them."
 
 "There has been one exquisite copy, I have heard," said Hilda, "by
 an artist capable of appreciating the spirit of the picture. It was
 Thompson, who brought it away piecemeal, being forbidden (like the
 rest of us) to set up his easel before it. As for me, I knew the Prince
 Barberini would be deaf to all entreaties; so I had no resource but
 to sit down before the picture, day after day, and let it sink into my
 heart. I do believe it is now photographed there. It is a sad face to
 keep so close to one's heart; only what is so very beautiful can never
 be quite a pain. Well; after studying it in this way, I know not how
 many times, I came home, and have done my best to transfer the image to
 canvas."
 
 "Here it is, then," said Miriam, contemplating Hilda's work with great
 interest and delight, mixed with the painful sympathy that the picture
--**--**--
 sure of sympathy. It irks my brain and heart to think of her, all shut
 up within herself." She withdrew the cloth that Hilda had drawn over the
 picture, and took another long look at it. "Poor sister Beatrice! for
 she was still a woman, Hilda, still a sister, be her sin or sorrow what
 they might. How well you have done it, Hilda! I knot not whether Guido
 will thank you, or be jealous of your rivalship."
 
 "Jealous, indeed!" exclaimed Hilda. "If Guido had not wrought through
 me, my pains would have been thrown away."
 
 "After all," resumed Miriam, "if a woman had painted the original
 picture, there might have been something in it which we miss now. I
 have a great mind to undertake a copy myself; and try to give it what
 it lacks. Well; goodby. But, stay! I am going for a little airing to
 the grounds of the Villa Borghese this afternoon. You will think it very
 foolish, but I always feel the safer in your company, Hilda, slender
 little maiden as you are. Will you come?"
 
 "Ah, not to-day, dearest Miriam," she replied; "I have set my heart on
 giving another touch or two to this picture, and shall not stir abroad
 till nearly sunset."
 
 "Farewell, then," said her visitor. "I leave you in your dove-cote. What
 a sweet, strange life you lead here; conversing with the souls of the
 old masters, feeding and fondling your sister doves, and trimming the
 Virgin's lamp! Hilda, do you ever pray to the Virgin while you tend her
 shrine?"
 
 "Sometimes I have been moved to do so," replied the Dove, blushing,
 and lowering her eyes; "she was a woman once. Do you think it would be
 wrong?"
 
 "Nay, that is for you to judge," said Miriam; "but when you pray next,
--**--**--
 hide and half reveal themselves, high on pedestals, or perhaps fallen
 and broken on the turf. Terminal figures, columns of marble or granite
 porticos, arches, are seen in the vistas of the wood-paths, either
 veritable relics of antiquity, or with so exquisite a touch of artful
 ruin on them that they are better than if really antique. At all events,
 grass grows on the tops of the shattered pillars, and weeds and flowers
 root themselves in the chinks of the massive arches and fronts of
 temples, and clamber at large over their pediments, as if this were the
 thousandth summer since their winged seeds alighted there.
 
 What a strange idea--what a needless labor--to construct artificial
 ruins in Rome, the native soil of ruin! But even these sportive
 imitations, wrought by man in emulation of what time has done to temples
 and palaces, are perhaps centuries old, and, beginning as illusions,
 have grown to be venerable in sober earnest. The result of all is a
 scene, pensive, lovely, dreamlike, enjoyable and sad, such as is to
 be found nowhere save in these princely villa-residences in the
 neighborhood of Rome; a scene that must have required generations and
 ages, during which growth, decay, and man's intelligence wrought kindly
 together, to render it so gently wild as we behold it now.
 
 The final charm is bestowed by the malaria. There is a piercing,
 thrilling, delicious kind of regret in the idea of so much beauty thrown
 away, or only enjoyable at its half-development, in winter and early
 spring, and never to be dwelt amongst, as the home scenery of any human
 being. For if you come hither in summer, and stray through these glades
 in the golden sunset, fever walks arm in arm with you, and death awaits
 you at the end of the dim vista. Thus the scene is like Eden in its
--**--**--
 seldom Donatello's impulse to express himself copiously in words. His
 usual modes of demonstration were by the natural language of gesture,
 the instinctive movement of his agile frame, and the unconscious play
 of his features, which, within a limited range of thought and emotion,
 would speak volumes in a moment.
 
 By and by, his own mood seemed to brighten Miriam's, and was reflected
 back upon himself. He began inevitably, as it were, to dance along
 the wood-path; flinging himself into attitudes of strange comic grace.
 Often, too, he ran a little way in advance of his companion, and then
 stood to watch her as she approached along the shadowy and sun-fleckered
 path. With every step she took, he expressed his joy at her nearer
 and nearer presence by what might be thought an extravagance of
 gesticulation, but which doubtless was the language of the natural man,
 though laid aside and forgotten by other men, now that words have been
 feebly substituted in the place of signs and symbols. He gave Miriam the
 idea of a being not precisely man, nor yet a child, but, in a high and
 beautiful sense, an animal, a creature in a state of development less
 than what mankind has attained, yet the more perfect within itself
 for that very deficiency. This idea filled her mobile imagination with
 agreeable fantasies, which, after smiling at them herself, she tried to
 convey to the young man.
 
 "What are you, my friend?" she exclaimed, always keeping in mind his
 singular resemblance to the Faun of the Capitol. "If you are, in good
 truth, that wild and pleasant creature whose face you wear, pray make me
 known to your kindred. They will be found hereabouts, if anywhere. Knock
 at the rough rind of this ilex-tree, and summon forth the Dryad! Ask the
--**--**--
 "You are yourself, and I am Donatello," replied he. "Therefore I love
 you! There needs no other reason."
 
 Certainly, there was no better or more explicable reason. It might
 have been imagined that Donatello's unsophisticated heart would be more
 readily attracted to a feminine nature of clear simplicity like his own,
 than to one already turbid with grief or wrong, as Miriam's seemed to
 be. Perhaps, On the other hand, his character needed the dark element,
 which it found in her. The force and energy of will, that sometimes
 flashed through her eyes, may have taken him captive; or, not
 improbably, the varying lights and shadows of her temper, now so
 mirthful, and anon so sad with mysterious gloom, had bewitched the
 youth. Analyze the matter as we may, the reason assigned by Donatello
 himself was as satisfactory as we are likely to attain.
 
 Miriam could not think seriously of the avowal that had passed. He held
 out his love so freely, in his open palm, that she felt it could be
 nothing but a toy, which she might play with for an instant, and give
 back again. And yet Donatello's heart was so fresh a fountain, that,
 had Miriam been more world-worn than she was, she might have found
 it exquisite to slake her thirst with the feelings that welled up and
 brimmed over from it. She was far, very far, from the dusty mediaeval
 epoch, when some women have a taste for such refreshment. Even for
 her, however, there was an inexpressible charm in the simplicity that
 prompted Donatello's words and deeds; though, unless she caught them
 in precisely the true light, they seemed but folly, the offspring of
 a maimed or imperfectly developed intellect. Alternately, she almost
 admired, or wholly scorned him, and knew not which estimate resulted
--**--**--
 him through many summers.
 
 "How close he stands to nature!" said Miriam, observing this pleasant
 familiarity between her companion and the bird. "He shall make me as
 natural as himself for this one hour."
 
 As they strayed through that sweet wilderness, she felt more and more
 the influence of his elastic temperament. Miriam was an impressible
 and impulsive creature, as unlike herself, in different moods, as if a
 melancholy maiden and a glad one were both bound within the girdle about
 her waist, and kept in magic thraldom by the brooch that clasped it.
 Naturally, it is true, she was the more inclined to melancholy,
 yet fully capable of that high frolic of the spirits which richly
 compensates for many gloomy hours; if her soul was apt to lurk in the
 darkness of a cavern, she could sport madly in the sunshine before
 the cavern's mouth. Except the freshest mirth of animal spirits, like
 Donatello's, there is no merriment, no wild exhilaration, comparable to
 that of melancholy people escaping from the dark region in which it is
 their custom to keep themselves imprisoned.
 
 So the shadowy Miriam almost outdid Donatello on his own ground. They
 ran races with each other, side by side, with shouts and laughter; they
 pelted one another with early flowers, and gathering them up twined
 them with green leaves into garlands for both their heads. They played
 together like children, or creatures of immortal youth. So much had they
 flung aside the sombre habitudes of daily life, that they seemed born
 to be sportive forever, and endowed with eternal mirthfulness instead
 of any deeper joy. It was a glimpse far backward into Arcadian life, or,
 further still, into the Golden Age, before mankind was burdened with
 sin and sorrow, and before pleasure had been darkened with those shadows
--**--**--
 away the sportive companion whom he had waited for through so many
 dreary months.
 
 "Dance! dance!" cried he joyously. "If we take breath, we shall be as
 we were yesterday. There, now, is the music, just beyond this clump of
 trees. Dance, Miriam, dance!"
 
 They had now reached an open, grassy glade (of which there are many in
 that artfully constructed wilderness), set round with stone seats,
 on which the aged moss had kindly essayed to spread itself instead of
 cushions. On one of the stone benches sat the musicians, whose strains
 had enticed our wild couple thitherward. They proved to be a vagrant
 band, such as Rome, and all Italy, abounds with; comprising a harp,
 a flute, and a violin, which, though greatly the worse for wear,
 the performers had skill enough to provoke and modulate into tolerable
 harmony. It chanced to be a feast-day; and, instead of playing in
 the sun-scorched piazzas of the city, or beneath the windows of some
 unresponsive palace, they had bethought themselves to try the echoes
 of these woods; for, on the festas of the Church, Rome scatters its
 merrymakers all abroad, ripe for the dance or any other pastime.
 
 As Miriam and Donatello emerged from among the trees, the musicians
 scraped, tinkled, or blew, each according to his various kind of
 instrument, more inspiringly than ever. A darkchecked little girl,
 with bright black eyes, stood by, shaking a tambourine set round
 with tinkling bells, and thumping it on its parchment head. Without
 interrupting his brisk, though measured movement, Donatello snatched
 away this unmelodious contrivance, and, flourishing it above his head,
 produced music of indescribable potency, still dancing with frisky step,
 and striking the tambourine, and ringing its little bells, all in one
 jovial act.
 
 It might be that there was magic in the sound, or contagion, at least,
--**--**--
 them too closely, or some intruder had cast a shadow on their mirth,
 the sylvan pageant had utterly disappeared. If a few of the merry-makers
 lingered among the trees, they had hidden their racy peculiarities under
 the garb and aspect of ordinary people, and sheltered themselves in the
 weary commonplace of daily life. Just an instant before it was Arcadia
 and the Golden Age. The spell being broken, it was now only that old
 tract of pleasure ground, close by the people's gate of Rome,--a
 tract where the crimes and calamities of ages, the many battles, blood
 recklessly poured out, and deaths of myriads, have corrupted all the
 soil, creating an influence that makes the air deadly to human lungs.
 
 "You must leave me," said Miriam to Donatello more imperatively than
 before; "have I not said it? Go; and look not behind you."
 
 "Miriam," whispered Donatello, grasping her hand forcibly, "who is it
 that stands in the shadow yonder, beckoning you to follow him?"
 
 "Hush; leave me!" repeated Miriam. "Your hour is past; his hour has
 come."
 
 Donatello still gazed in the direction which he had indicated, and
 the expression of his face was fearfully changed, being so disordered,
 perhaps with terror,--at all events with anger and invincible
 repugnance,--that Miriam hardly knew him. His lips were drawn apart so
 as to disclose his set teeth, thus giving him a look of animal rage,
 which we seldom see except in persons of the simplest and rudest
 natures. A shudder seemed to pass through his very bones.
 
 "I hate him!" muttered he.
 
 "Be satisfied; I hate him too!" said Miriam.
 
 She had no thought of making this avowal, but was irresistibly drawn to
 it by the sympathy of the dark emotion in her own breast with that so
 strongly expressed by Donatello. Two drops of water or of blood do not
--**--**--
 Yet, let us trust, there may have been no crime in Miriam, but only
 one of those fatalities which are among the most insoluble riddles
 propounded to mortal comprehension; the fatal decree by which every
 crime is made to be the agony of many innocent persons, as well as of
 the single guilty one.
 
 It was, at any rate, but a feeble and despairing kind of remonstrance
 which she had now the energy to oppose against his persecution.
 
 "You follow me too closely," she said, in low, faltering accents; "you
 allow me too scanty room to draw my breath. Do you know what will be the
 end of this?" "I know well what must be the end," he replied.
 
 "Tell me, then," said Miriam, "that I may compare your foreboding with
 my own. Mine is a very dark one."
 
 "There can be but one result, and that soon," answered the model. "You
 must throw off your present mask and assume another. You must vanish out
 of the scene: quit Rome with me, and leave no trace whereby to follow
 you. It is in my power, as you well know, to compel your acquiescence in
 my bidding. You are aware of the penalty of a refusal."
 
 "Not that penalty with which you would terrify me," said Miriam;
 "another there may be, but not so grievous." "What is that other?"
 he inquired. "Death! simply death!" she answered. "Death," said her
 persecutor, "is not so simple and opportune a thing as you imagine. You
 are strong and warm with life. Sensitive and irritable as your spirit
 is, these many months of trouble, this latter thraldom in which I hold
 you, have scarcely made your cheek paler than I saw it in your girlhood.
 Miriam,--for I forbear to speak another name, at which these leaves
--**--**--
 lay within her knowledge. But, alas! such was her evil fortune, that,
 whether mad or no, his power over her remained the same, and was likely
 to be used only the more tyrannously, if exercised by a lunatic.
 
 "I would not give you pain," she said, soothingly; "your faith allows you
 the consolations of penance and absolution. Try what help there may be
 in these, and leave me to myself."
 
 "Do not think it, Miriam," said he; "we are bound together, and can
 never part again." "Why should it seem so impossible?" she rejoined.
 "Think how I had escaped from all the past! I had made for myself a
 new sphere, and found new friends, new occupations, new hopes and
 enjoyments. My heart, methinks, was almost as unburdened as if there had
 been no miserable life behind me. The human spirit does not perish of a
 single wound, nor exhaust itself in a single trial of life. Let us
 but keep asunder, and all may go well for both." "We fancied ourselves
 forever sundered," he replied. "Yet we met once, in the bowels of the
 earth; and, were we to part now, our fates would fling us together again
 in a desert, on a mountain-top, or in whatever spot seemed safest. You
 speak in vain, therefore."
 
 "You mistake your own will for an iron necessity," said Miriam;
 "otherwise, you might have suffered me to glide past you like a ghost,
 when we met among those ghosts of ancient days. Even now you might bid
 me pass as freely."
 
 "Never!" said he, with unmitigable will; "your reappearance has
 destroyed the work of years. You know the power that I have over you.
 Obey my bidding; or, within a short time, it shall be exercised: nor
 will I cease to haunt you till the moment comes."
--**--**--
 Hilda, after giving the last touches to the picture of Beatrice Cenci,
 had flown down from her dove-cote, late in the afternoon, and gone to
 the Pincian Hill, in the hope of hearing a strain or two of exhilarating
 music. There, as it happened, she met the sculptor, for, to say the
 truth, Kenyon had well noted the fair artist's ordinary way of life,
 and was accustomed to shape his own movements so as to bring him often
 within her sphere.
 
 The Pincian Hill is the favorite promenade of the Roman aristocracy. At
 the present day, however, like most other Roman possessions, it belongs
 less to the native inhabitants than to the barbarians from Gaul, Great
 Britain, anti beyond the sea, who have established a peaceful usurpation
 over whatever is enjoyable or memorable in the Eternal City. These
 foreign guests are indeed ungrateful, if they do not breathe a prayer
 for Pope Clement, or whatever Holy Father it may have been, who levelled
 the summit of the mount so skilfully, and bounded it with the parapet of
 the city wall; who laid out those broad walks and drives, and overhung
 them with the deepening shade of many kinds of tree; who scattered the
 flowers, of all seasons and of every clime, abundantly over those green,
 central lawns; who scooped out hollows in fit places, and, setting great
 basins of marble in them, caused ever-gushing fountains to fill them to
 the brim; who reared up the immemorial obelisk out of the soil that had
 long hidden it; who placed pedestals along the borders of the avenues,
 and crowned them with busts of that multitude of worthies--statesmen,
 heroes, artists, men of letters and of song--whom the whole world claims
 as its chief ornaments, though Italy produced them all. In a word, the
--**--**--
 merriment, which we have already attempted to describe. By and by it
 ceased--although the two listeners still tried to distinguish it between
 the bursts of nearer music from the military band. But there was no
 renewal of that distant mirth. Soon afterwards they saw a solitary
 figure advancing along one of the paths that lead from the obscurer part
 of the ground towards the gateway.
 
 "Look! is it not Donatello?" said Hilda.
 
 "He it is, beyond a doubt," replied the sculptor. "But how gravely he
 walks, and with what long looks behind him! He seems either very weary,
 or very sad. I should not hesitate to call it sadness, if Donatello were
 a creature capable of the sin and folly of low spirits. In all these
 hundred paces, while we have been watching him, he has not made one
 of those little caprioles in the air which are characteristic of his
 natural gait. I begin to doubt whether he is a veritable Faun."
 
 "Then," said Hilda, with perfect simplicity, "you have thought him--and
 do think him--one of that strange, wild, happy race of creatures, that
 used to laugh and sport in the woods, in the old, old times? So do
 I, indeed! But I never quite believed, till now, that fauns existed
 anywhere but in poetry."
 
 The sculptor at first merely smiled. Then, as the idea took further
 possession of his mind, he laughed outright, and wished from the bottom
 of his heart (being in love with Hilda, though he had never told her
 so) that he could have rewarded or punished her for its pretty absurdity
 with a kiss.
 
 "O Hilda, what a treasure of sweet faith and pure imagination you hide
 under that little straw hat!" cried he, at length. "A Faun! a Faun!
 Great Pan is not dead, then, after all! The whole tribe of mythical
--**--**--
 It is the surest test of genuine love, that it brings back our early
 simplicity to the worldliest of us."
 
 Thus talking, they loitered slowly along beside the parapet which
 borders the level summit of the Pincian with its irregular sweep. At
 intervals they looked through the lattice-work of their thoughts at the
 varied prospects that lay before and beneath them.
 
 From the terrace where they now stood there is an abrupt descent towards
 the Piazza del Popolo; and looking down into its broad space they
 beheld the tall palatial edifices, the church domes, and the ornamented
 gateway, which grew and were consolidated out of the thought of Michael
 Angelo. They saw, too, the red granite obelisk, oldest of things,
 even in Rome, which rises in the centre of the piazza, with a fourfold
 fountain at its base. All Roman works and ruins (whether of the
 empire, the far-off republic, or the still more distant kings) assume a
 transient, visionary, and impalpable character when we think that this
 indestructible monument supplied one of the recollections which Moses
 and the Israelites bore from Egypt into the desert. Perchance, on
 beholding the cloudy pillar and the fiery column, they whispered
 awestricken to one another, "In its shape it is like that old obelisk
 which we and our fathers have so often seen on the borders of the Nile."
 And now that very obelisk, with hardly a trace of decay upon it, is the
 first thing that the modern traveller sees after entering the Flaminian
 Gate!
 
 Lifting their eyes, Hilda and her companion gazed westward, and saw
 beyond the invisible Tiber the Castle of St. Angelo; that immense tomb
 of a pagan emperor, with the archangel at its summit.
 
 Still farther off appeared a mighty pile of buildings, surmounted by the
 vast dome, which all of us have shaped and swelled outward, like a huge
--**--**--
 observers, if any there were, she probably appeared to take this
 attitude merely for the convenience of dipping her fingers into the gush
 of water from the mouth of one of the stone lions. But as she clasped
 her hands together after thus bathing them, and glanced upward at the
 model, an idea took strong possession of Kenyon's mind that Miriam was
 kneeling to this dark follower there in the world's face!
 
 "Do you see it?" he said to Hilda.
 
 "See what?" asked she, surprised at the emotion of his tone. "I see
 Miriam, who has just bathed her hands in that delightfully cool water. I
 often dip my fingers into a Roman fountain, and think of the brook that
 used to be one of my playmates in my New England village."
 
 "I fancied I saw something else," said Kenyon; "but it was doubtless a
 mistake."
 
 But, allowing that he had caught a true glimpse into the hidden
 significance of Miriam's gesture, what a terrible thraldom did it
 suggest! Free as she seemed to be,--beggar as he looked,--the nameless
 vagrant must then be dragging the beautiful Miriam through the streets
 of Rome, fettered and shackled more cruelly than any captive queen of
 yore following in an emperor's triumph. And was it conceivable that
 she would have been thus enthralled unless some great error--how great
 Kenyon dared not think--or some fatal weakness had given this dark
 adversary a vantage ground?
 
 "Hilda," said he abruptly, "who and what is Miriam? Pardon me; but are
 you sure of her?"
 
 "Sure of her!" repeated Hilda, with an angry blush, for her friend's
 sake. "I am sure that she is kind, good, and generous; a true and
 faithful friend, whom I love dearly, and who loves me as well! What more
 than this need I be sure of?"
--**--**--
 indestructible bricks of imperial Rome; for the ruins of the Coliseum,
 the Golden House, and innumerable temples of Roman gods, and mansions of
 Caesars and senators, had supplied the material for all those gigantic
 hovels, and their walls were cemented with mortar of inestimable cost,
 being made of precious antique statues, burnt long ago for this petty
 purpose.
 
 Rome, as it now exists, has grown up under the Popes, and seems like
 nothing but a heap of broken rubbish, thrown into the great chasm
 between our own days and the Empire, merely to fill it up; and, for the
 better part of two thousand years, its annals of obscure policies,
 and wars, and continually recurring misfortunes, seem also but broken
 rubbish, as compared with its classic history.
 
 If we consider the present city as at all connected with the famous one
 of old, it is only because we find it built over its grave. A depth of
 thirty feet of soil has covered up the Rome of ancient days, so that it
 lies like the dead corpse of a giant, decaying for centuries, with no
 survivor mighty enough even to bury it, until the dust of all those
 years has gathered slowly over its recumbent form and made a casual
 sepulchre.
 
 We know not how to characterize, in any accordant and compatible
 terms, the Rome that lies before us; its sunless alleys, and streets
 of palaces; its churches, lined with the gorgeous marbles that were
 originally polished for the adornment of pagan temples; its thousands of
 evil smells, mixed up with fragrance of rich incense, diffused from as
 many censers; its little life, deriving feeble nutriment from what
 has long been dead. Everywhere, some fragment of ruin suggesting the
 magnificence of a former epoch; everywhere, moreover, a Cross,--and
 nastiness at the foot of it. As the sum of all, there are recollections
--**--**--
 misfortune, crime, or peculiarity of character, that puts an individual
 ajar with the world. Very often, as in Miriam's case, there is an
 insatiable instinct that demands friendship, love, and intimate
 communion, but is forced to pine in empty forms; a hunger of the heart,
 which finds only shadows to feed upon.
 
 Kenyon's studio was in a cross-street, or, rather, an ugly and dirty
 little lane, between the Corso and the Via della Ripetta; and though
 chill, narrow, gloomy, and bordered with tall and shabby structures,
 the lane was not a whit more disagreeable than nine tenths of the Roman
 streets. Over the door of one of the houses was a marble tablet, bearing
 an inscription, to the purport that the sculpture-rooms within had
 formerly been occupied by the illustrious artist Canova. In these
 precincts (which Canova's genius was not quite of a character to render
 sacred, though it certainly made them interesting) the young American
 sculptor had now established himself.
 
 The studio of a sculptor is generally but a rough and dreary-looking
 place, with a good deal the aspect, indeed, of a stone-mason's workshop.
 Bare floors of brick or plank, and plastered walls,--an old chair
 or two, or perhaps only a block of marble (containing, however, the
 possibility of ideal grace within it) to sit down upon; some hastily
 scrawled sketches of nude figures on the whitewash of the wall. These
 last are probably the sculptor's earliest glimpses of ideas that may
 hereafter be solidified into imperishable stone, or perhaps may remain
 as impalpable as a dream. Next there are a few very roughly modelled
 little figures in clay or plaster, exhibiting the second stage of the
 idea as it advances towards a marble immortality; and then is seen the
 exquisitely designed shape of clay, more interesting than even the
--**--**--
 how much of the admiration which our artists get for their buttons
 and buttonholes, their shoe-ties, their neckcloths,--and these, at our
 present epoch of taste, make a large share of the renown,--would be
 abated, if we were generally aware that the sculptor can claim no credit
 for such pretty performances, as immortalized in marble! They are not
 his work, but that of some nameless machine in human shape.
 
 Miriam stopped an instant in an antechamber, to look at a half-finished
 bust, the features of which seemed to be struggling out of the stone;
 and, as it were, scattering and dissolving its hard substance by the
 glow of feeling and intelligence. As the skilful workman gave stroke
 after stroke of the chisel with apparent carelessness, but sure effect,
 it was impossible not to think that the outer marble was merely an
 extraneous environment; the human countenance within its embrace must
 have existed there since the limestone ledges of Carrara were first
 made. Another bust was nearly completed, though still one of Kenyon's
 most trustworthy assistants was at work, giving delicate touches,
 shaving off an impalpable something, and leaving little heaps of marble
 dust to attest it.
 
 "As these busts in the block of marble," thought Miriam, "so does our
 individual fate exist in the limestone of time. We fancy that we carve
 it out; but its ultimate shape is prior to all our action."
 
 Kenyon was in the inner room, but, hearing a step in the antechamber, he
 threw a veil over what he was at work upon, and came out to receive his
 visitor. He was dressed in a gray blouse, with a little cap on the top
 of his head; a costume which became him better than the formal garments
 which he wore whenever he passed out of his own domains. The sculptor
--**--**--
 lesson; and, physically, the form has not settled itself into sufficient
 repose."
 
 In another style, there was a grand, calm head of Milton, not copied
 from any one bust or picture, yet more authentic than any of them,
 because all known representations of the poet had been profoundly
 studied, and solved in the artist's mind. The bust over the tomb in
 Grey Friars Church, the original miniatures and pictures, wherever to
 be found, had mingled each its special truth in this one work; wherein,
 likewise, by long perusal and deep love of the Paradise Lost, the Comus,
 the Lycidas, and L'Allegro, the sculptor had succeeded, even better than
 he knew, in spiritualizing his marble with the poet's mighty genius. And
 this was a great thing to have achieved, such a length of time after the
 dry bones and dust of Milton were like those of any other dead man.
 
 There were also several portrait-busts, comprising those of two or three
 of the illustrious men of our own country, whom Kenyon, before he left
 America, had asked permission to model. He had done so, because he
 sincerely believed that, whether he wrought the busts in marble or
 bronze, the one would corrode and the other crumble in the long lapse
 of time, beneath these great men's immortality. Possibly, however, the
 young artist may have underestimated the durability of his material.
 Other faces there were, too, of men who (if the brevity of their
 remembrance, after death, can be augured from their little value in
 life) should have been represented in snow rather than marble. Posterity
 will be puzzled what to do with busts like these, the concretions and
 petrifactions of a vain self-estimate; but will find, no doubt, that they
 serve to build into stone walls, or burn into quicklime, as well as if
--**--**--
 that it is good to work with all time before our view."
 
 "Well, well," answered Miriam, "I must not quarrel with you for flinging
 your heavy stones at poor Posterity; and, to say the truth, I think you
 are as likely to hit the mark as anybody. These busts, now, much as I
 seem to scorn them, make me feel as if you were a magician.. You turn
 feverish men into cool, quiet marble. What a blessed change for them!
 Would you could do as much for me!"
 
 "O, gladly!" cried Kenyon, who had long wished to model that beautiful
 and most expressive face. "When will you begin to sit?"
 
 "Poh! that was not what I meant," said Miriam. "Come, show me something
 else."
 
 "Do you recognize this?" asked the sculptor.
 
 He took out of his desk a little old-fashioned ivory coffer, yellow
 with age; it was richly carved with antique figures and foliage; and had
 Kenyon thought fit to say that Benvenuto Cellini wrought this precious
 box, the skill and elaborate fancy of the work would by no means have
 discredited his word, nor the old artist's fame. At least, it was
 evidently a production of Benvenuto's school and century, and might
 once have been the jewel-case of some grand lady at the court of the De'
 Medici.
 
 Lifting the lid, however, no blaze of diamonds was disclosed, but
 only, lapped in fleecy cotton, a small, beautifully shaped hand, most
 delicately sculptured in marble. Such loving care and nicest art had
 been lavished here, that the palm really seemed to have a tenderness
 in its very substance. Touching those lovely fingers,--had the jealous
 sculptor allowed you to touch,--you could hardly believe that a virgin
 warmth would not steal from them into your heart.
 
 "Ah, this is very beautiful!" exclaimed Miriam, with a genial smile.
--**--**--
 believe, with tobacco juice), and all other nudities of to-day, I really
 do not understand what they have to say to this generation, and would be
 glad to see as many heaps of quicklime in their stead."
 
 "You are severe upon the professors of my art," said Kenyon, half
 smiling, half seriously; "not that you are wholly wrong, either. We are
 bound to accept drapery of some kind, and make the best of it. But
 what are we to do? Must we adopt the costume of to-day, and carve, for
 example, a Venus in a hoop-petticoat?"
 
 "That would be a boulder, indeed!" rejoined Miriam, laughing. "But
 the difficulty goes to confirm me in my belief that, except for
 portrait-busts, sculpture has no longer a right to claim any place among
 living arts. It has wrought itself out, and come fairly to an end. There
 is never a new group nowadays; never even so much as a new attitude.
 Greenough (I take my examples among men of merit) imagined nothing new;
 nor Crawford either, except in the tailoring line. There are not, as you
 will own, more than half a dozen positively original statues or groups
 in the world, and these few are of immemorial antiquity. A person
 familiar with the Vatican, the Uffizzi Gallery, the Naples Gallery,
 and the Louvre, will at once refer any modern production to its antique
 prototype; which, moreover, had begun to get out of fashion, even in old
 Roman days."
 
 "Pray stop, Miriam," cried Kenyon, "or I shall fling away the chisel
 forever!"
 
 "Fairly own to me, then, my friend," rejoined Miriam, whose disturbed
 mind found a certain relief in this declamation, "that you sculptors
 are, of necessity, the greatest plagiarists in the world."
 
 "I do not own it," said Kenyon, "yet cannot utterly contradict you, as
--**--**--
 dignity; so that Cleopatra sat attired in a garb proper to her historic
 and queenly state, as a daughter of the Ptolemies, and yet such as
 the beautiful woman would have put on as best adapted to heighten the
 magnificence of her charms, and kindle a tropic fire in the cold eyes of
 Octavius.
 
 A marvellous repose--that rare merit in statuary, except it be the
 lumpish repose native to the block of stone--was diffused throughout the
 figure. The spectator felt that Cleopatra had sunk down out of the fever
 and turmoil of her life, and for one instant--as it were, between two
 pulse throbs--had relinquished all activity, and was resting throughout
 every vein and muscle. It was the repose of despair, indeed; for
 Octavius had seen her, and remained insensible to her enchantments. But
 still there was a great smouldering furnace deep down in the woman's
 heart. The repose, no doubt, was as complete as if she were never to
 stir hand or foot again; and yet, such was the creature's latent energy
 and fierceness, she might spring upon you like a tigress, and stop the
 very breath that you were now drawing midway in your throat.
 
 The face was a miraculous success. The sculptor had not shunned to
 give the full Nubian lips, and other characteristics of the Egyptian
 physiognomy. His courage and integrity had been abundantly rewarded; for
 Cleopatra's beauty shone out richer, warmer, more triumphantly beyond
 comparison, than if, shrinking timidly from the truth, he had chosen
 the tame Grecian type. The expression was of profound, gloomy, heavily
 revolving thought; a glance into her past life and present emergencies,
 while her spirit gathered itself up for some new struggle, or was
 getting sternly reconciled to impending doom. In one view, there was a
 certain softness and tenderness,--how breathed into the statue, among so
--**--**--
 by no means so certain that a confession would do good. The more her
 secret struggled and fought to be told, the more certain would it be to
 change all former relations that had subsisted between herself and the
 friend to whom she might reveal it. Unless he could give her all the
 sympathy, and just the kind of sympathy that the occasion required,
 Miriam would hate him by and by, and herself still more, if he let her
 speak.
 
 This was what Kenyon said to himself; but his reluctance, after all, and
 whether he were conscious of it or no, resulted from a suspicion that
 had crept into his heart and lay there in a dark corner. Obscure as it
 was, when Miriam looked into his eyes, she detected it at once.
 
 "Ah, I shall hate you!" cried she, echoing the thought which he had
 not spoken; she was half choked with the gush of passion that was thus
 turned back upon her. "You are as cold and pitiless as your own marble."
 
 "No; but full of sympathy, God knows!" replied he.
 
 In truth, his suspicions, however warranted by the mystery in which
 Miriam was enveloped, had vanished in the earnestness of his kindly and
 sorrowful emotion. He was now ready to receive her trust.
 
 "Keep your sympathy, then, for sorrows that admit of such solace," said
 she, making a strong effort to compose herself. "As for my griefs, I
 know how to manage them. It was all a mistake: you can do nothing for
 me, unless you petrify me into a marble companion for your Cleopatra
 there; and I am not of her sisterhood, I do assure you. Forget this
 foolish scene, my friend, and never let me see a reference to it in your
 eyes when they meet mine hereafter."
--**--**--
 assemblage composed almost entirely of Anglo-Saxons, and chiefly of
 American artists, with a sprinkling of their English brethren; and some
 few of the tourists who still lingered in Rome, now that Holy Week was
 past. Miriam, Hilda, and the sculptor were all three present, and with
 them Donatello, whose life was so far turned from fits natural bent
 that, like a pet spaniel, he followed his beloved mistress wherever he
 could gain admittance.
 
 The place of meeting was in the palatial, but somewhat faded and gloomy
 apartment of an eminent member of the aesthetic body. It was no more
 formal an occasion than one of those weekly receptions, common among
 the foreign residents of Rome, at which pleasant people--or disagreeable
 ones, as the case may be--encounter one another with little ceremony.
 
 If anywise interested in art, a man must be difficult to please who
 cannot find fit companionship among a crowd of persons, whose ideas and
 pursuits all tend towards the general purpose of enlarging the world's
 stock of beautiful productions.
 
 One of the chief causes that make Rome the favorite residence of
 artists--their ideal home which they sigh for in advance, and are so
 loath to migrate from, after once breathing its enchanted air--is,
 doubtless, that they there find themselves in force, and are numerous
 enough to create a congenial atmosphere. In every other clime they are
 isolated strangers; in this land of art, they are free citizens.
 
 Not that, individually, or in the mass, there appears to be any large
 stock of mutual affection among the brethren of the chisel and the
 pencil. On the contrary, it will impress the shrewd observer that the
 jealousies and petty animosities, which the poets of our day have flung
 aside, still irritate and gnaw into the hearts of this kindred class of
--**--**--
 exhalation out of the Grecian mythology, crystallizing on the dull
 window-panes of to-day. Gifted with a more delicate power than any other
 man alive, he had foregone to be a Christian reality, and perverted
 himself into a Pagan idealist, whose business or efficacy, in our
 present world, it would be exceedingly difficult to define. And, loving
 and reverencing the pure material in which he wrought, as surely this
 admirable sculptor did, he had nevertheless robbed the marble of its
 chastity, by giving it an artificial warmth of hue. Thus it became a sin
 and shame to look at his nude goddesses. They had revealed themselves
 to his imagination, no doubt, with all their deity about them; but,
 bedaubed with buff color, they stood forth to the eyes of the profane in
 the guise of naked women. But, whatever criticism may be ventured on
 his style, it was good to meet a man so modest and yet imbued with such
 thorough and simple conviction of his own right principles and practice,
 and so quietly satisfied that his kind of antique achievement was all
 that sculpture could effect for modern life.
 
 
 This eminent person's weight and authority among his artistic brethren
 were very evident; for beginning unobtrusively to utter himself on
 a topic of art, he was soon the centre of a little crowd of younger
 sculptors. They drank in his wisdom, as if it would serve all the
 purposes of original inspiration; he, meanwhile, discoursing with
 gentle calmness, as if there could possibly be no other side, and often
 ratifying, as it were, his own conclusions by a mildly emphatic "Yes."
 
 The veteran Sculptor's unsought audience was composed mostly of our own
 countrymen. It is fair to say, that they were a body of very dexterous
 and capable artists, each of whom had probably given the delighted
--**--**--
 This good effect was assisted by many curious little treasures of
 art, which the host had taken care to strew upon his tables. They
 were principally such bits of antiquity as the soil of Rome and its
 neighborhood are still rich in; seals, gems, small figures of bronze,
 mediaeval carvings in ivory; things which had been obtained at little
 cost, yet might have borne no inconsiderable value in the museum of a
 virtuoso.
 
 As interesting as any of these relics was a large portfolio of old
 drawings, some of which, in the opinion of their possessor, bore
 evidence on their faces of the touch of master-hands. Very ragged and
 ill conditioned they mostly were, yellow with time, and tattered with
 rough usage; and, in their best estate, the designs had been scratched
 rudely with pen and ink, on coarse paper, or, if drawn with charcoal or
 a pencil, were now half rubbed out. You would not anywhere see rougher
 and homelier things than these. But this hasty rudeness made the
 sketches only the more valuable; because the artist seemed to have
 bestirred himself at the pinch of the moment, snatching up whatever
 material was nearest, so as to seize the first glimpse of an idea
 that might vanish in the twinkling of an eye. Thus, by the spell of
 a creased, soiled, and discolored scrap of paper, you were enabled to
 steal close to an old master, and watch him in the very effervescence of
 his genius.
 
 According to the judgment of several connoisseurs, Raphael's own
 hand had communicated its magnetism to one of these sketches; and, if
 genuine, it was evidently his first conception of a favorite Madonna,
 now hanging in the private apartment of the Grand Duke, at Florence.
 Another drawing was attributed to Leonardo da Vinci, and appeared to be
--**--**--
 and general arrangement of the sketch are the same with those of the
 picture; the only difference being, that the demon has a more upturned
 face, and scowls vindictively at the Archangel, who turns away his eyes
 in painful disgust."
 
 "No wonder!" responded Miriam. "The expression suits the daintiness of
 Michael's character, as Guido represents him. He never could have looked
 the demon in the face!"
 
 "Miriam!" exclaimed her friend reproachfully, "you grieve me, and you
 know it, by pretending to speak contemptuously of the most beautiful and
 the divinest figure that mortal painter ever drew."
 
 "Forgive me, Hilda!" said Miriam. "You take these matters more
 religiously than I can, for my life. Guido's Archangel is a fine
 picture, of course, but it never impressed me as it does _you_."
 
 "Well; we will not talk of that," answered Hilda. "What I wanted you to
 notice, in this sketch, is the face of the demon. It is entirely unlike
 the demon of the finished picture. Guido, you know, always affirmed that
 the resemblance to Cardinal Pamfili was either casual or imaginary. Now,
 here is the face as he first conceived it."
 
 "And a more energetic demon, altogether, than that of the finished
 picture," said Kenyon, taking the sketch into his hand. "What a spirit
 is conveyed into the ugliness of this strong, writhing, squirming
 dragon, under the Archangel's foot! Neither is the face an impossible
 one. Upon my word, I have seen it somewhere, and on the shoulders of a
 living man!"
 
 "And so have I," said Hilda. "It was what struck me from the first."
 
 "Donatello, look at this face!" cried Kenyon.
 
 The young Italian, as may be supposed, took little interest in matters
 of art, and seldom or never ventured an opinion respecting them. After
 holding the sketch a single instant in his hand, he flung it from him
--**--**--
 A MOONLIGHT RAMBLE
 
 
 The proposal for a moonlight ramble was received with acclamation by
 all the younger portion of the company. They immediately set forth and
 descended from story to story, dimly lighting their way by waxen tapers,
 which are a necessary equipment to those whose thoroughfare, in the
 night-time, lies up and down a Roman staircase. Emerging from the
 courtyard of the edifice, they looked upward and saw the sky full of
 light, which seemed to have a delicate purple or crimson lustre, or, at
 least some richer tinge than the cold, white moonshine of other
 skies. It gleamed over the front of the opposite palace, showing the
 architectural ornaments of its cornice and pillared portal, as well as
 the iron-barred basement windows, that gave such a prison-like aspect to
 the structure, and the shabbiness and Squalor that lay along its base.
 A cobbler was just shutting up his little shop, in the basement of the
 palace; a cigar vender's lantern flared in the blast that came through
 the archway; a French sentinel paced to and fro before the portal; a
 homeless dog, that haunted thereabouts, barked as obstreperously at the
 party as if he were the domestic guardian of the precincts.
 
 The air was quietly full of the noise of falling water, the cause
 of which was nowhere visible, though apparently near at hand. This
 pleasant, natural sound, not unlike that of a distant cascade in the
 forest, may be heard in many of the Roman streets and piazzas, when
 the tumult of the city is hushed; for consuls, emperors, and popes, the
 great men of every age, have found no better way of immortalizing their
 memories than by the shifting, indestructible, ever new, yet unchanging,
 upgush and downfall of water. They have written their names in that
--**--**--
 whatever obstacles and improbabilities may seem to beset him. Will you
 drink, Donatello?"
 
 "Signorina, what you drink, I drink," said the youth.
 
 They and the rest of the party descended some steps to the water's
 brim, and, after a sip or two, stood gazing at the absurd design of the
 fountain, where some sculptor of Bernini's school had gone absolutely
 mad in marble. It was a great palace front, with niches and many
 bas-reliefs, out of which looked Agrippa's legendary virgin, and several
 of the allegoric sisterhood; while, at the base, appeared Neptune, with
 his floundering steeds, and Tritons blowing their horns about him, and
 twenty other artificial fantasies, which the calm moonlight soothed into
 better taste than was native to them.
 
 And, after all, it was as magnificent a piece of work as ever human
 skill contrived. At the foot of the palatial facade was strewn, with
 careful art and ordered irregularity, a broad and broken heap of massive
 rock, looking is if it might have lain there since the deluge. Over a
 central precipice fell the water, in a semicircular cascade; and from
 a hundred crevices, on all sides, snowy jets gushed up, and streams
 spouted out of the mouths and nostrils of stone monsters, and fell in
 glistening drops; while other rivulets, that had run wild, came leaping
 from one rude step to another, over stones that were mossy, slimy, and
 green with sedge, because, in a Century of their wild play, Nature had
 adopted the Fountain of Trevi, with all its elaborate devices, for her
 own. Finally, the water, tumbling, sparkling, and dashing, with
 joyous haste and never-ceasing murmur, poured itself into a great
 marble-brimmed reservoir, and filled it with a quivering tide; on which
 was seen, continually, a snowy semicircle of momentary foam from the
--**--**--
 
 Dipping his hands into the capacious washbowl before him, the model
 rubbed them together with the utmost vehemence. Ever and anon, too,
 he peeped into the water, as if expecting to see the whole Fountain of
 Trevi turbid with the results of his ablution. Miriam looked at him,
 some little time, with an aspect of real terror, and even imitated him
 by leaning over to peep into the basin. Recovering herself, she took up
 some of the water in the hollow of her hand, and practised an old form
 of exorcism by flinging it in her persecutor's face.
 
 "In the name of all the Saints," cried she, "vanish, Demon, and let me
 be free of you now and forever!"
 
 "It will not suffice," said some of the mirthful party, "unless the
 Fountain of Trevi gushes with holy water."
 
 In fact, the exorcism was quite ineffectual upon the pertinacious demon,
 or whatever the apparition might be. Still he washed his brown, bony
 talons; still he peered into the vast basin, as if all the water of that
 great drinking-cup of Rome must needs be stained black or sanguine; and
 still he gesticulated to Miriam to follow his example. The spectators
 laughed loudly, but yet with a kind of constraint; for the creature's
 aspect was strangely repulsive and hideous.
 
 Miriam felt her arm seized violently by Donatello. She looked at him,
 and beheld a tigerlike fury gleaming from his wild eyes.
 
 "Bid me drown him!" whispered he, shuddering between rage and horrible
 disgust. "You shall hear his death gurgle in another instant!"
 
 "Peace, peace, Donatello!" said Miriam soothingly, for this naturally
 gentle and sportive being seemed all aflame with animal rage. "Do him no
 mischief! He is mad; and we are as mad as he, if we suffer ourselves to
 be disquieted by his antics. Let us leave him to bathe his hands till
--**--**--
 
 "This burning pain in my heart," said Donatello; "for you are in the
 midst of it."
 
 By this time, they had left the Fountain of Trevi considerably behind
 them. Little further allusion was made to the scene at its margin; for
 the party regarded Miriam's persecutor as diseased in his wits, and were
 hardly to be surprised by any eccentricity in his deportment.
 
 Threading several narrow streets, they passed through the Piazza of the
 Holy Apostles, and soon came to Trajan's Forum. All over the surface
 of what once was Rome, it seems to be the effort of Time to bury up the
 ancient city, as if it were a corpse, and he the sexton; so that, in
 eighteen centuries, the soil over its grave has grown very deep, by the
 slow scattering of dust, and the accumulation of more modern decay upon
 older ruin.
 
 This was the fate, also, of Trajan's Forum, until some papal antiquary,
 a few hundred years ago, began to hollow it out again, and disclosed the
 full height of the gigantic column wreathed round with bas-reliefs of
 the old emperor's warlike deeds. In the area before it stands a grove of
 stone, consisting of the broken and unequal shafts of a vanished temple,
 still keeping a majestic order, and apparently incapable of further
 demolition. The modern edifices of the piazza (wholly built, no doubt,
 out of the spoil of its old magnificence) look down into the hollow
 space whence these pillars rise.
 
 One of the immense gray granite shafts lay in the piazza, on the verge
 of the area. It was a great, solid fact of the Past, making old Rome
 actually sensible to the touch and eye; and no study of history, nor
 force of thought, nor magic of song, could so vitally assure us that
--**--**--
 the acetous fermentation."
 
 They turned into the Via Alessandria, and thus gained the rear of the
 Temple of Peace, and, passing beneath its great arches, pursued their
 way along a hedge-bordered lane. In all probability, a stately Roman
 street lay buried beneath that rustic-looking pathway; for they had now
 emerged from the close and narrow avenues of the modern city, and were
 treading on a soil where the seeds of antique grandeur had not yet
 produced the squalid crop that elsewhere sprouts from them. Grassy as
 the lane was, it skirted along heaps of shapeless ruin, and the bare
 site of the vast temple that Hadrian planned and built. It terminated
 on the edge of a somewhat abrupt descent, at the foot of which, with a
 muddy ditch between, rose, in the bright moonlight, the great curving
 wall and multitudinous arches of the Coliseum.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XVII
 
 
 MIRIAM'S TROUBLE
 
 
 As usual of a moonlight evening, several carriages stood at the entrance
 of this famous ruin, and the precincts and interior were anything but a
 solitude. The French sentinel on duty beneath the principal archway eyed
 our party curiously, but offered no obstacle to their admission. Within,
 the moonlight filled and flooded the great empty space; it glowed upon
 tier above tier of ruined, grass-grown arches, and made them even
 too distinctly visible. The splendor of the revelation took away that
 inestimable effect of dimness and mystery by which the imagination
 might be assisted to build a grander structure than the Coliseum, and to
 shatter it with a more picturesque decay. Byron's celebrated description
 is better than the reality. He beheld the scene in his mind's eye,
 through the witchery of many intervening years, and faintly illuminated
 it as if with starlight instead of this broad glow of moonshine.
 
 The party of our friends sat down, three or four of them on a prostrate
--**--**--
 the heads of the ordinary crowd. Even if they seem endowed with little
 imagination individually, yet there is a property, a gift, a talisman,
 common to their class, entitling them to partake somewhat more
 bountifully than other people in the thin delights of moonshine and
 romance.
 
 "How delightful this is!" said Hilda; and she sighed for very pleasure.
 
 "Yes," said Kenyon, who sat on the column, at her side. "The Coliseum
 is far more delightful, as we enjoy it now, than when eighty thousand
 persons sat squeezed together, row above row, to see their fellow
 creatures torn by lions and tigers limb from limb. What a strange
 thought that the Coliseum was really built for us, and has not come to
 its best uses till almost two thousand years after it was finished!"
 
 "The Emperor Vespasian scarcely had us in his mind," said Hilda,
 smiling; "but I thank him none the less for building it."
 
 "He gets small thanks, I fear, from the people whose bloody instincts
 he pampered," rejoined Kenyon. "Fancy a nightly assemblage of eighty
 thousand melancholy and remorseful ghosts, looking down from those tiers
 of broken arches, striving to repent of the savage pleasures which they
 once enjoyed, but still longing to enjoy them over again."
 
 "You bring a Gothic horror into this peaceful moonlight scene," said
 Hilda.
 
 
 "Nay, I have good authority for peopling the Coliseum with phantoms,"
 replied the sculptor. "Do you remember that veritable scene in Benvenuto
 Cellini's autobiography, in which a necromancer of his acquaintance
 draws a magic circle--just where the black cross stands now, I
 suppose--and raises myriads of demons? Benvenuto saw them with his
 own eyes,--giants, pygmies, and other creatures of frightful aspect,
 capering and dancing on yonder walls. Those spectres must have been
 Romans, in their lifetime, and frequenters of this bloody amphitheatre."
--**--**--
 crush you, too, if you stand at my side! Depart, then; and make the sign
 of the cross, as your faith bids you, when an evil spirit is nigh. Cast
 me off, or you are lost forever."
 
 A higher sentiment brightened upon Donatello's face than had hitherto
 seemed to belong to its simple expression and sensuous beauty.
 
 "I will never quit you," he said; "you cannot drive me from you."
 
 "Poor Donatello!" said Miriam in a changed tone, and rather to herself
 than him. "Is there no other that seeks me out, follows me,--is
 obstinate to share my affliction and my doom,--but only you! They call
 me beautiful; and I used to fancy that, at my need, I could bring the
 whole world to my feet. And lo! here is my utmost need; and my beauty
 and my gifts have brought me only this poor, simple boy. Half-witted,
 they call him; and surely fit for nothing but to be happy. And I accept
 his aid! To-morrow, to-morrow, I will tell him all! Ah! what a sin to
 stain his joyous nature with the blackness of a woe like mine!"
 
 She held out her hand to him, and smiled sadly as Donatello pressed it
 to his lips. They were now about to emerge from the depth of the arch;
 but just then the kneeling pilgrim, in his revolution round the orbit of
 the shrines, had reached the one on the steps of which Miriam had been
 sitting. There, as at the other shrines, he prayed, or seemed to
 pray. It struck Kenyon, however,--who sat close by, and saw his face
 distinctly, that the suppliant was merely performing an enjoined
 penance, and without the penitence that ought to have given it effectual
 life. Even as he knelt, his eyes wandered, and Miriam soon felt that
--**--**--
 
 CHAPTER XVIII
 
 
 ON THE EDGE OF A PRECIPICE
 
 
 "Let us settle it," said Kenyon, stamping his foot firmly down, "that
 this is precisely the spot where the chasm opened, into which Curtius
 precipitated his good steed and himself. Imagine the great, dusky gap,
 impenetrably deep, and with half-shaped monsters and hideous faces
 looming upward out of it, to the vast affright of the good citizens who
 peeped over the brim! There, now, is a subject, hitherto unthought of,
 for a grim and ghastly story, and, methinks, with a moral as deep as
 the gulf itself. Within it, beyond a question, there were prophetic
 visions,--intimations of all the future calamities of Rome,--shades of
 Goths, and Gauls, and even of the French soldiers of to-day. It was a
 pity to close it up so soon! I would give much for a peep into such a
 chasm."
 
 "I fancy," remarked Miriam, "that every person takes a peep into it
 in moments of gloom and despondency; that is to say, in his moments of
 deepest insight."
 
 "Where is it, then?" asked Hilda. "I never peeped into it."
 
 "Wait, and it will open for you," replied her friend. "The chasm was
 merely one of the orifices of that pit of blackness that lies beneath
 us, everywhere. The firmest substance of human happiness is but a thin
 crust spread over it, with just reality enough to bear up the illusive
 stage scenery amid which we tread. It needs no earthquake to open the
 chasm. A footstep, a little heavier than ordinary, will serve; and we
 must step very daintily, not to break through the crust at any moment.
 By and by, we inevitably sink! It was a foolish piece of heroism in
 Curtius to precipitate himself there, in advance; for all Rome, you see,
 has been swallowed up in that gulf, in spite of him. The Palace of the
--**--**--
 "Doubtless, too," resumed the sculptor (for his imagination was greatly
 excited by the idea of this wondrous chasm), "all the blood that the
 Romans shed, whether on battlefields, or in the Coliseum, or on the
 cross,--in whatever public or private murder,--ran into this fatal gulf,
 and formed a mighty subterranean lake of gore, right beneath our feet.
 The blood from the thirty wounds in Caesar's breast flowed hitherward,
 and that pure little rivulet from Virginia's bosom, too! Virginia,
 beyond all question, was stabbed by her father, precisely where we are
 standing."
 
 "Then the spot is hallowed forever!" said Hilda.
 
 "Is there such blessed potency in bloodshed?" asked Miriam. "Nay, Hilda,
 do not protest! I take your meaning rightly."
 
 They again moved forward. And still, from the Forum and the Via Sacra,
 from beneath the arches of the Temple of Peace on one side, and the
 acclivity of the Palace of the Caesars on the other, there arose singing
 voices of parties that were strolling through the moonlight. Thus,
 the air was full of kindred melodies that encountered one another, and
 twined themselves into a broad, vague music, out of which no single
 strain could be disentangled. These good examples, as well as the
 harmonious influences of the hour, incited our artist friends to make
 proof of their own vocal powers. With what skill and breath they had,
 they set up a choral strain,--"Hail, Columbia!" we believe, which
 those old Roman echoes must have found it exceeding difficult to repeat
 aright. Even Hilda poured the slender sweetness of her note into her
 country's song. Miriam was at first silent, being perhaps unfamiliar
 with the air and burden. But suddenly she threw out such a swell and
 gush of sound, that it seemed to pervade the whole choir of other
 voices, and then to rise above them all, and become audible in what
--**--**--
 little guess my need of it. You really think, then, that He sees and
 cares for us?"
 
 "Miriam, you frighten me."
 
 "Hush, hush? do not let them hear yet!" whispered Miriam. "I frighten
 you, you say; for Heaven's sake, how? Am I strange? Is there anything
 wild in my behavior?"
 
 "Only for that moment," replied Hilda, "because you seemed to doubt
 God's providence."
 
 "We will talk of that another time," said her friend. "Just now it is
 very dark to me."
 
 On the left of the Piazza of the Campidoglio, as you face cityward, and
 at the head of the long and stately flight of steps descending from the
 Capitoline Hill to the level of lower Rome, there is a narrow lane
 or passage. Into this the party of our friends now turned. The path
 ascended a little, and ran along under the walls of a palace, but soon
 passed through a gateway, and terminated in a small paved courtyard. It
 was bordered by a low parapet.
 
 The spot, for some reason or other, impressed them as exceedingly
 lonely. On one side was the great height of the palace, with the
 moonshine falling over it, and showing all the windows barred and
 shuttered. Not a human eye could look down into the little courtyard,
 even if the seemingly deserted palace had a tenant. On all other sides
 of its narrow compass there was nothing but the parapet, which as it now
 appeared was built right on the edge of a steep precipice. Gazing
 from its imminent brow, the party beheld a crowded confusion of roofs
 spreading over the whole space between them and the line of hills that
 lay beyond the Tiber. A long, misty wreath, just dense enough to catch
 a little of the moonshine, floated above the houses, midway towards the
--**--**--
 While this brief conversation passed, Donatello had once or twice
 glanced aside with a watchful air, just as a hound may often be seen to
 take sidelong note of some suspicious object, while he gives his more
 direct attention to something nearer at, hand. Miriam seemed now first
 to become aware of the silence that had followed upon the cheerful talk
 and laughter of a few moments before.
 
 Looking round, she perceived that all her company of merry friends had
 retired, and Hilda, too, in whose soft and quiet presence she had always
 an indescribable feeling of security. All gone; and only herself and
 Donatello left hanging over the brow of the ominous precipice.
 
 Not so, however; not entirely alone! In the basement wall of the palace,
 shaded from the moon, there was a deep, empty niche, that had probably
 once contained a statue; not empty, either; for a figure now came forth
 from it and approached Miriam. She must have had cause to dread some
 unspeakable evil from this strange persecutor, and to know that this was
 the very crisis of her calamity; for as he drew near, such a cold, sick
 despair crept over her that it impeded her breath, and benumbed her
 natural promptitude of thought. Miriam seemed dreamily to remember
 falling on her knees; but, in her whole recollection of that wild
 moment, she beheld herself as in a dim show, and could not well
 distinguish what was done and suffered; no, not even whether she were
 really an actor and sufferer in the scene.
 
 Hilda, meanwhile, had separated herself from the sculptor, and turned
 back to rejoin her friend. At a distance, she still heard the mirth of
 her late companions, who were going down the cityward descent of the
 Capitoline Hill; they had set up a new stave of melody, in which her
--**--**--
 drawn into her doom. She pressed him close, close to her bosom, with a
 clinging embrace that brought their two hearts together, till the horror
 and agony of each was combined into one emotion, and that a kind of
 rapture.
 
 "Yes, Donatello, you speak the truth!" said she; "my heart consented to
 what you did. We two slew yonder wretch. The deed knots us together, for
 time and eternity, like the coil of a serpent!"
 
 They threw one other glance at the heap of death below, to assure
 themselves that it was there; so like a dream was the whole thing. Then
 they turned from that fatal precipice, and came out of the courtyard,
 arm in arm, heart in heart. Instinctively, they were heedful not to
 sever themselves so much as a pace or two from one another, for fear
 of the terror and deadly chill that would thenceforth wait for them
 in solitude. Their deed--the crime which Donatello wrought, and Miriam
 accepted on the instant--had wreathed itself, as she said, like a
 serpent, in inextricable links about both their souls, and drew them
 into one, by its terrible contractile power. It was closer than a
 marriage bond. So intimate, in those first moments, was the union, that
 it seemed as if their new sympathy annihilated all other ties, and that
 they were released from the chain of humanity; a new sphere, a special
 law, had been created for them alone. The world could not come near
 them; they were safe!
 
 When they reached the flight of steps leading downward from the Capitol,
 there was a faroff noise of singing and laughter. Swift, indeed, had
 been the rush of the crisis that was come and gone! This was still the
 merriment of the party that had so recently been their companions. They
--**--**--
 passion. "None, my innocent one! Surely, it is no crime that we have
 committed. One wretched and worthless life has been sacrificed to cement
 two other lives for evermore."
 
 "For evermore, Miriam!" said Donatello; "cemented with his blood!"
 
 The young man started at the word which he had himself spoken; it may be
 that it brought home, to the simplicity of his imagination, what he had
 not before dreamed of,--the ever-increasing loathsomeness of a union
 that consists in guilt. Cemented with blood, which would corrupt and
 grow more noisome forever and forever, but bind them none the less
 strictly for that.
 
 
 "Forget it! Cast it all behind you!" said Miriam, detecting, by her
 sympathy, the pang that was in his heart. "The deed has done its office,
 and has no existence any more."
 
 They flung the past behind them, as she counselled, or else distilled
 from it a fiery, intoxication, which sufficed to carry them triumphantly
 through those first moments of their doom. For guilt has its moment of
 rapture too. The foremost result of a broken law is ever an ecstatic
 sense of freedom. And thus there exhaled upward (out of their dark
 sympathy, at the base of which lay a human corpse) a bliss, or an
 insanity, which the unhappy pair imagined to be well worth the sleepy
 innocence that was forever lost to them.
 
 As their spirits rose to the solemn madness of the occasion, they went
 onward, not stealthily, not fearfully, but with a stately gait and
 aspect. Passion lent them (as it does to meaner shapes) its brief
 nobility of carriage. They trod through the streets of Rome, as if they,
 too, were among the majestic and guilty shadows, that, from ages
 long gone by, have haunted the blood-stained city. And, at Miriam's
 suggestion, they turned aside, for the sake of treading loftily past the
--**--**--
 kind of simple joy at witnessing the devoutness of her friend. Then her
 own sin rushed upon her, and she shouted, with the rich strength of her
 voice, "Pray for us, Hilda; we need it!"
 
 Whether Hilda heard and recognized the voice we cannot tell. The window
 was immediately closed, and her form disappeared from behind the snowy
 curtain. Miriam felt this to be a token that the cry of her condemned
 spirit was shut out of heaven.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XX
 
 
 THE BURIAL CHANT
 
 
 The Church of the Capuchins (where, as the reader may remember, some of
 our acquaintances had made an engagement to meet) stands a little aside
 from the Piazza Barberini. Thither, at the hour agreed upon, on the
 morning after the scenes last described, Miriam and Donatello directed
 their steps. At no time are people so sedulously careful to keep their
 trifling appointments, attend to their ordinary occupations, and thus
 put a commonplace aspect on life, as when conscious of some secret that
 if suspected would make them look monstrous in the general eye.
 
 Yet how tame and wearisome is the impression of all ordinary things in
 the contrast with such a fact! How sick and tremulous, the next morning,
 is the spirit that has dared so much only the night before! How icy cold
 is the heart, when the fervor, the wild ecstasy of passion has faded
 away, and sunk down among the dead ashes of the fire that blazed so
 fiercely, and was fed by the very substance of its life! How faintly
 does the criminal stagger onward, lacking the impulse of that strong
 madness that hurried him into guilt, and treacherously deserts him in
 the midst of it!
 
 When Miriam and Donatello drew near the church, they found only Kenyon
 awaiting them on the steps. Hilda had likewise promised to be of the
--**--**--
 "Impossible!" cried Miriam, starting.
 
 "Then did you not see her again?" inquired Kenyon, in some alarm.
 
 "Not there," answered Miriam quietly; "indeed, I followed pretty closely
 on the heels of the rest of the party. But do not be alarmed on Hilda's
 account; the Virgin is bound to watch over the good child, for the sake
 of the piety with which she keeps the lamp alight at her shrine. And
 besides, I have always felt that Hilda is just as safe in these evil
 streets of Rome as her white doves when they fly downwards from the
 tower top, and run to and fro among the horses' feet. There is certainly
 a providence on purpose for Hilda, if for no other human creature."
 
 "I religiously believe it," rejoined the sculptor; "and yet my mind
 would be the easier, if I knew that she had returned safely to her
 tower."
 
 "Then make yourself quite easy," answered Miriam. "I saw her (and it
 is the last sweet sight that I remember) leaning from her window midway
 between earth and sky!"
 
 Kenyon now looked at Donatello.
 
 "You seem out of spirits, my dear friend," he observed. "This languid
 Roman atmosphere is not the airy wine that you were accustomed to
 breathe at home. I have not forgotten your hospitable invitation to
 meet you this summer at your castle among the Apennines. It is my fixed
 purpose to come, I assure you. We shall both be the better for some deep
 draughts of the mountain breezes."
 
 "It may he," said Donatello, with unwonted sombreness; "the old house
 seemed joyous when I was a child. But as I remember it now it was a grim
 place, too."
 
 The sculptor looked more attentively at the young man, and was surprised
 and alarmed to observe how entirely the fine, fresh glow of animal
--**--**--
 
 "But we were wrong, and Hilda right, as you perceive," said Miriam,
 directing his attention to the point on which their dispute of the night
 before had arisen. "It is not easy to detect her astray as regards any
 picture on which those clear, soft eyes of hers have ever rested."
 
 "And she has studied and admired few pictures so much as this," observed
 the sculptor. "No wonder; for there is hardly another so beautiful in
 the world. What an expression of heavenly severity in the Archangel's
 face! There is a degree of pain, trouble, and disgust at being brought
 in contact with sin, even for the purpose of quelling and punishing it;
 and yet a celestial tranquillity pervades his whole being."
 
 "I have never been able," said Miriam, "to admire this picture nearly so
 much as Hilda does, in its moral and intellectual aspect. If it cost her
 more trouble to be good, if her soul were less white and pure, she would
 be a more competent critic of this picture, and would estimate it not
 half so high. I see its defects today more clearly than ever before."
 
 "What are some of them?" asked Kenyon.
 
 "That Archangel, now," Miriam continued; "how fair he looks, with his
 unruffled wings, with his unhacked sword, and clad in his bright
 armor, and that exquisitely fitting sky-blue tunic, cut in the latest
 Paradisiacal mode! What a dainty air of the first celestial society!
 With what half-scornful delicacy he sets his prettily sandalled foot
 on the head of his prostrate foe! But, is it thus that virtue looks the
 moment after its death struggle with evil? No, no; I could have told
 Guido better. A full third of the Archangel's feathers should have been
 torn from his wings; the rest all ruffled, till they looked like Satan's
--**--**--
 ghastly object, merely because it shocked him. Death has probably a
 peculiar horror and ugliness, when forced upon the contemplation of a
 person so naturally joyous as Donatello, who lived with completeness in
 the present moment, and was able to form but vague images of the future.
 
 "What is the matter, Donatello?" whispered Miriam soothingly. "You are
 quite in a tremble, my poor friend! What is it?"
 
 "This awful chant from beneath the church," answered Donatello; "it
 oppresses me; the air is so heavy with it that I can scarcely draw my
 breath. And yonder dead monk! I feel as if he were lying right across my
 heart."
 
 "Take courage!" whispered she again "come, we will approach close to
 the dead monk. The only way, in such cases, is to stare the ugly horror
 right in the face; never a sidelong glance, nor half-look, for those are
 what show a frightfull thing in its frightfullest aspect. Lean on me,
 dearest friend! My heart is very strong for both of us. Be brave; and
 all is well."
 
 Donatello hung back for a moment, but then pressed close to Miriam's
 side, and suffered her to lead him up to the bier. The sculptor
 followed. A number of persons, chiefly women, with several children
 among them, were standing about the corpse; and as our three friends
 drew nigh, a mother knelt down, and caused her little boy to kneel,
 both kissing the beads and crucifix that hung from the monk's girdle.
 Possibly he had died in the odor of sanctity; or, at all events, death
 and his brown frock and cowl made a sacred image of this reverend
 father.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XXI
 
 
 THE DEAD CAPUCHIN
 
 
 The dead monk was clad, as when alive, in the brown woollen frock of
 the Capuchins, with the hood drawn over his head, but so as to leave the
--**--**--
 
 As his companions, whom the sculptor supposed to be close by him, made
 no response to his fanciful musing, he looked up, and saw them at the
 head of the bier. He advanced thither himself.
 
 "Ha!" exclaimed he.
 
 He cast a horror-stricken and bewildered glance at Miriam, but withdrew
 it immediately. Not that he had any definite suspicion, or, it may be,
 even a remote idea, that she could be held responsible in the least
 degree for this man's sudden death. In truth, it seemed too wild a
 thought to connect, in reality, Miriam's persecutor of many past months
 and the vagabond of the preceding night, with the dead Capuchin
 of to-day. It resembled one of those unaccountable changes and
 interminglings of identity, which so often occur among the personages
 of a dream. But Kenyon, as befitted the professor of an imaginative art,
 was endowed with an exceedingly quick sensibility, which was apt to give
 him intimations of the true state of matters that lay beyond his actual
 vision. There was a whisper in his ear; it said, "Hush!" Without asking
 himself wherefore, he resolved to be silent as regarded the mysterious
 discovery which he had made, and to leave any remark or exclamation
 to be voluntarily offered by Miriam. If she never spoke, then let the
 riddle be unsolved.
 
 And now occurred a circumstance that would seem too fantastic to be
 told, if it had not actually happened, precisely as we set it down. As
 the three friends stood by the bier, they saw that a little stream of
 blood had begun to ooze from the dead monk's nostrils; it crept slowly
 towards the thicket of his beard, where, in the course of a moment or
 two, it hid itself.
 
 "How strange!" ejaculated Kenyon. "The monk died of apoplexy, I suppose,
--**--**--
 forehead. She touched one of his folded hands with her finger.
 
 "It is he," said Miriam. "There is the scar, that I know so well, on his
 brow. And it is no vision; he is palpable to my touch! I will question
 the fact no longer, but deal with it as I best can."
 
 It was wonderful to see how the crisis developed in Miriam its own
 proper strength, and the faculty of sustaining the demands which it made
 upon her fortitude. She ceased to tremble; the beautiful woman gazed
 sternly at her dead enemy, endeavoring to meet and quell the look of
 accusation that he threw from between his half-closed eyelids.
 
 "No; thou shalt not scowl me down!" said she. "Neither now, nor when
 we stand together at the judgment-seat. I fear not to meet thee there.
 Farewell, till that next encounter!"
 
 Haughtily waving her hand, Miriam rejoined her friends, who were
 awaiting her at the door of the church. As they went out, the sacristan
 stopped them, and proposed to show the cemetery of the convent, where
 the deceased members of the fraternity are laid to rest in sacred earth,
 brought long ago from Jerusalem.
 
 "And will yonder monk be buried there?" she asked.
 
 "Brother Antonio?" exclaimed the sacristan.
 
 "Surely, our good brother will be put to bed there! His grave is already
 dug, and the last occupant has made room for him. Will you look at it,
 signorina?"
 
 "I will!" said Miriam.
 
 "Then excuse me," observed Kenyon; "for I shall leave you. One dead monk
 has more than sufficed me; and I am not bold enough to face the whole
 mortality of the convent."
 
 It was easy to see, by Donatello's looks, that he, as well as the
 sculptor, would gladly have escaped a visit to the famous cemetery of
--**--**--
 hideously repulsive. One reverend father has his mouth wide open, as if
 he had died in the midst of a howl of terror and remorse, which perhaps
 is even now screeching through eternity. As a general thing, however,
 these frocked and hooded skeletons seem to take a more cheerful view of
 their position, and try with ghastly smiles to turn it into a jest. But
 the cemetery of the Capuchins is no place to nourish celestial hopes:
 the soul sinks forlorn and wretched under all this burden of dusty
 death; the holy earth from Jerusalem, so imbued is it with mortality,
 has grown as barren of the flowers of Paradise as it is of earthly weeds
 and grass. Thank Heaven for its blue sky; it needs a long, upward gaze
 to give us back our faith. Not here can we feel ourselves immortal,
 where the very altars in these chapels of horrible consecration are
 heaps of human bones.
 
 Yet let us give the cemetery the praise that it deserves. There is no
 disagreeable scent, such as might have been expected from the decay of
 so many holy persons, in whatever odor of sanctity they may have taken
 their departure. The same number of living monks would not smell half so
 unexceptionably.
 
 Miriam went gloomily along the corridor, from one vaulted Golgotha to
 another, until in the farthest recess she beheld an open grave.
 
 "Is that for him who lies yonder in the nave?" she asked.
 
 "Yes, signorina, this is to be the resting-place of Brother Antonio, who
 came to his death last night," answered the sacristan; "and in yonder
 niche, you see, sits a brother who was buried thirty years ago, and has
 risen to give him place."
 
 "It is not a satisfactory idea," observed Miriam, "that you poor friars
--**--**--
 tails--a monster often engendered by the Roman sunshine--ran across his
 foot, and made him start. Then he sat silent awhile, and so did Miriam,
 trying to dissolve her whole heart into sympathy, and lavish it all upon
 him, were it only for a moment's cordial.
 
 The young man lifted his hand to his breast, and, unintentionally, as
 Miriam's hand was within his, he lifted that along with it. "I have a
 great weight here!" said he. The fancy struck Miriam (but she drove it
 resolutely down) that Donatello almost imperceptibly shuddered, while,
 in pressing his own hand against his heart, he pressed hers there too.
 
 "Rest your heart on me, dearest one!" she resumed. "Let me bear all its
 weight; I am well able to bear it; for I am a woman, and I love you! I
 love you, Donatello! Is there no comfort for you in this avowal? Look
 at me! Heretofore you have found me pleasant to your sight. Gaze into my
 eyes! Gaze into my soul! Search as deeply as you may, you can never see
 half the tenderness and devotion that I henceforth cherish for you. All
 that I ask is your acceptance of the utter self-sacrifice (but it shall
 be no sacrifice, to my great love) with which I seek to remedy the evil
 you have incurred for my sake!"
 
 All this fervor on Miriam's part; on Donatello's, a heavy silence.
 
 "O, speak to me!" she exclaimed. "Only promise me to be, by and by, a
 little happy!"
 
 "Happy?" murmured Donatello. "Ah, never again! never again!"
 
 "Never? Ah, that is a terrible word to say to me!" answered Miriam. "A
 terrible word to let fall upon a woman's heart, when she loves you, and
 is conscious of having caused your misery! If you love me, Donatello,
--**--**--
 and light-hearted youths of dreamy Italy are accustomed to do, when they
 lie down in the first convenient shade, and snatch a noonday slumber.
 A stupor was upon him, which he mistook for such drowsiness as he had
 known in his innocent past life. But, by and by, he raised himself
 slowly and left the garden. Sometimes poor Donatello started, as if
 he heard a shriek; sometimes he shrank back, as if a face, fearful to
 behold, were thrust close to his own. In this dismal mood, bewildered
 with the novelty of sin and grief, he had little left of that singular
 resemblance, on account of which, and for their sport, his three friends
 had fantastically recognized him as the veritable Faun of Praxiteles.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XXIII
 
 
 MIRIAM AND HILDA
 
 
 On leaving the Medici Gardens Miriam felt herself astray in the world;
 and having no special reason to seek one place more than another, she
 suffered chance to direct her steps as it would. Thus it happened, that,
 involving herself in the crookedness of Rome, she saw Hilda's tower
 rising before her, and was put in mind to climb to the young girl's
 eyry, and ask why she had broken her engagement at the church of the
 Capuchins. People often do the idlest acts of their lifetime in their
 heaviest and most anxious moments; so that it would have been no wonder
 had Miriam been impelled only by so slight a motive of curiosity as we
 have indicated. But she remembered, too, and with a quaking heart, what
 the sculptor had mentioned of Hilda's retracing her steps towards the
 courtyard of the Palazzo Caffarelli in quest of Miriam herself. Had she
 been compelled to choose between infamy in the eyes of the whole world,
 or in Hilda's eyes alone, she would unhesitatingly have accepted the
--**--**--
 
 "Am I, too, stained with guilt?" thought the poor girl, hiding her face
 in her hands.
 
 Not so, thank Heaven! But, as regards Beatrice's picture, the incident
 suggests a theory which may account for its unutterable grief and
 mysterious shadow of guilt, without detracting from the purity which we
 love to attribute to that ill-fated girl. Who, indeed, can look at that
 mouth,--with its lips half apart, as innocent as a babe's that has
 been crying, and not pronounce Beatrice sinless? It was the intimate
 consciousness of her father's sin that threw its shadow over her, and
 frightened her into a remote and inaccessible region, where no sympathy
 could come. It was the knowledge of Miriam's guilt that lent the same
 expression to Hilda's face.
 
 But Hilda nervously moved her chair, so that the images in the glass
 should be no longer Visible. She now watched a speck of sunshine that
 came through a shuttered window, and crept from object to object,
 indicating each with a touch of its bright finger, and then letting them
 all vanish successively. In like manner her mind, so like sunlight
 in its natural cheerfulness, went from thought to thought, but found
 nothing that it could dwell upon for comfort. Never before had this
 young, energetic, active spirit known what it is to be despondent. It
 was the unreality of the world that made her so. Her dearest friend,
 whose heart seemed the most solid and richest of Hilda's possessions,
 had no existence for her any more; and in that dreary void, out of which
 Miriam had disappeared, the substance, the truth, the integrity of life,
 the motives of effort, the joy of success, had departed along with her.
 
 It was long past noon, when a step came up the staircase. It had passed